 Warner Communications Inc. settled one of two remaining lawsuits filed against it by its largest shareholder, Chris-Craft Industries Inc.  The settlement moves Warner a step closer to completing its acquisition by the former Time Inc., which has changed its name to Time Warner Inc. and now owns 59.3% of Warner shares.  The pact sets terms for how Warner's and Chris-Craft's ownership stakes in one another will be handled as the Time deal is completed.  Warner and Chris-Craft often have feuded in the five years since they swapped ownership stakes to let Warner sidestep a takeover threat. (Warner owns 42.5% of Chris-Craft's only major operation, the BHC Holdings television station group; until recently, the Chris-Craft subsidiary held a 16.5% stake in Warner.)  Only one dispute between them remains: Chris-Craft contends its ownership of Warner preferred stock gives it veto power over the "back-end" offer that Time Warner will make for 96 million Warner shares it doesn't already own.  A Delaware court may weigh that issue next Monday, and a Warner spokeswoman said Friday no settlement talks are planned.  Under the settlement signed last week, Warner will pay Chris-Craft $144.1 million -- or $110.54 a share -- for 1.3 million Warner preferred shares owned by the Chris-Craft unit.  That represents 20% of the Warner preferred shares that Chris-Craft still controls, leaving Chris-Craft with 5.2 million preferred shares.  In addition, Warner will give back to Chris-Craft a 2.5% stake in the BHC subsidiary, giving Chris-Craft 60% ownership of BHC (Chris-Craft had at first sought 62.1% ownership).  At Chris-Craft's directive, Warner will spin off to Warner holders the other 40% stake it owns in BHC.  It will be part of Time Warner's back-end offer for the 96 million Warner shares that it doesn't already own.  Time last month paid $70 a share for 100 million Warner shares.  The newly named Time Warner will pay a mix of debt, cash and stock -- now to include the BHC shares-valued at $70 apiece for the remainder.  The exact structure of the offer may be announced Wednesday.  Analyst John Reidy of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. estimates the BHC stock will provide $8 or $9 a share of the $70-a-share value that Time Warner must pay for the rest of Warner Communications.  But under terms favorable to Chris-Craft, the BHC shares that are paid to old Warner shareholders will have vastly reduced voting power, giving them only 6.25% voting control in the Chris-Craft unit.  The settlement terms don't affect the roughly four million shares of Warner common that Chris-Craft still owns.  And when Time Warner's back-end offer is announced, Chris-Craft has the right to refuse to be paid the BHC shares as part of its package.  Chris-Craft, if it prefers, can receive more cash, debt, or Time Warner equity instead of the BHC stock, said Peter Fishbein of Kaye, Scholer, Fierman, Hays & Handler, an attorney for Chris-Craft.  The remaining Chris-Craft suit may be the only serious legal challenge left that could hinder the Warner acquisition.  Lawsuits filed by Time shareholders and Paramount Communications Inc., seeking to block the Time Warner deal, lost at the highest level of Delaware state court and aren't expected to succeed in federal appeals.  It's been a year since General Motors Corp. declared that Geo was the perfect name to give a clearer image to the stable of Japanese subcompacts on sale in Chevrolet showrooms.  But Minneapolis Chevrolet dealer Ray Eliot says he still gets the question: "What's a Geo?"  "No one knows," sighs Mr. Eliot.  "It has no identity."  Worse than that, he complains, GM built such a small dealer profit into the Geo models' prices that he can't get his salesmen interested in helping customers who want to find out.  But now, Chevrolet is cranking up a double-barreled attack on both problems.  Chevy is scrapping the quirky "Geo: No matter what" campaign that ran most of the year in favor of a more direct appeal: "Get to know Geo."  The new ads, set to an upbeat version of the old pop standard, "Getting to Know You," were created by Lintas: Campbell Ewald, Chevy's lead ad agency and creator of the old Geo ads.  Chevy is dropping a separate California campaign created by Vic Olesen & Partners of Culver City, Calif.  At the same time, Chevy General Manager J.C. Perkins says he wants to get dealers more excited about Geo.  So for 1990, GM is building more profit per car into the Geo line's pricing.  Also, for the first time, a chunk of Chevy's field sales force will be assigned specifically to Geo.  Their goal will be to sell about 280,000 Geos in 1990, Mr. Perkins says, compared with an estimated 200,000 this year.  Geo can use the help.  So far in the 1989 model year, sales of Geo-brand vehicles are running 18% behind sales of the comparable Chevrolet-brand vehicles at the same point in the 1988 model year.  Part of Geo's problem has been that its product offerings are as muddled as a hockey team in the middle of a flying line change.  All Chevy dealers selling the line had the Metro minicar, but they didn't begin receiving the restyled Geo Prizm, previously the Chevrolet Nova, until earlier this year.  Geo's sport-utility vehicle, the Tracker, was available in only a few states.  The 1989 Geo Spectrum was simply the previous year's Chevrolet Spectrum with a new nameplate.  The "No Matter What" ad campaign, which focused more on the Geo name than on any of the products that carried it, also didn't help matters, some dealers complain.  They say consumers came into showrooms looking for a car named Geo and were confused.  But now, Mr. Perkins says, "We've got our product situation cleaned up."  The result is that the 1990 ads will focus much more on individual vehicles, which dealers prefer.  In addition, GM has raised the profit margin on some 1990 Geo models as much as 40% above margins on their 1989 predecessors.  Margins on the Metro, for instance, will increase to 12% in 1990 from 10% in 1989, Mr. Perkins said.  The new Geo Storm will have a base profit margin of 14%, compared with 10% on the Spectrum it replaces.  Dealers say they're glad to get the extra money, but some wonder if it will be enough.  "Chevrolet hasn't been able to convince people that (Geo) is the equivalent of a Honda or Toyota in quality," says Cliff Fitzgerald, a manager at Friendly Chevrolet in Dallas.  "I don't know what the answer is."  General Electric Co. is the biggest corporate user of personal computers, not counting the computer makers themselves, according to a magazine survey.  GE has 45,000 personal computers installed, with a ratio of 6.71 employees for each machine, Personal Computing magazine says in its September issue.  International Business Machines Corp. and American Telephone & Telegraph Co. both had more personal computers -- 200,000 and 129,000, respectively -- but the survey excluded most companies that sell personal computers as well as government bodies and schools.  Here is the magazine's top 10:  1.  General Electric, 45,000 personal computers, 6.71 employees for each personal computer.  2.  Ford Motor Co., 42,000, 8.54.  3.  Du Pont Co., 40,000, 2.75.  4.  GTE Corp., 32,000, 3.12.  5.  General Motors Corp., 31,500, 24.28.  6.  General Dynamics Corp., 30,000, 3.16.  7.  Westinghouse Electric Corp., 30,000, 3.33.  8.  Boeing Co., 28,000, 5.46.  9.  Eastman Kodak Co., 25,000, 3.00.  10.  Merrill Lynch & Co., 25,000, 1.92.  General Motors Corp.'s Cadillac division is raising the base prices of its most popular 1990 models as much as 7.2% from 1989 levels.  Base prices for Cadillac's Fleetwood coupe, sedan and Sixty Special will jump more than $2,000 each.  The 1990 Fleetwood coupe's list price will rise 6.7% to $32,400 from $30,365 now.  The 1990 Sixty Special will start at $36,980, an increase of $2,140, or 6.1%, from 1989.  The 1990 Eldorado will start at $28,855, up 7.2% from $26,915 currently.  The smallest increase was for the Seville Touring Sedan model, which will start at $36,320, up 1.8%, or $631, from the 1989 model.  By contrast, rival Ford Motor Co. is expected to keep prices for its three Lincoln luxury cars below $30,000 in 1990.  For example, Ford has set the tentative base price of its best-selling luxury model, the Lincoln Town Car, at $27,315, up 6.7%, or $1,783 from the 1989 version.  Still, the 1990 Town Car, which will have a new, smoother exterior look, is priced $85 below Cadillac's least expensive full-size sedan for 1990, the $27,400 Brougham.  The most expensive 1990 Lincoln, the Continental, is expected to start at $29,258.  Cadillac said in a statement that the increases reflect the costs of airbags and new standard equipment.  New standard features on the 1990 Eldorado include airbags, a more powerful engine, and several previously optional cosmetic features such as "illuminated vanity mirrors," trunk mat, door edge guards, front and rear floor mats, rear window defogger and "accent striping," Cadillac said.  Cadillac didn't release a 1990 base price for its most expensive model, the Allante two-seater.  In 1989, the Allante listed for $57,183, including a $650 gas guzzler tax.  For 1990, the Allante is expected to get standard airbag and traction control, a system that controls the wheels to prevent spinouts when the car accelerates on slick pavement.  Last week, GM's Chevrolet, Pontiac, Oldsmobile and Buick divisions announced that base prices on many of their 1990 car models will increase 4% to 9%.  GM said it also plans to raise the prices of certain optional equipment.  The Federal Aviation Administration moved to exempt older planes from a requirement that large aircraft be fitted with equipment to detect and escape wind shear, a sudden, dangerous shift in the speed or direction of the wind.  The Air Transport Association, the airlines' trade group, had petitioned the FAA to exempt such planes as the McDonnell Douglas Corp. DC-9, the Boeing Co. 727 and some Boeing 737s and 747s.  The ATA said no accidents have been caused by wind shear in 42 months, largely because of improved pilot training.  They also said that refitting the older planes, which comprise 48% of the commercial fleet, is more difficult and costly than anticipated.  The FAA gave interested parties until Sept. 18 to comment on the proposal before it decides whether to adopt it.  U.S. official reserve assets rose $2.96 billion in July to $63.46 billion from June, the Treasury Department said.  Last month's gain compared with a $5.56 billion rise in reserve assets in June to $60.5 billion, the department said.  U.S. reserve assets consist of foreign currencies, gold, special drawing rights at the International Monetary Fund, and the U.S. reserve position -- its ability to draw foreign currencies -- at the IMF.  The nation's holdings of foreign currencies increased $2.48 billion in July to $34 billion, while its gold reserves rose $3 million to $11.07 billion.  U.S. holdings of IMF special drawing rights last month rose $306 million to $9.34 billion, and its reserve position at the IMF increased $167 million to $9.06 billion.  General Motors Corp. said it is closing three of its light-duty U.S. truck plants for a week starting next Monday because of slow sales.  GM has ordered temporary closings at many of its U.S. car plants over the past few months because of high inventories, but the latest moves mark the first time this year that bulging unsold supplies have forced GM to temporarily idle any of its truck plants, a company spokeswoman said.  A total of 7,200 workers will be laid off because of the shutdowns.  Truck sales have been unusually strong over the past few years, as many car buyers abandon their automobiles for minivans, which have practically replaced station wagons, and for sport utility vehicles, such as Chrysler Corp.'s Jeep models.  But sales have leveled off recently, as consumers concerned about the economy and about rising vehicle prices have deferred purchases.  Sales of GM's compact Chevrolet S-10 and GMC S-15 pickups are down almost 8% so far this year, compared with a year ago, while sales of the compact Chevrolet Blazer and GMC Jimmy sport utility vehicles are up just 1.5%.  GM builds these four models in the three plants it is temporarily closing in Shreveport, La.; Pontiac, Mich., and Moraine, Ohio.  The GM pickups are faring a little worse than the market as a whole.  Sales of all domestic-made compact pickup trucks have fallen about 7% this year from 1988 levels, according to Ward's Automotive Reports, an industry publication.  Sales of compact sport utility vehicles are down slightly from a year ago.  Analysts and industry sources have predicted that U.S. production of all trucks in the third quarter will fall slightly below output in July-September 1988, after record-setting quarters earlier.  GM executives have noted recently that GM's third-quarter truck production forecasts have been set at a record level for the period.  It couldn't be determined whether last week's announcement about the three temporary plant closings would cut that forecast to less-than-record levels.  Late last month and earlier this month, Ford Motor Co. temporarily closed two plants that build its compact Ranger pickup and Bronco II sport utility vehicle because of "a lack of dealer orders," the company said.  One plant was down for two weeks; the other was closed one week.  Meanwhile, Chrysler is considering an 11% cut in daily output at its Warren, Mich., light-duty truck plant, according to Ward's.  The plant builds full-sized and mid-sized pickups.  Plessey Co., a British electronics concern fighting a hostile #2.04 billion ($3.18 billion) bid by General Electric Co. of Britain and Siemens AG of West Germany, said it has taken a 2% stake in Ferranti PLC, a British defense electronics company.  Plessey officials refused to disclose when, why or at what price the stake was purchased.  Analysts described the stake as unlikely to seriously impede the bid by GEC and Siemens.  However, they said, if Plessey could persuade Ferranti to merge with it, that could provide an escape route for Plessey.  In such a case, "the Department of Trade and Industry would want to examine a deal, and it would probably be referred to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission, causing a lot of problems for GEC and Siemens," said Judy Stewart, electronics analyst at Kleinwort Benson Securities.  Ferranti officials said they weren't holding talks with Plessey and didn't know the company's purpose in taking the stake.  A Ferranti official said Plessey purchased its stake in July.  Analysts said Ferranti would be unlikely to agree to a merger proposal.  "It would be a big step for Ferranti to take, and they might end up being taken over with Plessey by GEC and Siemens," said Jim Ross, electronics analyst at James Capel & Co. in London.  A federal appeals court here ruled that the Securities and Exchange Commission erred in two recent decisions concerning complex products and services in the futures industry.  The findings gave a boost to the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, which had challenged the SEC's decisions.  Both exchanges stood to lose business under the SEC's interpretations.  In one ruling, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit said that the hybrid financial instruments known as index participations are properly regulated by the Commodities Futures Trading Commission.  Thus, the court said, the SEC overstepped its jurisdiction when it earlier this year decided the securities were stocks, and allowed the Philadelphia Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange, and the Chicago Board Options Exchange, to begin trading their various forms of the instruments.  The court set aside the April SEC orders approving the stock exchanges' applications.  Index participations are contracts of indefinite duration, based on the value of a basket, or index, or securities.  Individual investors never own the underlying stocks, but take profits or losses in cash based on the overall performance of the index.  The CBOT and the Merc had argued against characterizing the index participations as stocks, saying to do so restricted innovation in the futures markets.  In a second, separate case, the appellate court said the SEC improperly performed its review in granting temporary approval to the clearing agency registration of Delta Government Options Corp. Delta is a clearing agent in an electronic "off-exchange" system, operated by RMJ Options Trading Corp. and a unit of Security Pacific Corp., which trades in options on Treasury bills.  The court, saying the SEC had never made the fundamental determination as to whether the RMJ system is an "exchange," vacated the SEC's approval of the registration, but deferred the order for 120 days, and ordered the SEC to review its earlier approval.  The CBOT and the Merc had been contending the system represented an unregistered securities exchange, unfairly free from the regulatory requirements under which the futures exchanges must operate; the judges didn't directly rule on that issue.  The judges repeatedly referred to the complexity of the issues involved.  One opinion noted that the RMJ/Delta system is "neither fish nor fowl," and another complained lightly that in the case of the "newfangled" index participations, "We must decide whether tetrahedrons belong in square or round holes."  Thomas Russo, an attorney for the Philadelphia Stock Exchange, said it will appeal the decision involving index participations.  An appeal could delay the ruling's Sept. 8 effective date, he said.  "If the decision is right, it means any new securities products with any element of a futures contract are confined to being traded on the commodity exchanges," Mr. Russo said.  Mr. Russo added that because of uncertainty caused by the decision, the Philadelphia Stock Exchange won't allow trading on any new index participation contracts as of today.  Stephen Lynner, president of RMJ Options Trading, said, "For us, it's business as usual until the SEC gets around to addressing the point.  The court took special pains not to let the system shut down."  After weeks of swapping accusations, Sir James Goldsmith invited B.A.T Industries PLC Chairman Patrick Sheehy to sit down and discuss things.  Moreover, Sir James said his hostile #13.4 billion ($20.92 billion) bid for the British conglomerate is entirely open to negotiation.  The invitation, which drew a chilly initial response from B.A.T officials, comes on the eve of B.A.T's release of its official defense document.  This is expected to set out a laundry list of reasons why shareholders should reject the Goldsmith bid, made through Hoylake Investments Ltd., Sir James's bidding group.  Although the Goldsmith letter isn't likely to change the course of the takeover fight, it could make it somewhat more difficult for B.A.T to pursue a "just-say-no" strategy for repelling the buy-out proposal.  If B.A.T doesn't care for the highly leveraged all-paper bid that's on the table, the letter argues, the company should propose alternatives.  Sir James used the letter as a chance to remind Mr. Sheehy that B.A.T has more often been the hunter of acquisition targets than the hunted.  He noted that when B.A.T was pursuing Farmers Group Inc., a U.S. insurance concern it acquired last year for $5.2 billion, Mr. Sheehy extended just such an invitation to negotiate.  "In that same spirit," Sir James wrote, "I and my associates in Hoylake issue an invitation to you and your colleagues to sit down and negotiate with us an offer, all aspects of which are open to negotiation."  B.A.T officials bristled at the comparison to the Farmers acquisition.  "B.A.T was buying Farmers for what it is, not to chop it into smithereens," said a B.A.T spokesman, alluding to Sir James's plan to break up the financial services, tobacco and retailing company by selling its various operations separately.  But Sir James was only seeking peace talks.  He also expressed dismay over B.A.T 's campaign to erect regulatory and political obstacles to the buy-out in the U.S., where the British conglomerate has substantial interests.  In the letter, he complained that B.A.T was "trying to delay our progress with the U.S. insurance commissioners," and that it had intervened in court proceedings.  He also charged that lobbyists associated with B.A.T had pressed for the Securities and Exchange Commission to intervene.  Asked about reports that it was studying the Hoylake bid, a spokesman for the agency said that the SEC generally looks into large financial transactions.  Said Sir James: "It would seem more appropriate for Mr. Sheehy and his colleagues to seek the best terms available for B.A.T shareholders rather than initiate, at shareholders' expense, an intense and extensive political and legal campaign, which would deny shareholders their right to reach their own decisions about their own company."  Cummins Engine Co., Columbus, Ind., said the slump in orders for heavy trucks will lead to layoffs of about 100 production workers at four plants in southern Indiana.  The maker of diesel engines, parts and power systems said the layoffs, effective next Monday, were caused by slower industry-order rates for North American heavy-duty truck engines and production adjustments by some of its major truck customers.  A spokeswoman said the four plants employ a total of about 7,500 workers, 4,000 of them in production.  Friday's announcement followed by a day news that Navistar International Corp. will cut production and lay off workers at its medium-duty and heavy-duty truck operations.  If federal prosecutors are able to prove widespread stealing in Chicago's futures pits, one issue that is likely to emerge is whether the big brokerage houses should share some of the blame.  So far, the federal investigation has put the most heat on the exchanges and on individual traders, but the brokerage houses eventually also may have to face questions about why they didn't do a better job safeguarding customer funds.  As the middlemen between customers and the trading pits, they were certainly in a better position than was the trading public to know whether abuses were occurring.  The results of the federal investigation show that "there's been a breakdown of the fiduciary responsibility of brokerage firms to mediate between customers and floor brokers," says Richard Dennis, a legendary trader who has made more than $200 million trading in Chicago's futures pits.  Critics say that too many of the big brokerage firms have taken a "see no evil, hear no evil" approach to the pits -- doing little to make sure that the floor brokers they deal with daily are honest and above-board in handling customer funds.  Among the more serious charges against the brokerage firms is that they have turned a blind eye to many cases of what may be stealing by the floor brokers who handle their trades.  Many brokerage firms have also continued to do business with floor brokers who have been fined or suspended by the exchanges for serious rule violations, including stealing from customers.  Brokerage firms contacted for this article either declined to discuss the subject or insisted that they paid close attention to floor-broker performance.  One said the specifics of its monitoring program were a closely kept secret.  But some brokerage-firm executives, after being assured of anonymity, conceded that the government inquiry was making them rethink their relationships with pit brokers.  A senior official at one futures brokerage firm said, "How should we have prevented ourselves from doing business with these guys?  That's something I have to deal with."  Brokerage firms have traditionally kept at arm's length from the trading pits, says Thomas Russo, a futures-industry lawyer and former head of the trading and markets division of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.  The firms send orders to the floors, but what happens then is largely up to the floor brokers in the pits.  These brokers fall under the regulatory oversight of the exchanges, say brokerage firm officials.  Some speculate that the firms have deliberately yielded most of the policing activity to the exchanges because the brokerage houses don't want to have to take responsibility themselves for customer losses.  The firms do complain to the floor brokers or to the exchanges in the rare instances when a customer or the firm itself catches a floor broker in an obvious attempt to steal.  But a certain amount of "slippage," in which customer orders are executed away from what appears to be the best price available at the time, is considered a cost of doing business on the exchanges.  Given the existing rules and trade-tracking systems at the exchanges, it's often difficult to prove that floor brokers didn't do their best to get a good price for the customer, Mr. Russo says.  Mr. Dennis asserts that many brokerage firms simply are unwilling to spend the money to train their staffs or otherwise adequately monitor the exchange floors.  "If brokerage firms were competent, fraud wouldn't be tolerated," he says.  When floor brokers are caught stealing, brokerage firms sometimes appear to look the other way.  Last year the Merc charged Sam A. Cali with stealing a trade from a customer in connection with a Jan. 15, 1988, order he handled for a Merrill Lynch & Co. customer.  The Merc found Mr. Cali guilty, fined him $5,000, suspended him for two days and duly posted a notice of the disciplinary action on its trading floor.  Mention of the sanction also appeared in a weekly executive-summary newsletter sent to Merc members.  But Mr. Cali, right up until he received a federal grand-jury subpoena this past January, continued to enjoy a big business filling orders in the Merc's Japanese-yen pit for major brokerage firms.  Mr. Cali, 38 years old, pleaded innocent earlier this month to charges of racketeering, 41 counts of mail fraud and 58 violations of commodities laws.  The federal indictment alleges, among other things, that yen traders stole good trades from their customers.  According to the indictment, Mr. Cali did business with several firms.  None of them, including Merrill Lynch, would comment about Mr. Cali or answer any questions about how they choose and monitor floor brokers.  Other yen brokers who were indicted had continued to execute trades for brokerage firms after being disciplined by the Merc during the past two years.  Some brokerage firms discount the importance of exchange disciplinary actions.  Brokerage officials argue that in some cases the sanctions are influenced by intra-exchange politics.  "We'd be hard pressed to find a lot of brokers who haven't had {disciplinary} problems," says Jack H. Lehman III, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.'s director of commodities.  If floor brokers are convicted of fraud, some cheated investors will probably sue them for damages, although there may be little left to collect after the government is finished seizing assets under anti-racketeering statutes.  Winning such suits could be difficult.  Most brokerage firms have mandatory arbitration clauses in customer agreements that could limit damage awards.  Looking ahead to commodity markets this week:  Copper  Futures prices encountered profit-taking Friday after rising for seven consecutive sessions, but the fundamental factors that spurred the rally are likely to continue influencing the market.  Throughout most of this year it was expected that copper, a basic industrial metal, would encounter slower demand and weakening prices as economies softened world-wide.  Indeed, copper fell below $1 a pound in July from its record high of $1.6475 set last December.  Then came the surprise.  During the usually slow summer, the price began to rise as available inventories of the metal fell.  Where was the metal going at this time of the year and in the middle of an economic slowdown?  "It's being consumed," says Fred D'Agostino, president of Metal Resources, Inc., a Riverside, Conn., metal-trading firm.  "Despite the economic statistics, which do show a world-wide slowdown, the demand is there for copper."  The past three summers have been unusual in this respect, with the result that supplies haven't built up, he said.  In addition to demand remaining better than usual, Mr. D'Agostino said, production, which had been expected to pick up substantially, has run into disruptions.  "Every week, it seems, there has been a new problem: Bougainville, Highland Valley, now Peru, Cyprus, and so on," he said.  "There have been massive exports of copper scrap and ingot to the Continent in the past two to three months, and there is only one reason for such business -- the copper is needed," Mr. D'Agostino said.  As to why copper appears to be running counter to the economic trend, Mr. D'Agostino said: "Copper historically has been the last commodity to rise in periods of economic upturn and the last to fall when the economy goes down."  Energy  Oil markets likely will be afflicted with summer doldrums for another week or so.  Still, there could be new volatility in prices, particularly in futures trading, as information becomes available on oil inventories.  That's due to a question regarding petroleum demand.  Is the growth rate of world oil demand beginning to slow?  There are some in the industry who think so.  But many analysts and traders are looking to inventory levels for further evidence.  Crude oil production by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries appears to be leveling.  But it remains at a relatively-high rate -- more than 21.5 million barrels a day.  There can be a lag of several weeks before these barrels produced now show up in the market.  But if petroleum demand is turning sluggish, the excess OPEC output should soon be reflected in a buildup of crude-oil and fuel inventories in the major oil-consuming regions.  "If this does not materialize, then one would have to conclude that underlying demand is stronger and that any further damage to oil prices may therefore be limited," says Michael Rothman, Merrill Lynch Capital Markets vice president and senior energy analyst.  Among the closely watched weekly reports on levels of petroleum inventories are those of the American Petroleum Institute, which recently have been showing totals of U.S. oil stocks below those of a year ago.  This week's API report, due to be released tomorrow after trading closes, is likely to get even more attention than usual.  Grains and Soybeans  Traders will continue to keep their eyes skyward to observe the amount of rains received this week.  Today, the market is expected to focus on the amount of rainfall received over the past weekend in major portions of the Corn and Soybean belt.  "It's still a weather-related market," said Daniel Gonzelli, an analyst with GNP Commodities Inc., Chicago.  "Rains are needed to get soybeans over the hump," he added.  Soybeans are at a crucial stage of development in which they need sustaining rains.  Traders will also watch developments on the export business front.  New business from Mexico and China late last week signaled that the U.S. may be getting some demand in what has been a "dismal" market for exports, analysts say.  Mexico purchased 403,000 metric tons of U.S corn and China bought 150,000 metric tons of corn and 100,000 metric tons of wheat.  The sale of U.S. grain to China was the first in two years and it is rumored that China might want to make additional corn purchases.  Shares in Wellcome PLC soared in response to a U.S. government study that found the company's AZT drug effective in symptomless carriers of acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Analysts said the report opens a whole new market for the drug.  The prospect of that added demand, they said, may lead investors to boost the company's share price to 700 or 800 pence ($10.93 to $12.49) by the end of the year.  Without the benefits of the AIDS drug, Hoare Govett analyst Nigel Barnes said, Wellcome shares would be worth around 400 pence.  Wellcome leaped 164 pence, or 32%, Friday to close at 673 pence on London's stock exchange.  In the U.S., it was quoted at $10.55 to $10.75 a share in American depositary receipt form.  The stock is not listed in the U.S. but is traded on dealers' "pink sheets," which contain prices of unlisted stocks.  One New York dealer reported that more than a million shares were traded at his firm alone, after a 16 million-share day in the U.K.  Barbara Arzymanow, an analyst at Kleinwort Benson Securities, predicted a fourfold increase in Wellcome's per-share earnings by 1992 from the 15.1 pence a share earned in 1988.  "We are not talking significant increases here; we are talking quantum leaps," she said.  And Barclays de Zoete Wedd analyst Steve Plag predicted that AZT will help make Wellcome the fastest-growing of the 100 issues in the London market's Financial Times-Stock Exchange index.  Thursday, U.S. government researchers released a report that said that AZT, which Wellcome sells under the name Retrovir, is safer and more effective against the fatal disease than had been thought earlier.  Until now, AZT has been given mainly to people who had developed the disease or a lesser form called ARC, or AIDS-related complex -- about 50,000 in the U.S. However, as a result of the finding, scientists say the drug can be made available at a far earlier stage, to patients who carry the HIV virus that causes AIDS but have not yet contracted the disease.  There are an estimated 1.5 million asymptomatic AIDS carriers in the U.S. who could benefit from the treatment.  "That represents a theoretical thirtyfold increase in the population that will be able to use the drug," Ian White, a pharmaceuticals analyst at Kleinwort Benson, said.  Mr. White said the likely market for the drug will be far smaller, as most people do not know they carry the AIDS virus.  However, he said, "It may be that, now there is a drug that is more effective in treating the disease, more people will come forward to be tested and treated."  At present, only about 10% of the U.S's 1.5 million HIV carriers know they carry the disease.  Although Wellcome still must apply to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and to regulators in other countries for authorization to use the drug more widely, analysts expect such permission to be granted within months.  Pharmaceutical analyst Stewart Adkins at Shearson Lehman Hutton Securities forecasts $880 million in sales from the drug by the end of 1992, and Mr. Plag of Barclays de Zoete Wedd estimates that the drug will add $900 million annually to the company's sales by 1993.  Sales of Retrovir came to about #90 million ($140.5 million) last year, when Wellcome had total sales of #1.25 billion.  Retrovir's effectiveness in extending the lives of people with AIDS was first announced in September 1986, and the drug was approved for treating patients with advanced cases of AIDS and the related complex about a year later.  Wellcome's stock price hit a peak in May 1988 of 550 pence and then began to fade, hitting a low of 400 in late December.  The price languished at that level for months as worries about AZT's side effects caused attention to shift to other potential AIDS treatments and as research uncovered AZT-resistant strains of the virus.  But the price began to firm rapidly three weeks ago after positive results were reported in the treatment of patients with early symptoms of AIDS. According to the most recent study, asymptomatic carriers do not suffer the usual side effects when treated with the drug because they are given a smaller dose.  Now Retrovir appears likely to dominate the AIDS-treatment spotlight for the next two years, as other treatments are just beginning clinical trials, analysts say.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  London shares, buoyed by Wellcome's surge and by bullish corporate news and economic data, rallied to a 1989 high on the FT-SE 100 index.  The index closed at 2375.1, up 15.1.  The Financial Times 30-share index rose 4.0 to 1979.0.  Volume was 426.3 million shares, compared with 544.3 million Thursday.  The advance was tempered only by an indifferent start on Wall Street and signs that buying interest was fading at higher price levels.  Tokyo stocks closed easier in thin dealings as investors retreated to the sidelines because of the weaker yen and lower bond prices.  Some export-related issues benefited from the stronger dollar.  But other than that, few sectors attracted much interest.  The Nikkei index of 225 issues was down 26.97 to 35063.14 Friday, but rebounded in early Monday trading to gain 73 points to 35136.14.  Friday's volume on the first section was estimated at 450 million shares, compared with 477.1 million Thursday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining issues 454-423, with 213 issues unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 2.35 Thursday, was down 0.46, or 0.02%, at 2652.50.  In other Asian and Pacific markets, shares closed lower in Hong Kong, Wellington, Sydney and Seoul, were mixed in Manila and Singapore and rose in Taipei.  Elsewhere, shares closed higher in Brussels and Milan, lower in Paris, Zurich and Stockholm and mixed in Frankfurt and Amsterdam.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 17 Aug 16 Year  @ U.S. .................... 317.4 318.4 +23.9  @ Britain ................. 712.2 707.8 +30.4  @ Canada .................. 434.5 436.4 +18.3  @ Japan ................... 1570.3 1568.8 +10.5  @ France .................. 526.0 526.5 +18.8  @ Germany ................. 247.9 250.3 +19.2  @ Hong Kong ............... 1957.3 1973.4 - 3.6  @ Switzerland ............. 235.3 235.0 +36.1  @ Australia ............... 346.3 345.6 +19.3  @ World index ............. 536.3 539.4 + 8.5  Now that the government's borrowing needs are even more enormous than usual, investors have an opportunity to buy Treasury debt securities on the cheap.  At least that's the view taken by some money managers ahead of a flood of new Treasury securities due to be auctioned this week.  They contend that the next few weeks may offer investors their last chance to lock in attractive yields before interest rates resume a downward drift.  "The upcoming auction provides the most attractive opportunity to buy intermediate-term notes that we have seen in a long time," says William H. Gross, a managing director at Pacific Investment Management Co. in Newport Beach, Calif.  For investors who missed the bond market's powerful rally between May and July, he adds, this week's Treasury auction "gives them a chance to climb aboard the train -- and this is probably the last station."  Many people view the recent rise in Treasury yields as a temporary phenomenon, brought about by an overblown conviction that the economy's strength will keep the Federal Reserve from bringing interest rates down further.  The recent slump in bond prices, they say, also reflected the past two weeks' auctioning of $70 billion of Treasury bills, notes and bonds -- a portion of which went to finance the savings and loan bailout.  Because the Treasury needs to raise funds quickly to begin liquidating hundreds of failed savings and loan associations, the sizes of auctions have been increasing to provide additional cash.  For the regular weekly three-month and six-month Treasury bill auction today, the amount to be sold was increased to about $14.4 billion from the $13 billion level of previous auctions.  The government also will sell $9.5 billion of two-year notes tomorrow; $7.75 billion of five-year notes Wednesday and $9.25 billion of one-year bills Thursday.  The two-year note sale was increased $500 million from the prior auction.  The five-year auction was increased $250 million from the previous sale.  In when-issued trading Friday, the two-year notes were quoted at a price to yield 8.26% while the five-year notes were quoted at a price to yield 8.13%.  That's considerably higher than three weeks ago, when bond yields slid below 8% for the first time in more than two years.  But "if you take longer than a two-week view of the bond market, current yields look attractive," says Barbara Kenworthy, a portfolio manager at Dreyfus Corp.  She says the bond market will probably remain relatively stable for a few weeks before the next rally begins once investors digest the new supply of securities.  But rates could rise, confounding the prevailing wisdom, if September's economic reports provide additional evidence of a sturdy economy.  So far, mixed signals have emerged about the health of the economy.  Last week's merchandise trade report, for example, showed a strong 3.6% decline in imports, a sign that consumer spending is weakening.  But the report also showed a 1.5% increase in exports, suggesting that the manufacturing sector continues to perform reasonably well.  Recent retail sales statistics have been strong, although some analysts contend that the rising sales result from retailers' price-cutting on everything from clothing to cars in an effort to stimulate demand.  Most economists and money managers agree that such ambiguities are likely to influence the Federal Reserve to keep monetary policy on hold when it meets for its next Open Market Committee meeting tomorrow.  But bond market bulls contend that investors are overreacting to the evidence of economic strength, much as they overreacted earlier this summer to indications that the economy was heading toward a recession.  "I think the spate of economic reports will make the Fed hesitant" to ease interest rates any further for the time being," says David H. Resler, senior vice president and chief economist at Nomura Securities International Inc. Still, in the longer term, he says, "we are headed toward lower interest rates because the economy is considerably weaker than the latest economic reports" suggest.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Treasury bond prices ended little changed after a day of seesaw, but very light, trading.  Early Friday morning, Treasury prices slipped after the Labor Department reported that its closely watched consumer price index rose a modest 0.2% in July.  While that was generally in line with expectations, bond market analysts say investors focused on the separate components of the report that provided a slightly different picture of inflation.  When excluding the food and energy parts, the CPI grew 0.4% in July and that reinforced the growing perceptions that the Federal Reserve is unlikely to ease credit conditions anytime soon.  But by midday, most of the bond market losses had been recouped as traders and dealers covered their short positions ahead of the weekend.  In a short sale, investors sell borrowed securities and later seek to make a profit by buying an equal number of securities at a lower price to replace what was borrowed.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond ended slightly higher and was quoted late Friday at a price of 99 19/32, compared with 99 17/32 Thursday.  The benchmark's yield eased to 8.15% from 8.16%.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 98 27/32, down slightly from 98 29/32 Thursday.  The yield rose to 8.15% from 8.14%.  Short-term rates also were mixed.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills fell to 7.84% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.09% while the rate on six-month Treasury bills was essentially unchanged at 7.86% to yield 8.28%.  In other major markets:  -- Municipal bonds were flat to 3/8 point lower.  This week's new issue's calendar is shaping up to be quite full, with $1.9 billion in municipal notes and bonds scheduled for pricing.  In an offering garnering considerable attention, the Washington Public Power Supply System is considering tapping the market early this week with its first public bond issue since it defaulted on $2.25 billion of bonds in 1983.  WPPSS's long awaited $450 million revenue bond issue for nuclear projects 1 and 3 is tentatively in the works for pricing tomorrow, through underwriters led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  -- Mortgage securities ended flat to slightly higher.  The benchmark Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities ended 97 3/32, up 1/32, after touching a morning low of 96 5/8.  In the derivative market, $840 million of new REMICs were priced Friday after none were priced in the first four days of the week.  Dealers said underwriters were able to launch new issues now that the $5.5 billion of securities priced in the first two weeks of August have been sold.  -- Corporate bonds ended the week unchanged to 1/4 point higher, after spotty trading.  With just a handful of new debt and equity deals slated for offering this week, activity in the corporate bond market is expected to slow to a crawl.  "Many corporations are in a cash-rich position; they don't really need to tap the markets.  Many participants are away on summer vacation.  All this, added to a volatile government market, and you get a pretty deserted corporate market," one syndicate official says.  Is Easy Goer the horse of the year?  Maybe so, maybe not.  Sunday Silence, his conqueror in the Kentucky Derby and Preakness, chewed oats in California last weekend, perhaps contemplating revenge for his defeat by E.G. in last June's Belmont Stakes.  Perhaps, though, Sunday Silence was merely contemplating his oats.  One never knows.  S.S. could have come to the sitzbath capital of upstate New York in search of the $653,100 first prize that the Saratoga folks were offering to the winner of Saturday's Travers Stakes, its ancient showpiece race for three-year-olds, but he didn't.  In his absence, Easy Goer bagged the winner's check, beating the front-running Clever Trevor to the wire by a widening three lengths over 1 1/4 miles.  The victory was fully expected by an overflow throng of 49,000, which made Easy Goer a 1-to-5 favorite in a six-horse field.  That produced a return of $2.40 on a $2 win bet and made such tickets as valuable as souvenirs as in bills and coins.  Payout-window lines, however, indicated that most winners were cashing theirs.  The New York Racing Association, eager to hype its attractions, annually spices the Travers by pointing to all the notable favorites that have lost it.  The list is impressive, including such as Tom Fool, Affirmed, Conquistador Cielo and Alysheba.  On the other hand, Man o' War, Whirlaway, Native Dancer and Buckpasser all won it as the people's choices, and favorites have triumphed in 41 of the last 87 goes, a proportion well in excess of the national average of about 33%.  The reputation of the race as a favorite's graveyard seems to be peculiarly a perception of New Yorkers, who deem it a scandal anytime a favorite is beaten.  That 49,000 people would show up for a race in a town whose usual population is 26,000 illustrates the extent of the Gothamite invasion.  Saratoga is where New York horseplayers go to rusticate in August, and the place certainly is a change from the big city's asphalt acres.  Victorian mansions with broad front porches line Union Avenue outside the track, and one can easily conjure up visions of broad-beamed gentlemen and bustled ladies fanning themselves thereon.  There are stepping stones in front of the track's grandstand entrance for any carriage trade that may happen along, and chalk boards on the premises also bespeak an earlier era.  In the paddock and the adjacent and ample picnic area, one can tread on real dirt and be shaded by real trees.  People lounge on blankets and lawn chairs.  The ambience smacks of a country fair.  An enlightened track policy allows racegoers to bring along coolers bearing various alcoholic beverages, and these were consumed with moderation everywhere I looked.  This is in contrast with Churchill Downs on Kentucky Derby day, where the confiscation of alcohol at the gates forces patrons to pay up for those awful mint juleps inside, and, perhaps relatedly, drunkenness is rampant.  At the same time, Saratoga is up to date enough to make wandering New Yorkers feel at home.  Signs in front of several of the manses proclaim them to have been condo-ized, the track offers Pick Six and trifecta wagering along with other new-fangled betting gimmicks, and lines everywhere are Manhattan-long.  Shut Out is known hereabouts not only as the winner of the 1942 Travers, but also, uncapitalized, as the fate of would-be bettors who tarry.  Easy Goer tarried not a bit on Saturday, and his time of 2:00 4/5 was the third-fastest in an affair that dates from 1864.  The handsome chestnut colt's sole serious competition, both on form and in actuality, was Clever Trevor, a high-pocketed product of Oklahoma.  He was handled easily.  The afternoon's real suspense was provided not by any of Easy Goer's equine foes but by the threat of rain; E.G.'s two most-celebrated defeats in a 14-race, 10-win career came on muddy tracks at Churchill Downs, first in the Breeder's Cup event for two-year-olds last November, and again in May's Kentucky Derby.  Saturday's weather forecast called for showers, but they held off until about 20 minutes after the Travers was completed, an indication that the Man Upstairs liked this particular favorite as much as the local fancy.  Another threat to the winner came from adoring fans who cheered his every movement from barn to paddock to racetrack.  Easy Goer was distracted by the commotion, reared while being saddled and had to be calmed.  "Running the race seemed easy after that," noted Pat Day.  Clever Trevor's shot depended on his getting far enough ahead to negate Easy Goer's stretch drive, but that was not to be.  Clever Trevor was dogged from the outset by Roi Danzig and never led by more than two lengths.  Easy Goer overtook Clever Trevor in the homestretch, hesitated for a moment, then pulled away after a whip-tap from Day.  Roi Danzig faded to last; Shy Tom, a member of the D. Wayne Lukas-trained phalanx, was third.  Post-race testimony had to do largely with E.G.'s place in history.  Owner Ogden Phipps also was the proprietor of the great Buckpasser, who won the '66 Travers.  He declined any direct comparison, but said that Easy Goer won his Travers more easily than Buckpasser had.  Trainer C.R. "Shug" McGaughey noted that Easy Goer had posted three straight wins since losing the Preakness, and opined that this should meet the criterion for consistency.  "We didn't go to the bottom of the barrel with the horse" even with his near-record clocking, offered jockey Day.  Easy Goer and Sunday Silence are scheduled to follow separate paths until, probably, the Breeder's Cup in November at Gulfstream Park in Florida.  That oughta be a good one.  Meantime, as workmen picked up the debris left by the huge crowd, a woman remarked to a companion that the scene reminded her of Woodstock 20 years ago.  "Yeah, Woodstock with pari-mutuel tickets," the fella said.  BTR PLC said it aims to use its prospective partnership with Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. to sharply expand its U.S. operations through acquisitions.  John Cahill, BTR chief executive officer, said in an interview that the international industrial conglomerate would like to have its U.S. operations contribute one third of the company's earnings and sales, up from one fifth currently, "simply by growing at a faster rate," primarily through acquisitions.  BTR also wants to have its American operations bundled into "a publicly traded vehicle" in the U.S., he added.  Mr. Cahill took pains to minimize speculation that KKR, the premier U.S. buy-out firm, posed a takeover threat to BTR.  On Aug. 11 KKR acquired U.S. antitrust clearance to buy as much as 15% of BTR, a stake that would cost about #1.23 billion ($1.92 billion) at current market prices.  "We don't see BTR being put in play because of this; we don't think there's anything sinister," Mr. Cahill said.  "Europe is a market (KKR) is interested in.  There is opportunity for us both" to do joint acquisitions in the U.S. and Europe.  Persons close to KKR agreed that this is KKR's intention.  However, Mr. Cahill stressed that, should it embark on an acquisitions partnership with KKR, BTR had certain major differences with the philosophy of KKR and other leveraged buy-out firms, which often sell an acquired company's assets to help pay back debt incurred in making a takeover.  "We don't buy companies to break them up," he said.  "We buy companies because they fit.  I like some debt, but I don't want to be buried in it.  We'd like to reinforce our products" in the U.S.  He said the company is planning a $500 million commercial paper offering in the U.S. soon.  BTR's U.S. operations include Stewart-Warner Corp., a transportation equipment maker; U.S. Supply Co. and Tilcon Holdings Inc., construction suppliers, and Clarkson Industries Inc., which makes Airflow air conditioners and other industrial products.  In 1988, the U.S. units contributed 20% of BTR's #913 million pretax profit, and 21% of its #5.47 billion sales.  The units are managed through BTR Dunlop Inc., a subsidiary.  Mr. Cahill said BTR would like to make a public offering of about 40% of BTR Dunlop's shares in the U.S.  He said he was surprised that KKR wanted a stake in BTR "because we weren't aware that they made passive investments -- but they do.  They did it in Texaco and Kroger, and then sold them."  Mr. Cahill said there is "no indication" that KKR, which holds a fraction of 1% of BTR shares, had added to its holding yet.  But the share price continued to climb Friday on the prospect that KKR soon would be buying.  In late dealings on London's stock exchange, BTR was quoted at 484 pence ($7.56), up 14 pence (22 cents) on the day, up 30 pence on the week and up 65 since Aug. 11.  Mr. Cahill said the Aug. 11 disclosure of KKR's intentions spurred numerous calls to BTR by investment bankers peddling defensive strategies.  -- Craig Forman contributed to this article.  Household Spending:  Where Do Dollars Go?  THE AVERAGE American household spent $24,414 in 1987.  Just how was the money divvied up?  The largest share -- $7,569 -- went toward housing and related expenses, from taxes to furnishings, the Bureau of Labor Statistics says.  The second-largest category was transportation, with families spending an average of $4,600 on cars and other vehicles, insurance, repairs and public transport.  Food took $3,664, with $2,099 spent on chowing down at home.  Among the smaller categories: An average of $2,175 went toward personal insurance, pensions and Social Security.  Clothing and related services, such as dry cleaning, used up $1,446.  Another $1,193 was dished out on entertainment, slightly outstripping the $1,135 spent on health care.  Households with incomes of $50,000 or more spent an average of $51,433 in 1987.  Those with incomes below $10,000 spent an average of $10,930, factoring in government assistance.  Low-income households spent 36% of their money on housing, compared with 29% for affluent households.  Affluent households spent a disproportionate share on personal insurance and pensions: 13.5% compared with 2.5% for poor households.  ---  @ The Household Budget  @ Percent of expenditures by category, 1987  @ Housing 31.0%  @ Other 20.3  @ Transportation 16.9  @ Food 15.0  @ Insurance/pensions 8.9  @ Apparel 5.9  @ Source: Census Bureau, Consumer Expenditure Survey, 1987  What Kind of Wife Earns  More Than Her Hubby?  THERE ARE 29 million dual-earner couples in the U.S., and among them 18% have wives who earn more than their husbands.  The profile of those wives is different from other working women.  For one, they are more likely to work full time, year-round.  Some 78% of higher-earning wives work regular, full weeks through the year, while just 46% of the wives who earn less than their husbands work those hours.  Women who earn more than their husbands aren't necessarily in higher-paying jobs than their spouses, but many work more hours.  Only 56% of husbands who earn less than their wives work full-time and year-round, compared with 87% of husbands who earn more than their wives.  Higher-earning wives are more likely to have some college education than lower-earning wives.  Forty-eight percent of higher-earning wives have one or more years of college education, compared with 43% of wives who earn less than their husbands.  Wives who earn more than their mates are slightly older than those who earn less; 32% of the group are 45 or older, while just 28% of lower-earning wives are 45 or older.  Knowing that, it's not surprising that the higher earners are less likely to have young children at home; just 48% have children under age 18, compared with 59% of wives who earn less than their husbands.  Hispanic Households  Grow Less Traditional  HISPANICS TEND to be family oriented, but they are seeing a decline in traditional, married-couple families along with the general population, the Census Bureau says.  In 1988, 81% of Hispanic households were families (consisting of two or more related people), down from 84% in 1980.  Just 71% of non-Hispanic households were families in 1988, down from 75%.  The share of Hispanic households headed by married couples in 1988 was the same as for non-Hispanics, at 56%.  But the share of female-headed families was higher, at 19% compared with 11% for non-Hispanic households.  Single men rarely head families in either group: Just 6% for Hispanics and 3% for non-Hispanics.  The share of families headed by one adult has risen for both groups, but especially for Hispanics.  Some 24% of Hispanic families are headed by a single person, up from 20% in 1980.  In non-Hispanic families, 14% are headed by one adult, up from 13%.  Some 20% of Hispanic households and 29% of non-Hispanic households aren't families, meaning they consist of people living alone or with nonrelatives.  In 1980, just 17% of Hispanic households and 26% of non-Hispanic households weren't families.  Odds and Ends  IT COST EMPLOYERS in the U.S. an average of $36,891 to relocate a homeowning employee in 1988, compared with just $9,924 to relocate a renter, according to a survey by Runzheimer International, a management consulting firm.  Most employers pick up some expenses incurred during house-hunting trips. . . .  Some 83% of children now aged 12 will be the victims of violent crime at some point in their lives, the Bureau of Justice Statistics calculates.  But James Lynch, professor of justice, law and society at American University, says the figure is too high.  He faults the statistic for spreading the incidence of crime over the entire population, not accounting for the fact that some people will be victims more than once, while others are at low risk of ever being victims.  The U.S. subsidiary of Toshiba Corp. will produce color television picture tubes in the U.S. larger than any other tubes produced in the U.S., the company said.  Toshiba Display Devices Inc. (TDD) of Horseheads, New York, is to begin production of 32- and 34-inch "super-large" picture tubes for color television sets in the U.S. beginning Monday, said a Toshiba spokesman, adding that TDD is the first company in the U.S. to produce picture tubes larger than 30 inches.  The two picture tubes will be used in 30- and 32-inch television sets.  The company will produce 20,000 of the two kinds of tubes a month until the end of this year, increasing monthly production next year to 30,000 for a pace of 360,000 tubes annually, the spokesman said.  The company, which currently produces 20- and 21-inch picture tubes, has invested $100 million to enable its production of the "super-large" televisions.  The company spokesman said TDD has increased the number of its employees from 750 to 1,200 for the production of additional tubes.  The symptoms are obvious: low trading volume and up-a-bit, down-a-bit price changes.  Diagnosis?  A classic case of "consolidation."  Prognosis?  Uncertain.  A little rest may cure the problem altogether.  But there also are some warning signs that suggest that this consolidation could turn into a bad case of "correction."  Just when it looked like stock prices were poised to shatter the Dow Jones Industrial Average's all-time high two weeks ago, the stock market suddenly took sick.  Prices have slipped and volume is ebbing, making many investors uneasy.  A look at the ways in which analysts and money managers are reading the stock market's entrails these days might provide some solace -- or add to anxiety.  Whether pessimist or optimist, most analysts expected the upward momentum in stock prices to slow as the Dow Jones Industrial Average approached its record of 2722.42, set Aug. 25, 1987.  They just didn't know if would turn into a consolidation, in which prices retreat modestly before resuming an upward trend, or a correction, in which prices drop 5% or more.  One reason to expect a slowdown was that the most recent leg of the rally that began last November was particularly vigorous, driving prices up at a feverish pace.  "There was a 75-point move in a three-week period" in July, says Kenneth Spence, director of the technical analysis group at Salomon Brothers.  "You can't keep that kind of momentum up forever."  Psychology, too, played a role, especially in light of the lofty prices for stocks.  "When the market approaches an all-time high, people become a little uneasy about the upside and feel less comfortable chasing strength," says Carmine Grigoli, chief portfolio strategist at First Boston.  Salomon's Mr. Spence notes that the entire recovery from the October 1987 crash has followed a stair-step pattern, with periodic rallies broken by periods of sluggish trading and moribund price action.  The pattern tends to show that as stock market indexes and averages reach levels of 15% to 16% above their 200-day averages, the rallies stall.  Two weeks ago, when the current consolidation began, for example, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was about 16% above its 200-day average.  What's encouraging about the stair-step pattern is that during the consolidation phases prices don't drop below a level of about 5% above the 200-day average.  Investors see the slowdown and modest price drops as just another buying opportunity and keep pumping money into the stock market.  "What we've seen is that there's a real lack of selling pressure," says Mr. Spence.  "That's been very much the character of the market all through the recovery."  Taken together, all that spells "bull," says Mr. Spence.  "From a technician's point of view a bull trend is when the market is making a series of higher highs and higher lows and remaining above the long-term moving average.  This market is still in a bullish trend."  External factors also suggest that the current consolidation is merely a pause before stock prices resume their upward move, says First Boston's Mr. Grigoli.  Recent economic data show an economy that's expanding modestly while inflation is ebbing.  The Federal Reserve, which had been driving interest rates higher until a few months ago, now is being more accommodative, and the prospects of a recession are rapidly fading.  "There has been an awful lot of good news lately," he says, adding that the favorable outlook is drawing increasing numbers of individual and foreign investors into the stock market.  But not all analysts share that optimistic outlook.  Michael O'Higgins, an Albany, N.Y., money manager, specializes in buying and selling the 30 stocks that make up the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  He's found over the years that the behavior of the index and its component stocks provides him with clues about the overall market's direction.  In early 1984, for instance, when overall stock prices were declining, he noted that although the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down, 18 of the component stocks were up and only 12 were down.  To him, that meant prices were about to turn up overall -- and they did.  Now, he says, the Dow Jones industrials are flashing a warning signal.  While the index is approaching its highs, only 13 of the 30 component stocks have made new highs of their own.  Worse still, the biggest gainers among the Dow industrials have been so-called defensive stocks that tend to do well in times of economic difficulty.  "This is the type of action that precedes every major decline" in stock prices, he says.  "We're talking about a basic hidden erosion that's very ominous."  While Mr. O'Higgins is looking to big stocks for clues about how the current consolidation might turn out, Avner Arbel, a professor of finance at Cornell University, is taking heed of warning signs from stocks with small market capitalizations.  In a recent study he found that the prices of many small stocks are unjustifiably high because they fail to reflect the relatively weak earnings that many of these small companies have reported.  Over the past year, Mr. Arbel says, stocks of companies with annual sales of $8 million to $250 million -- the bottom third of his 2,000-company sample -- have gained 14.5% in price, compared with 24% for the very largest stocks in the top third of his sample.  Even so, the ratio of prices to per-share earnings for these small stocks is about 20, compared with 13 for the 500 issues in Standard & Poor's index.  "Most investors don't realize that one third of the market is in bad shape fundamentally," says Mr. Arbel.  He thinks small stocks are due for a severe downward adjustment, which would be reflected in broad indexes such as the New York Stock Exchange composite and the Nasdaq composite index.  Moreover, the professor adds, a correction in small stocks would probably forebode a sell-off in the larger stocks.  The reason?  Many of the small companies are America's creative, high-growth concerns.  "They are the future of the market, typically," says Mr. Arbel.  They are also more sensitive to economic downturns because their earnings bases aren't as diversified as large companies'.  Thus small stocks, trailing large stocks in gains, will lead large stocks in declines, Mr. Arbel predicts.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  A recovery in the bond market and a late round of buying tied to the expiration of stock-index futures and options sent stocks higher.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average advanced 8.34 points to 2687.97.  The market gained 3.98 points for the week, marking its seventh consecutive weekly increase, but the 0.1% gain was the smallest of the seven.  Takeover rumors helped propel the indexes higher.  For example, McGraw-Hill jumped 6 to 85 on rumors that Paramount Communications, which failed in a recent attempt to take over Time Inc., has set its sights on acquiring the company.  However, observers told The Wall Street Journal late in the day that a bid for McGraw-Hill by Paramount was unlikely.  In early activity, prices fell briefly after the release of the July consumer price report.  The consumer price index rose 0.2% in July, as expected.  But measured without the volatile food and energy components, prices rose 0.4%.  Initially, bonds were sold off on the price report, but then recovered as dealers bought back some of their "short" positions.  In a short sale, a borrowed security is sold in a bet that it can be bought back later more cheaply.  About 20% of the day's activity on the New York Stock Exchange took place in the last half-hour of trading, when dealers unleashed a variety of strategies tied to the expiration of the August Major Market Index futures and options, and Standard & Poor's 100-stock options.  The expiration created modest buy order imbalances in big stocks on the New York Stock Exchange.  Most of these imbalances were attributed to market-makers in MMI options who were covering their short positions with purchases of stock.  In an imbalance, an exchange specialist has an unusual amount of orders on one side of the market that can't immediately be matched.  Big Board volume totaled 145,810,000 shares, in line with the sluggish pace set earlier in the week.  Advancers edged out decliners, 776 to 661.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average rose 14.05 to an all-time record of 1442.39, with UAL pacing the advance as it did most of the week.  UAL, the owner of United Airlines, gained 4 5/8 to 271.  The bidding war loomed larger with Texas investor Robert Bass and a group consisting of British Airways and Morgan Stanley interested in the company.  Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, the sole bidder for UAL at the moment, said he is ready to determine whether to raise his offer of $275 a share.  In other takeover-related activity, Georgia Gulf jumped 3 1/2 to 54 1/2 as 1.6 million shares changed hands.  Dallas investor Harold Simmons, head of a group with a 9.42% stake in the company, said he will now consider seeking control.  One of the companies in the group, NL Industries, gained 1 1/8 to 25 3/4.  Maytag rose 1 3/4 to 23 1/4 on 1.8 million shares.  Several professional investors who see the company's shares as undervalued have been accumulating the stock, according to Business Week magazine's "Inside Wall Street" column.  C.R. Bard, which stopped shipments of a new catheter product at the request of the Food and Drug Administration, dropped 1 1/2 to 20 on volume of two million shares.  The company estimated that the move would lower its 1989 net income 25 cents a share.  Par Pharmaceutical, the target of an FDA investigation, lost 1/2 to 4 7/8.  The company suspended distribution of all its generic drugs in tablet and capsule form.  Pacific Telesis Group added 7/8 to 44 5/8, and GTE advanced 1 3/8 to 59 3/4.  California regulators recommended a telecommunications "incentive" plan, which would permit the two companies to earn higher profits if they raise productivity 4% a year.  Castle & Cooke dropped 2 3/8 to 40.  Drexel Burnham Lambert lowered its investment rating on the stock, citing its view that the price already reflects the company's favorable prospects.  VF Corp. fell 1 5/8 to 36 3/4 following the expiration of its Dutch auction self-tender offer for 10 million common shares, or 14.7% of its shares outstanding.  The company said it would pay $38 a share; the price range for the offer had been set at $35 to $39 a share.  Automatic Data Processing slid 1 1/4 to 41 1/2, apparently because of disappointment with its earnings for the June quarter.  Net income rose to 73 cents a share from 63 cents a year earlier, with the latest results including a gain from divestitures.  MAI Basic Four lost 1/2 to 4.  Chairman Bennett S. LeBow agreed to invest $30 million and provide other financing assistance through a partnership he controls in return for a 51% stake in the company.  The American Stock Exchange index gained 0.84 to 379.18, cutting its loss for the week to 0.4%.  The average share price in the latest session rose three cents.  Jan Bell Marketing gained 1 3/4 to 23 1/4.  Craig Drill Capital, a New York investment partnership, said it holds a 5.08% stake in the company.  American Healthcare Management Inc. said in Dallas that it has been informed that there is a "substantial likelihood" that Bain Capital and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets won't be able to complete their planned purchase of the company.  Last month, a U.S. bankruptcy court approved a reorganization plan for the hospital management concern calling for Bain and Merrill Lynch to pay American Healthcare creditors $210 million in cash and $10 million in preferred stock and to assume about $68 million in debt.  Creditors were to receive between 42.5 cents and 70 cents for each dollar owed by American Healthcare.  American Healthcare had hoped to complete the transaction last month.  But apparently, its operating results deteriorated, and the closing was postponed.  Last week American Healthcare said that its net income for the second quarter dropped 70% from a year ago, to $1.4 million, or 11 cents a share, after a $465,000 tax benefit, from $4.6 million, or 38 cents a share.  The year-ago quarter included a tax benefit of $1.8 million.  Revenue for the quarter rose 4.4%, to $122.4 million from $117.2 million.  An American Healthcare spokesman said that the company and creditors are to meet with Bain and Merrill Lynch this week to find out what happened to the plan and to discuss alternatives.  Deltona Corp. said Sycamore Acquisitions Corp. sweetened its bid for the company to $40 million in cash, or about $7.01 a share on a fully-diluted basis.  The new offer followed by two weeks the rejection by Deltona's board of Sycamore's $5.75-a-share cash bid, which had an indicated value of $32.2 million for the Miami-based real-estate developer's roughly 5.6 million common and common equivalent shares outstanding.  Deltona said a special committee of directors would review the sweetened bid.  The committee was appointed in June to consider future plans for the company.  The proposal by Sycamore, a private company controlled by Chicago-area investor Richard G. Fanslow, is subject to, among other things, approval by Deltona's board and shareholders.  In New York Stock Exchange trading Friday, Deltona shares closed at $4.375, unchanged.  International Business Machines Corp. said it bought a minority interest in closely held KnowledgeWare Inc. of Atlanta, which develops software that helps customers develop their own software applications.  Neither company would disclose the amount of money involved or the size of the stake IBM bought in KnowledgeWare, which had 1988 sales of more than $30 million.  IBM, Armonk, N.Y., has expressed considerable interest in so-called computer-aided software engineering tools such as those sold by KnowledgeWare.  IBM, which has been on an investment binge, said last week it bought a stake in another such developer, Bachman Information Systems Inc. of Cambridge, Mass.  The tools are important because corporate computer users are typically way behind in their software development.  And from IBM's standpoint, if customers don't have software to run on machines, then they don't need to buy more IBM hardware.  APL Corp. said it terminated its agreement to sell its Riviera Cabinet operations because the buyer wasn't able to obtain financing.  In July, the household-products maker controlled by Miami Beach financier Victor Posner said it agreed to sell the cabinet operations to Riviera Kitchens Inc. for $42 million, subject to conditions that included the buyer's assumption of certain liabilities.  The week's statistical offerings are slim but significant in light of recent, stronger-than-expected data on the economy.  Mid-August auto sales, due Wednesday, will provide another checkpoint on Detroit's effort to whittle inventories by offering incentives and setting more prudent third-quarter production levels.  Evidence on the state of manufacturing comes first from tomorrow's report on July durable goods orders.  The often-maligned indicator is subject to great swings because of the timing of exactly when orders are booked.  The July report is expected to rise, but just barely, according to MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc., New York.  In June, factory orders gained 0.4%.  Last week's reported gains in July industrial production and housing starts, plus strong exports that helped shrink the trade deficit, reinforced the belief of some economists that the nation could avoid a recession in the near term.  Those reports were "all pieces of the same picture leading me to conclude that {real gross national product} is really going to surprise us on the upside in the second half" of this year, said Stephen S. Roach, senior economist at Morgan Stanley & Co., New York.  Among other things, Mr. Roach was cheered by evidence in the June trade deficit report that there was "good momentum on the export side but also evidence that the import surge in May was an aberration and that imports are on a very subdued trajectory."  Gail Fosler, who takes over as chief economist at the New York-based Conference Board next month, is also optimistic about exports.  "I think exports are going to surprise us on the strong side," she said.  Ms. Fosler is leaving the post of chief economist, minority staff, of the U.S. Senate Budget Committee.  She succeeds Albert T. Sommers, who filled the Conference Board job on an interim basis and continues as a senior staffer.  "I guess I wouldn't be surprised to see the third and fourth quarters actually have higher growth rates than the first and second quarter," Ms. Fosler said.  Her outlook calls for GNP of about 2.5% this year -- in line with the consensus -- and 2.5% in 1990, which is stronger than the consensus view.  Of course, not everyone agrees with the rosier outlook.  For instance, David Resler, chief economist at Nomura Securities International, New York, isn't optimistic about the auto industry's fortunes in the months ahead.  "I'm watching auto sales, but I'm scratching my head at the same time over what they mean for the economy," says Mr. Resler.  He notes that while auto makers may be getting rid of inventory, they're doing so with steep discounts and still not breaking any sales records.  Meanwhile, car makers plan some fairly hefty price increases for the new models, which makes economists such as Mr. Resler wonder who Detroit thinks is going to buy all these cars.  "I'd be shocked if Detroit gets away with the price increases they're announcing," he says.  The auto industry's balancing act could show up in a lower durable goods report tomorrow, notes Charles Lieberman, managing director of financial markets research at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp., New York.  With much of the auto industry down for model changeovers and inventory corrections in July, he figures the durable goods figure may be down 1.5%.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week ended Aug. 18  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @ Money supply  @ M1 -- Week ended Aug. 7  @ (in billions) $778.7 + $3.0  @ M2 -- Week ended Aug. 7  @ (in billions) $3,132.4 + $4.9  @ M3 -- Week ended Aug. 7  @ (in billions) $4,011.3 + $6.1  @ Merchandise trade deficit  @ June (in billions) $8.17 - $1.91  @ Capacity utilization  @ July 83.6% unch.  @ Consumer price index  @ July 124.4% + 0.2%  @ Business inventories  @ June (in billions) $780.84 + 0.4%  @ Industrial production index  @ July 141.7% + 0.2%  @ Business sales  @ June (in billions) $516.43 - 0.3%  @ Housing starts  @ July, annual rate (in thousands) 1,430 + 0.8%  @ Building permits  @ July, annual rate (in thousands) 1,267 - 3.1%  @ New car sales  @ Early Aug., total vs. year ago 190,301 + 7.4%  @ New jobless claims  @ week ended Aug. 5 317,000 - 3.9%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @ Durable goods orders (Tues.)  @ July  @ Auto sales, Mid-August (Weds.)  @ Money supply (Thurs.)  @ New jobless claims (Thurs.)  The once-clubby Microelectronics & Computer Technology Corp., the nation's first private research consortium, is lowering its walls to allow virtually any North American corporation access to much of its work.  The change is expected to be announced today in Austin, signaling a major philosophical shift from the consortium's secretive early days when it was run by former Central Intelligence Agency director Adm. Bob Inman.  Along with providing increased access to its research, MCC also is placing greater emphasis on developing and deploying the technology it invents.  Stephen G. Maysonave, director of shareholder relations for MCC's Advanced Computing Technology Program, jokes that the program's early mission statement could have been summarized as "do great research."  Today, he adds, there is increased emphasis on "market relevance."  That comes as sweet music to the half-dozen ACT participants who, to date, have sunk approximately $100 million into its projects.  "This makes a lot more sense," says Roy Kuntz, director of applied research for NCR Corp., who believes that MCC erred in its early exclusivity.  Adds Walter Fredrickson, vice president of technology, information systems sector, of Harris Corp.: "This is just a recognition that there's a lot of good work going on that needs to get out.  Hey -- we're in this for the United States.  We're in it to increase productivity."  In 1982, when the Japanese announced an aggressive research effort to build a "Fifth-Generation" computer, U.S. technology companies panicked.  The Japanese, after all, had mounted come-from-behind efforts to trounce the U.S. steel, auto and consumer-electronics industries.  Now they were promising to be leaders, not followers, and they were doing so with assistance from the Japanese government.  A concerted response was needed.  MCC was that answer, its membership initially restricted to U.S. companies but later broadened to include Canadian companies.  Seven years later, MCC officials acknowledge there was an "over-reaction" to the Japanese threat, as well as "naive" expectations of how quickly the Fifth Generation could be designed.  There also have been embarrassing setbacks, including defections by some founding members and the decision last year to scrap nearly four years of development work on a computer-aided design system that didn't deliver as promised.  But MCC's members also have started chafing under the financial burden of supporting research that won't show a financial return for many years.  Shareholder membership in MCC -- a prerequisite for sharing in proprietary research -- costs $250,000 and requires participation in at least one of five research programs, at a minimum annual cost of $1.5 million.  Not surprisingly, the circle of potential participants has been severely limited.  With today's announcement, however, MCC is throwing open the doors to its largest program, the ACT Program, which encompasses a smorgasbord of information technology research.  MCC says non-shareholders now can pay annual dues of $25,000 to become associate members and then can pick and choose from among 10 or more projects within the ACT Program that they want to support.  Support costs for individual projects start at approximately $125,000 a year.  The a-la-carte approach also is being made available to MCC's shareholders.  Previously, they had to support all projects within at least one research program.  Honeywell and Motorola are among the MCC shareholders who will now participate in at least some ACT projects for the first time.  As the largest of MCC's five research efforts, eating up almost a third of its $65 million budget, ACT also is the heart of the original effort to build the Fifth Generation.  Such computers are intended to duplicate the human thought process, using "if-then" logic and learning from experience.  They would interact with their human users, asking questions to fill in gaps in knowledge and perhaps gaining additional awareness through sensors.  That, at least, has been the goal.  In practice, developing the Fifth Generation has meant a multitude of closely related research efforts moving in fits and starts and not always in step with each other.  The ACT Program now includes components as diverse as neural networks, which try to recognize patterns and predict behavior; the human interface, an "intelligent" work surface that can convert handwriting and sketches into computer data; and natural language ability, extending computer understanding to everyday English.  All are still in the development stage but already are spinning off potential applications in the same way that the lunar space program developed freeze-dried food and lightweight materials long before a human set foot on the moon.  Grant Dove, MCC chief executive, says the consortium is making an increased effort to identify such short-term spinoffs without losing sight of its long-term goal.  "Our survival is dependent on that," he says.  Seven years ago, the Japanese threat was enough to force chief executives in the U.S. to look beyond the next quarter's bottom line.  Today, with that threat apparently diminished, corporate involvement in MCC depends on more tangible rewards.  Cyprus Minerals Co., a mining concern, said it completed the purchase of the iron-ore and related assets of the former Reserve Mining Co., a failed iron-ore mining concern that closed about three years ago, for $52 million.  Cyprus said that it has begun rehabilitating the property, in northern Minnesota, and that it expects to begin production of iron-ore pellets in the first quarter of 1990.  The Reserve transaction was approved by a federal bankruptcy court.  Abitibi-Price Inc. said it reached a conditional agreement with North British Newsprint Holdings Ltd. to take over the British company's project for building a newsprint mill in Gartcosh, Scotland.  The mill would be Abitibi's first in Europe.  An Abitibi spokesman said the mill would cost about #180 million ($281 million) for construction, plus an undisclosed sum to be paid to North British Newsprint for preliminary work.  The spokesman said the agreement expires after 60 days unless certain conditions are met.  The chief conditions include winning an "appropriate level" of support, including financial support, from the British government and securing British publishers as partners in the mill.  Toronto-based Abitibi, a newsprint producer, said the mill would have capacity to produce 205,000 metric tons of newsprint annually.  Construction would begin this winter and take about two years.  Winners Corp. said shareholders approved the sale of its Mrs. Winner's restaurant division to Atlanta-based RTM Inc. for about $30 million in cash and the assumption of certain lease obligations.  Separately, the company said holders approved a change in the concern's name to Volunteer Capital Corp.  The name change is to take effect immediately after the closing of the restaurant-division sale, which is expected on or about Aug. 23, the company said.  Securities regulators are investigating a New Jersey-based telephone tip line that has been getting attention for its blend of "inside" Wall Street research, gossip and investment advice.  The tip line, Traders & Investors Alert, based in Fort Lee, N.J., is run by a 46-year-old former insurance broker and publicist, Barry K. Davis, who has run afoul of regulators in the past.  The Securities and Exchange Commission in 1971 (when Mr. Davis was known as Barry K. Sutz) barred him from the securities industry, including giving one-on-one investment advice.  In the past few weeks, comments carried by the call-in phone service, which claims nearly 2,000 subscribers, may have caused dozens of stocks to move -- including Johnson Controls Inc., Sunstrand Corp., Philip Morris Cos., Reebok International Ltd., Burnup & Sims Inc., Whitman Corp., Masstor Systems and Columbia Gas System Inc.  The service consists of recorded phone messages updated three times daily and a more-expensive beeper service for additional tips.  Critics say it could be a vehicle for stock manipulators.  Oddly, many of the people that seem to be calling the tip line are Wall Street brokers, hungry for stock tips they say aren't available from their own research departments.  The development hasn't pleased brokerage-firm officials.  Although Mr. Davis denies any improprieties, an official of the New Jersey Bureau of Securities says an investigation of him and the service is under way.  "We have put Traders & Investors on notice that they appear to be operating as an unregistered investment adviser," says Richard Barry, supervisor of enforcement with the New Jersey agency.  Meanwhile, the SEC, which is aware of the Traders & Investors line and the growing attention being given to it, declines to comment on whether it's investigating.  Mr. Davis maintains that he doesn't offer investment advice to Traders & Investors subscribers.  But it's his recorded voice telling clients a stock looks attractive or should be sold, and it's Mr. Davis on the phone speaking directly with subscribers, stockbrokers and sources on the floor of the exchanges, and using associates to relay comments to others.  Most of the information is obtained from stockbrokers who pass along research from their own firms, sometimes in exchange for free beepers or discounted subscription rates.  This has angered a number of Wall Street firms, which call it an unauthorized use of their research.  "We consider our research to be proprietary and for the use of our clients and not for this service to redisseminate and charge people money for," a spokesman for Morgan Stanley & Co. says.  He says Morgan Stanley has instructed employees "not to talk to (the service) or to disseminate information to them."  Employees who do are subject to disciplinary action, he adds.  Traders & Investors continues to quote Morgan Stanley research.  Bruce Horowitz, who describes himself as a consultant to Traders & Investors, says Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. brokers constitute the single largest block of subscribers (about 45).  He claims Shearson reimburses its brokers for the cost of the service, something a senior Shearson executive denies.  "Shearson in no way is going to step up and pay for something like this," says Hardwick Simmons, Shearson's head of retail-brokerage operations.  But Mr. Simmons says there's no policy banning the service systemwide because "we couldn't possibly enforce it."  Employees at Wall Street firms including Bear, Stearns & Co., Cowen & Co., Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co., Merrill Lynch & Co., Kidder, Peabody & Co., Oppenheimer & Co., PaineWebber Inc., Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., Salomon Brothers Inc. and Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. also appear on the Traders & Investors subscribers list, Mr. Horowitz says.  John L. Steffens, head of Merrill Lynch's brokerage operations, says of Traders & Investors: "We would have a policy against it.  We would not pay for it."  Mr. Steffens says Merrill brokers should give advice based on Merrill research and investment strategy.  "Our research has to be the basis for their recommendations," he says.  But, he adds, "we can't stop them from listening.  They can call all they want."  A Dean Witter spokesman agrees it's difficult to keep brokers from using services like Traders & Investors, but he frowns on it.  "We have no policy against our brokers making phone calls, but we strongly recommend they get their information from professionals, not pundits," the spokesman says.  "The best place to get information on the markets is from our 50 analysts.  There should be plenty of good ideas from Dean Witter."  And some traders and arbitragers say they prefer the more traditional circuit, where rumors traveled from trading desk to trading desk.  "I liked the old way because you knew who was saying what and you could judge it within a context," says one trader.  "The hotline has centralized the rumor circuit."  Boston Edison Co. said the Nuclear Regulatory Commission approved testing of the utility's Pilgrim nuclear plant in Plymouth, Mass., at levels of as much as 75% reactor power.  In June, the NRC gave Boston Edison permission to operate the plant at 50% reactor power.  The plant has been tested at increasing power output since Dec. 31, after a 32-month shutdown because of various malfunctions.  Boston Edison said that at 75% reactor power, the plant produces more than 450 megawatts of electricity.  The news that could change Richard Wigton's life could wait.  Last Wednesday, Mr. Wigton, a few pounds lighter than he was when arrested for insider trading two years ago, pumped away on the exercycle at a health club in Short Hills, N.J.  He had made himself unreachable by telephone -- even knowing that as he exercised, federal prosecutors would be phoning his lawyer, Stanley Arkin, to announce whether Mr. Wigton would be re-indicted.  Only after the rumpled and jowly 59-year-old finished his cycling, lifted a few weights and drove home in his Ford Bronco did he learn the news: The government was dropping its investigation of him and his former colleague at Kidder, Peabody & Co., Timothy Tabor.  The unflappable Mr. Wigton ate his lunch and set off for the driving range.  He still hasn't celebrated.  "The main concern I have," says the soft-spoken Mr. Wigton, in his first public comment since his ordeal began, "is people that don't know me: What do they think and feel?"  Mr. Wigton was one of the Wall Street Three, whose dramatic arrest in February 1987 symbolized the federal government's drive to root out corruption on Wall Street.  The others seemed fitting symbols for the go-go 1980s.  Robert Freeman, 46, of Goldman, Sachs & Co., was one of the country's most powerful takeover-stock speculators, or arbitragers, a fiercely aggressive man who could influence stock prices and major corporate deals with one telephone call.  Mr. Tabor, 35, an athletic Rhodes Scholar and former accountant who set his company's record for number of hours worked in a year, was the consummate Manhattan yuppie.  But if these men represented the new Wall Street, Dick Wigton represented an older, slower, more conservative Wall Street that seemed to be buried by the bull market of the '80s.  A former credit analyst who got a job on Wall Street in 1956 through a friend of his wife's father, Mr. Wigton found himself 30 years later on the same playing field with merger wizards like Bruce Wasserstein and Kidder's own Martin Siegel and with billion-dollar arbitragers like Ivan Boesky.  If someone put together "an All-American arbitrage team, would I be on it?"  Mr. Wigton muses, concluding with a shrug, "No."  That may have been something that eluded prosecutors.  Searching for a brilliant, ruthless arbitrager who systematically manipulated the stock market for his own gain, the government instead arrested "Wiggie," as his friends call him.  Prosecutors expected Mr. Wigton to cave in under the pressure of an indictment.  After all, General Electric Co., Kidder's parent, stripped him of his trading responsibilities and at one point stopped paying his salary and his legal fees.  But Mr. Wigton held out, in part, he says, because he didn't do anything wrong, and in part, because, after the initial shock, he didn't find life under a cloud to be all that bad.  In contrast to the life of almost any other successful arbitrager one could imagine in similar circumstances, Mr. Wigton's life changed little during the past two-and-a-half years.  There were no glitzy Manhattan society balls to which he could be disinvited; there was no highly leveraged mansion in the Hamptons or co-op in Trump Tower to lose.  He didn't need money, since his Kidder stock alone was worth $6 million when GE bought control of the investment bank in 1986, and he spent little of it.  He passed his time in the suburban New Jersey home he has occupied for 27 years with his wife, Cynthia, poring over stock-market research reports, trading for his own account, entertaining his three grown children, playing a couple rounds of golf a week and having dinner at the local country club.  "I'm anything but flamboyant," he allows, which seems, if anything, an understatement.  Neither was the Wall Street Mr. Wigton joined in 1956.  The only child of a telephone company manager and an interior decorator who lived on Long Island, Mr. Wigton graduated from New York's Hamilton College, worked as a trainee at Chase Manhattan bank and wrote reports for a credit bureau before getting a job as a trading assistant at Kidder.  After kicking around various Kidder trading desks, Mr. Wigton was asked in 1971 to look into the business of arbitrage, an unpopular and little-practiced field at the time.  Classical arbitragers bought securities in one market and sold in another to profit from price differences between the markets.  The arbitrage Mr. Wigton learned was somewhat different: It involved buying the securities of a company when its acquisition by another was announced, but before the market price of the securities rose to equal the acquiring company's purchase price.  Arbitragers would typically make a modest short-term profit when the takeover went through.  The merger boom of the 1980s and a new breed of arbitragers like Mr. Boesky changed all that.  Arbitragers bet heavily on tips and rumors before any deal was announced and made huge profits when they scored.  Information was everything, and successful arbs worked the telephones like concert artists on a piano.  The new arbs were flashy, sometimes charming, sometimes obnoxious, always aggressive.  Mr. Wigton struggled in this environment.  He says he found it hard to get much useful information from investment bankers.  Still, for many years he did well enough at Kidder.  He made good money, several hundred thousand dollars a year, though it was far from the millions commanded by Wall Street superstars.  Kidder chairman Ralph DeNunzio was also of the old school.  He thought of Kidder as a family, and he was suspicious of the new breed.  "We don't have to be the best," he told one rising investment banker.  But even Kidder had to be profitable.  In the mid-1980s, the firm was falling dangerously behind its rival firms.  To bolster the modestly profitable performance of the arbitrage department, Mr. Wigton began receiving investment advice from the firm's mergers chief, Mr. Siegel.  Mr. Wigton also inherited a new assistant in young Mr. Tabor, who had been working directly for Mr. DeNunzio.  While reluctant at first to take on Mr. Tabor, Mr. Wigton says the two soon became friends.  The Wigtons made one of their infrequent trips into Manhattan to attend Mr. Tabor's Christmas party, and the couple attended Mr. Tabor's wedding and rehearsal dinner. (Through his attorney, Andrew Lawler, Mr. Tabor declined to be interviewed.)  Mr. Wigton's relationship with Mr. Siegel was far different.  In his late thirties, strikingly handsome and one of the smoothest talking strategists on Wall Street, Mr. Siegel was idolized by many at Kidder, including Mr. Wigton.  "He was brilliant," he says.  "The fact that he was helping us -- I couldn't believe my good luck.  I respected, almost worshipped the guy."  Suddenly the performance of Kidder's arbitrage department soared.  Mr. Wigton concedes that he and Mr. Tabor made bigger bets when they got advice from Mr. Siegel, but he says he never suspected that Mr. Siegel was illegally passing on inside information.  Just what Mr. Siegel has said to prosecutors about his dealings with Mr. Wigton isn't known.  However, people familiar with the investigation say he never explicitly identified the source of his information to Mr. Wigton.  Nonetheless, prosecutors found it hard to believe that given the timing and pattern of Kidder's trading in Goldman Sachs deals, that a man of Mr. Wigton's experience wouldn't have known inside information was a factor.  Mr. Siegel's attorney, Jed Rakoff, won't discuss Mr. Siegel's testimony, and the U.S. Attorney's office has declined to discuss Mr. Siegel's disclosures other than to say they are satisfied he told the truth.  On the morning of Feb. 12, 1987, the stock market was active and Mr. Wigton was busy in his office off the Kidder trading floor when a receptionist told him that a Mr. Moreno was in the reception area asking to see him.  This was no time to entertain job applicants off the street, Mr. Wigton thought to himself, so he asked the receptionist to politely decline.  "He insists: no ifs ands or buts," the woman responded.  When Mr. Wigton arrived in the reception area, he was met by two postal inspectors who told him that he was under arrest.  Mr. Wigton says he was so stunned he could neither speak nor move.  One of the agents grabbed him, threw him against a wall and frisked him before cuffing his hands behind his back.  Then Mr. Wigton was paraded to his office through the trading floor as his shocked Kidder colleagues looked on.  Kidder's president at the time, John Roche, rushed to the scene and called Kidder's lawyers at Sullivan & Cromwell.  Mr. Roche then telephoned Cynthia Wigton with the news.  "Will he be home for dinner?" she asked.  Only after being arraigned and fingerprinted did Mr. Wigton learn from his attorney that he was being charged with insider trading and that the information that led to his arrest had come from his hero, Mr. Siegel.  The involvement of Mr. Siegel in the investigation hadn't yet been publicly disclosed.  "I was angry, disbelieving," Mr. Wigton recalls.  Later, at the offices of Sullivan & Cromwell, Mr. Wigton was introduced for the first time to Bob Freeman, the kind of high-powered trader who had never had time for Mr. Wigton's calls.  "Hello," Mr. Wigton said.  "Hi, how are you?" answered Mr. Freeman.  In what he describes as a reflex action, Mr. Wigton went back to his office, where he was greeted with cheers from the Kidder trading desk.  That evening at 5:45, just as they did every day, he and the other two members of his car pool headed home to New Jersey.  They didn't discuss the day's events.  Mr. Wigton tossed and turned in bed all night, wondering, he recalls, "My God, why has this happened to me?"  The next morning, he surrendered his passport and the deed to his home.  Mr. Arkin, his attorney, told him to prepare for a long ordeal.  Neither man anticipated just how long it would be.  From the outset, Mr. Wigton tried his best to maintain business as usual.  He continued to hold his posts as head of arbitrage and over-the-counter trading at Kidder.  The night after his arrest, he and his wife had dinner at the Baltusrol Golf Club.  At least six other members came to his table, shook his hand and told him they believed in him.  But on April 9, 1987, Messrs.  Wigton, Tabor and Freeman were indicted for insider trading.  Mr. Tabor was unemployed, having been dismissed earlier by his latest employer, Merrill Lynch & Co. Mr. Freeman retained his job at Goldman Sachs, which paid his legal expenses, although he has acknowledged that the pressure of the investigation effectively kept him from taking part in the firm's business.  That day, Mr. Wigton recalls, one of his Kidder superiors called him up to the executive floor: "We've been told by the people up in Fairfield {GE's headquarters} that it would not be fitting for you to be sitting on the trading desk and running the trading department," Mr. Wigton says he was told.  He was moved to an empty office on the executive floor; he was also told that the firm wouldn't pick up his legal expenses or pay his salary any longer.  "I was hurt," he says.  "Why was I being treated differently" from Bob Freeman?  Shortly thereafter, Mr. Wigton was moved again, this time to another office building where Kidder maintained a retail branch.  There, isolated from the mainstream of the firm, he settled into a routine, coming in about once a week, spending most of his time at home working on his defense, trading stocks for his own account -- successfully, he says -- and answering mail, generally from well-wishers.  One letter to the contrary stands out: A woman from Texas who didn't know him asked, "How could you have done such a thing?"  Mr. Wigton didn't reply.  In May 1987, Kidder itself settled the case against it stemming from Mr. Siegel's admission that he helped the firm earn money through insider trading; Kidder paid a $25.3 million fine, and Messrs.  DeNunzio and Roche were forced out.  The settlement with the government was negotiated by GE, which was determined to avoid a criminal indictment of its subsidiary.  As part of its effort to curry favor with prosecutors, however, GE suddenly got tough with Mr. Wigton.  It told his attorney, Mr. Arkin, that if Mr. Wigton was guilty, he should plead guilty.  If he fought and lost, GE told him, Mr. Wigton risked being sued by GE to recover the $3 million it had paid him for his Kidder stock and having GE withhold the additional $3 million it still owed him.  After hearing this, Mr. Arkin says he stormed out of a GE lawyer's office.  "It was petty, inhumane and mean spirited," says Mr. Arkin.  "I think GE treated Mr. Wigton badly."  GE officials couldn't be reached for comment.  A Kidder spokesman said, "Since the indictment was dropped Mr. Wigton's legal fees and his salary have been paid by Kidder, and this was done with GE's concurrence."  GE wasn't the only one applying pressure.  On three occasions, Mr. Arkin says, he encountered government prosecutors who, he asserts, said such things as, "You really should bring him in: We've really got him."  Mr. Wigton says he heard from another person that Mr. Tabor had been offered a light sentence if he would agree to testify against Mr. Wigton and Kidder chairman DeNunzio, who was never charged with wrongdoing.  Mr. Lawler, attorney for Mr. Tabor, couldn't be reached yesterday.  Such tactics can subject defendants to excruciating pressure as they fear others might turn against them, but Mr. Wigton says he was unfazed.  Not long before the Kidder settlement, when a federal judge denied a government request for more time, prosecutors dropped the charges against the three individuals.  The government said it planned to bring an even broader indictment against them in the near future.  Still, GE resumed paying Mr. Wigton's legal bills and salary.  In the summer of 1987, Mr. Wigton spent three days with prosecutors in their offices at Foley Square to try to convince them of his innocence.  Mr. Arkin says his client also passed a polygraph examination, and returned for an additional day when the criminal division of the U.S. Attorney's office got a new head.  Mr. Wigton says the prosecutors, for their part, "always acted very professionally" toward him.  After their meeting in September 1987, neither Mr. Wigton nor his attorney heard from the prosecutors again until last week.  As time went on, Mr. Wigton says, his confidence grew, yet he remained in a frustrating limbo, concealing his anger.  Kidder wouldn't let him return from his paid leave of absence, and he couldn't get another job on the Street.  He says he never considered what it would be like to go to prison, and "I never considered giving up."  Early last Wednesday morning, U.S. Attorney Benito Romano informed Mr. Arkin that the Wigton investigation was over.  Mr. Arkin spoke to Mr. Romano about a press conference that the prosecutor would hold, and asked, "Can you say something nice about Dick?"  Mr. Romano said there would be no vindication and no apology.  "We're just doing our job, Stanley," Mr. Arkin recalls him as saying.  Now Mr. Wigton says he remains bitter about the workings of the criminal justice system in his case.  "It's wrong," he says.  "The system is wrong that can let something like this drag out" for two-and-a-half years.  Of former U.S. Attorney and now New York City mayoral candidate Rudolph Giuliani, who authorized Mr. Wigton's arrest, he says, "I hear he has said he regrets the arrest, but that wasn't on the front page.  I was on the front page."  As for his former hero, Mr. Siegel, Mr. Wigton says, "I think I would handle" a meeting with Mr. Siegel "very badly.  I would probably turn my back and walk away."  Mr. Rakoff says Mr. Siegel always liked Mr. Wigton and was saddened by his arrest.  This morning, Mr. Wigton will appear at Kidder, Peabody to ask to be put to work.  Kidder has been wracked by defections over the past few years, as young investment bankers and traders have complained of everything from skimpy bonuses to incompetent leadership and the excessive dominance of General Electric.  In Mr. Wigton's absence, Kidder has become very much a part of the new Wall Street.  But for Mr. Wigton, Kidder is still family.  He says everyone at Kidder -- as opposed to GE -- was very supportive throughout his ordeal.  He still refers to the firm as "we" and he recently paid his own way to a Kidder function in Chicago honoring the 20th anniversary of the head of Kidder's office there.  "It's hard to put 31 years behind you," he says.  Kidder "was a nifty place to work."  Brazil has ended a debt payment slowdown and repaid $812 million in overdue interest to European government lenders, the finance ministry said Friday.  Finance Minister Mailson da Nobrega said the government this week paid the last installment on its debt to the Paris Club, which originally was due June 30.  Mr. da Nobrega reiterated that Brazil is not considering declaring a new moratorium on payments of its $112 billion debt.  He said the government is making "a great effort to keep its economy under control, and we want to avoid confrontation as a way of solving problems."  In June, the government restricted dollar remissions abroad to avoid a critical drop in its cash reserves.  Economists estimate that capital flight from Brazil will reach a record $12 billion this year.  Mr. da Nobrega said reserves have recovered and the government will meet its debt payments, "as long as (reserves) remain above a safe level."  The government puts the minimum safe level at about $6 billion, equal to four months of imports.  "We have talked with our creditors to explain that the delay in payment is not a political measure but rather a necessity to prevent disorganization in the economy.  It benefits us and also them," Mr. da Nobrega said.  Lockheed makes some of the most sophisticated reconnaissance satellites in the world, able to detect an intruder's slightest move.  Now, if only it could figure out what Harold Simmons is up to.  The corporate raider from Dallas has insisted time and again that his accumulation of Lockheed shares is innocuous.  "It's a long-term situation," he says.  "One of Lockheed's attractions is its current management."  Still, the managers must be a tad uneasy.  Just three weeks ago, Mr. Simmons increased his stake to 9.46% of Lockheed, an aerospace behemoth.  He has said that Valhi, his holding company, could easily pay $2 billion for any concern that catches his eye.  Lockheed has to be worried that "where there's smoke, there's fire," asserts John A. Boughton, vice president of United Research, a management consulting firm that has done work for Lockheed.  Steven Binder, a Bear Stearns analyst, says: "Simmons has been very aggressive since mid-May.  He could be trying to put them {Lockheed} into play."  But Lockheed would probably resist.  And there are signs it is planning to swallow another company -- a move that would serve both offensive and defensive aims -- before anyone tries to consume it.  Lockheed is believed, for example, to be one of several companies that have expressed interest in bidding for North American Philips's Magnavox electronics unit.  And Lockheed Chairman Daniel Tellep is said to have been busy at the Paris Air Show in June, perhaps trying to lay groundwork for the purchase of a European aerospace concern.  The company declines to comment.  But it reacted quickly to Mr. Simmons's actions, setting up a $500 million employee stock ownership plan the day after the investor disclosed an initial 5.3% holding.  The ESOP, begun in early April and designed to control 17% of the company, led Mr. Simmons to unload 200,000 Lockheed shares.  But he since has gobbled them up again, and Mr. Binder concludes, "It has become obvious that the company's first avenue of defense did not totally work."  Actually, however, it isn't Mr. Simmons that analysts see as Lockheed's ultimate threat.  Asset-stripping could be difficult at Lockheed, where many businesses overlap.  Analysts cite Mr. Simmons's aversion to highly leveraged deals and note that he has several other interests, including stakes in Chrysler, Inland Steel, Paccar and Phelps Dodge.  Last Friday, Georgia Gulf shares rose 3 1/2 to 54 1/2 after Mr. Simmons disclosed that he might seek control.  The crucial question is whether Mr. Simmons could trigger a bidding war for Lockheed, prompting the company to beckon a friendly suitor.  It is generally considered bad form in the defense industry for one contractor to go after another.  "Lockheed would have to say, 'I'm for sale,' and pick its parent," David Smith of Raymond James & Associates says.  "The whole question is whether Simmons can start the process."  Most analysts put Lockheed's breakup value at about $80 a share.  But it could go higher, depending on the suitor.  The shares closed Friday at 50.  "What's a Lockheed worth to a Ford Motor, Boeing or Rockwell International?"  Mr. Smith says.  "I couldn't even put a number on it."  Lockheed has outpaced the Standard & Poor's aerospace index in the past decade, and appears certain to survive the defense industry's shake-out.  It does face some short-term negatives, such as this year's winding down of the C-5B transport and P3 anti-submarine aircraft programs; completion of the F-117A Stealth fighter line in 1990; and a high level of deferred income taxes.  But Lockheed is involved in a number of big, cash-generating Pentagon and space administration projects.  Its crown jewel is its Missiles & Space sector, which accounted for 58% of 1988 profit and has a return on investment exceeding 25% (though there are design problems with the Trident II ballistic missile).  Mr. Simmons says he is keenly aware of the promise in Lockheed's stock.  While anticipating price weakness and low earnings for the next year or two, he says, "I'm hoping to make some real good money on it one day."  For now, he says he is content to keep his holdings steady, complaining that the stock has climbed too far.  "I've never paid over 49 for it," he says.  "It should be trading in the low 40s."  His goal mystifies the Street.  "Nobody I know of, including friends at the company, understands why he's doing this," says Joseph Campbell, an investment banker and aerospace analyst at PaineWebber.  Maybe, just maybe, he suggests, "Yesterday's old raiders really are tomorrow's long-term investors."  ---  Lockheed  (NYSE; Symbol: LK)  Business: Defense, electronics  Year ended Dec. 25, 1988:  Sales: $10.59 billion  Net income: $624 million*; or $10.37 a share  Second quarter, June 25, 1989:  Per-share earnings: $1.20 vs. $1.77  Average daily trading volume:  197,891 shares  Common shares outstanding: 59.5 million  *Includes $182 million income from discontinued operations.  An agreement among Japanese semiconductor makers to set minimum prices on memory chips exported to the European Community may help the EC better manage a market that is highly vulnerable to gluts and price wars.  According to industry sources, 11 Japanese chip makers agreed on Friday to meet EC demands for, among other things, price floors on dynamic random-access memory chips, or DRAMs, which had been the subject of a two-year dumping investigation.  Industry officials said the companies that agreed to set floor prices include the six that have been under investigation by the EC: Fujitsu Ltd., Hitachi Ltd., Mitsubishi Electric Corp., NEC Corp., Toshiba Corp. and the Japanese subsidiary of Texas Instruments Inc. of the U.S.  The officials said the other five companies are Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., Sharp Corp., Sanyo Electric Co., Minebea Co. and Oki Electric Industry Co.  The concession is a relatively painless one, analysts said.  Demand in Europe still outpaces supply, and market prices for most types of chips are high enough that the agreement won't force any of the makers to increase prices.  In addition, the five-year accord promises to remove steep dumping duties assessed on the Japanese exporters for selling their chips in Europe at prices lower than in Japan.  Consequently, it will resolve a dispute that has sorely strained relations between Japan and the EC.  The analysts said the EC gains by obtaining considerable rights to inspect Japanese manufacturers' plants and records.  That point may be more important to the community than the price issue, they said, because it enhances the prospects for better management of the EC chip market.  The Japanese chip makers agreed to set prices for DRAMs at a level slightly more than 8% above the average cost of production, weighted for each Japanese maker's output.  So long as makers keep prices above the floor, they will face no dumping duties.  In Brussels, an EC spokesman said the 12-nation community hadn't been officially notified of the agreement.  He said, however, that the accord appears to be in line with what has been discussed between EC and Japanese officials.  The agreement is similar to one reached between Japan and the U.S. in 1986.  That bilateral accord has received mixed reviews.  The effect, many industry observers have said, has been to hurt American electronics companies that buy DRAMs, and to boost profits for the Japanese.  Some analysts said the European agreement could have a similar impact.  But it also could ease the entry of U.S. semiconductors into the EC. American officials believe that the EC would withdraw certain potential barriers against all imported chips if it was satisfied that Japan no longer engages in dumping.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Edgcomb Metals Co. -- $138.5 million face amount of senior subordinated notes due Aug. 15, 1999, priced late Thursday at 79.47 with an initial coupon of 9%.  The coupon will remain at 9% through Aug. 15, 1994, and then will be increased to 15%.  Rated single-B-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Bonneville Pacific Corp. -- $55 million of 7 3/4% convertible subordinated debentures due Aug. 15, 2009, priced late Thursday at par.  The debentures are convertible into common at $11.59 a share, representing an 18.9% conversion premium.  The issue size was increased from $40 million because of to strong demand.  The debentures are noncallable for three years.  Rated single-B-2 by Moody's and single-B-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Kidder Peabody & Co.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 12 classes by Morgan Stanley & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-61, backed by Fannie Mae 9% 15-year mortgage securities, brings the agency's 1989 Remic issuance to $22.1 billion and its total issuance to $34.2 billion since the program began in April 1987.  No prices or yields were immediately available from the underwriter.  The collateral has an underlying weighted average coupon rate of 9.60% and weighted average remaining term to maturity of 14.2 years.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $325 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 11 classes by Kidder, Peabody & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-60 is backed by Fannie Mae 10% securities.  For classes on which details were available from the underwriter, yields range from 9.18%, or 100 basis points above four-year Treasury securities, to 10.52%, or 225 basis points above 20-year Treasurys.  The collateral has an underlying weighted average coupon rate of 10.70% and weighted average remaining term to maturity of 29.25 years.  Prudential-Bache Secured Finance -- $115 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in five classes by Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  The offering, Series 1989-3, is backed by premium-coupon whole loans originated before the interest-rate declines of recent months.  For classes on which details were available from the underwriter, yields range from 9.48%, or 125 basis points above two-year Treasury securities, to 10.77%, or 250 basis points above 20-year Treasurys.  Collateral consists of mortgage securities backed by whole loans with an underlying weighted average coupon rate of 11.60% and weighted average remaining term to maturity of 29.75 years.  The issue is rated double-A-2 by Moody's based on the senior/subordinated structure of the underlying mortgage securities.  @ EUROBONDS  There were no major Eurobond issues offered Friday.  AN INSURANCE INDUSTRY and defense lawyer nightmare is coming true.  Hedonic damages are spreading.  Pushed by a handful of imaginative plaintiff lawyers and expert witnesses-for-hire, hedonic damages are sought in personal-injury and wrongful-death cases as compensation for the loss of the pleasure of living.  Traditionally, payment in such cases is based on what the victim might have earned in the future.  Plaintiff attorneys began pressing for hedonic damages several years ago, and in a few cases won huge jury awards.  Despite fierce opposition by defense lawyers, the idea is quickly gaining acceptance, according to a forthcoming study by Ted Miller, an economist at the Urban Institute, a Washington, D.C., think tank.  Courts in Connecticut, Mississippi, New Mexico and New York had accepted hedonic damages as of early July, Mr. Miller writes in an article to be published this fall in the Northwestern University Law Review.  Lawyers have tried, with varying degrees of success, to introduce hedonic damages in cases in 27 additional states, he writes.  The increasing use of hedonic damages was reported in this newspaper in December.  Defense lawyers condemn hedonic damages as based on speculative economic studies that invite juries to make multimillion-dollar awards to the estates of accident victims or to their families.  But Mr. Miller argues that the legal system is far behind economic thinking, which for 20 years has held that life is worth more than a paycheck.  Many recent economic studies that estimate the value of life rely on extrapolations from the small amounts people regularly pay to reduce health risks.  A hypothetical example: Consumers might be willing to pay $1,000 extra for a brand of car equipped with additional safety devices that increase the chances of saving the driver's life in one accident out of 1,000.  Buying this brand of car implies a value of life equal to $1,000 divided by 0.001, or $1 million. (The actual studies are vastly more complicated.)  Plaintiff lawyers are hiring economists to testify that such studies are widely accepted among academics and are used routinely by government agencies that do cost-benefit analysis of health regulations.  When properly fine-tuned, hedonic damages yield a value between $1 million and $1.5 million for someone 38 years old, according to the economist.  The problem, he warns, is that plaintiff lawyers will make mistakes in their math, "and these are likely to result in some overly high awards."  His advice for defense lawyers and the insurance companies that typically foot the bills?  Accept hedonic damages as a legitimate measure, but learn to fight for its proper application.  In the long run, Mr. Miller forecasts, hedonic damages "could make awards more predictable."  What's more, he expects that the new measure ultimately won't yield awards significantly higher than the current average in death cases of about $1 million.  Mr. Miller and the Urban Institute are preparing to sell their services as consultants to insurance companies that want to prepare for the looming battles over hedonic damages.  ---  LEGAL PEOPLE: U.S. Sen. Dale Bumpers of Arkansas is losing his chief counsel and legislative director, William L. Massey, to the Chicago-based law firm of Mayer, Brown & Platt.  Mr. Massey, 40 years old, will be of counsel in the firm's Washington, D.C., office beginning Sept. 5.  He has been on Sen. Bumpers's staff since 1980. . . .  Two financial services specialists, Richard W. Grant and Peter York Solmssen, will join the Philadelphia law firm of Morgan, Lewis & Bockius as partners.  Mr. Grant, 43, and Mr. Solmssen, 34, previously were partners at the Philadelphia firm of Ballard, Spahr, Andrews & Ingersoll. . . .  T. Raymond Williams, a specialist in representing the alcohol beverage industry, has joined the Washington office of Chicago-based McDermott, Will & Emery as counsel.  Mr. Williams, 48, previously was a partner at the Washington firm of Buchman, O'Brien & Williams.  The New York Stock Exchange recently listed shares of one initially offered stock and will add shares of two other companies when they move from the over-the-counter market later this week.  Grace Energy Corp. started trading shares with the symbol GEG. Grace Energy is a Dallas-based energy holding company that provides services and equipment to the petroleum industry.  W.R. Grace & Co., New York, which took Grace Energy public, owns 84.7%.  CUC International Inc., Stamford, Conn., will move to the Big Board from the OTC market later this week and trade with the symbol CU.  The company makes computerized merchandising and travel systems.  Wheelabrator Technologies Inc., Danvers, Mass., will also move from the OTC market and trade with the symbol WTI.  It develops waste-to-energy facilities.  The American Stock Exchange said one stock started trading last week and two others will join the exchange this week.  Harlyn Products Inc., Los Angeles, started trading with the symbol HRN.  It is a maker of made-to-order jewelry.  It had traded over the counter.  Superior Teletec Inc., an Atlanta telecommunications products company, will trade shares with the symbol STT.  The company, which changed its name from Superior Holding Corp., has traded over the counter.  Peoples Bancorp., a Rocky Mount, N.C. multibank holding company, will trade with the symbol PBK.  In addition it will trade convertible, subordinated debentures with the symbol PBK.A.  The National Market System of Nasdaq's over-the-counter market listed shares of two companies.  BizMart Inc., Arlington, Texas, started trading shares with the symbol BZMT.  The company operates office products retail outlets.  Heritage Bankcorp Inc., a Taylor, Mich., bank holding company, started trading with the symbol HEBC.  Also, the Pacific Stock Exchange listed put and call options on the common stock of SmithKline Beecham PLC, a London-based healthcare products company recently formed by the merger of Philadephia-based SmithKline Beckman Corp. and Beecham Group PLC of London.  Options represent a right, but not an obligation, to buy or sell a security within a predetermined time at a set price.  Business leaders are sharply divided over bills that would require companies to provide unpaid leave to all employees for care of their family members, a new analysis of the issue says.  Bills in the House and Senate have passed committee and are ready for floor debate when Congress resumes, the Work and Family Center of the Conference Board said.  The Conference Board, which funded the study, is a nonprofit industry-supported group based in New York.  An employee could take off 10 weeks without pay to care for a newborn or ill child or an ailing parent, according to both House and Senate versions.  A business would be forced to guarantee an employee's position during the period.  Thirty-two state legislatures have taken up similar bills, and laws have been enacted in nine states, the Conference Board said.  All workers at companies with at least 20 employees would be covered by the Senate version, and companies with 50 employees by the House bill.  The Conference Board says about 50% of the U.S. work force is employed at companies with 20 or more employees.  Proponents of the measures insist family leave is a "minimum labor standard" and legislation is the only way to guarantee the right is upheld.  But many companies and business organizations oppose government intrusion into an issue they consider strictly a business decision.  A law they say, also cuts into their flexibility in providing benefits.  In addition, opponents argue, smaller companies would be unduly hurt.  The U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics says about 33% of workers at medium and large companies have unpaid maternity leave as a benefit, while about 16% have unpaid paternity leave available.  About 2% have paid maternity leave and 1% have paid paternity leave.  About 60% of companies surveyed, according to the Conference Board study, already have at least an 11-week leave program for mothers of newborns.  At least one big company provides up to three years time off, with certain conditions.  Costs of the programs are an important consideration, both sides agree.  Supporters believe a company's short-term, out-of-pocket expenses are dwarfed by the costs of high turnover if the benefits weren't offered.  Some companies say they would be forced to cut back on other benefits, such as those for retirees, if compelled to provide the leave and job guarantees.  In addition to the other provisions in the bills, the House version provides leave allowances of up to 15 weeks for an employee's own serious illness, while the Senate would limit that to 13 weeks.  The board says it is too early to tell whether a measure will be passed in the 101st Congress.  "Proponents will keep introducing bills until there is some type of resolution," guesses Arlene Johnson, a spokeswoman for the board.  Everyone agrees "This is not about whether families should honor their responsibilities," she says, but rather, "How do you reconcile the needs of businesses and families and society?"  The following issue was recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Ashland Oil Inc., shelf offering for up to an additional $100 million in medium-term notes.  Ashland had previously filed a shelf registration statement for $200 million in medium-term notes of which about $130 million have been sold.  The remaining $170 million may be offered as a separate series of senior debt.  Via First Boston Corp. and Salomon Brothers Inc.  The oil concern said net proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes.  Southmark Corp. said it again amended the bylaws of National Heritage Inc. and said it intends to seek proxies or shareholder consents to replace National Heritage's board.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Southmark said it will propose a slate of six directors for National Heritage's board to shareholders.  To replace the board, it said it may solicit proxies at National Heritage's shareholders meeting Aug. 31, solicit consents from shareholders or both.  Southmark also said it will ask shareholders to amend National Heritage's bylaws to eliminate a staggered board.  Although Southmark and a unit own 62.5% of National Heritage, the two companies have been at odds for several months.  National Heritage, a nursing-home and retirement-center management concern, has tried to restructure by spinning off its two business units and says it wants to distance itself from Southmark's problems.  Southmark, a troubled real estate and thrift concern that is operating under bankruptcy-law protection, has said it is concerned about National Heritage's actions and wants to take control of it.  In its filing, Southmark said it gave shareholder consents to National Heritage calling for National Heritage to postpone the spinoff of its two operating units until 1990.  At least one of the spinoffs is planned for September.  Previously, Southmark solicited a majority of shareholder consents to amend National Heritage's bylaws so that spinoffs couldn't take place.  National Heritage has challenged that consent action in court.  "We trying to do things in several different ways" to stop the restructuring, a Southmark spokeswoman said.  Southmark also said it will nominate George Brown IV, Arthur L. Crowe, John R. McDonough, T. Leigh Sanders Jr., Hugh C. Shurtleff and James A. Verbrugge as directors for National Heritage's board.  All the nominees except Mr. McDonough, an officer of a Southmark subsidiary, and Mr. Sanders, an Atlanta consultant, are currently members of Southmark's board.  A National Heritage spokeswoman said she hadn't seen the SEC filing but said the company is aware of Southmark's proxy solicitation efforts.  VF Corp. said it will purchase 10 million, or about 14.7%, of its 68.2 million common shares outstanding at $38 a share in its Dutch auction cash self-tender offer.  In the Dutch auction, VF accepted tenders at $35 to $39 a share.  The company settled on $38 as the highest price at which holders could tender shares.  Based on a preliminary count, about 11.1 million shares were tendered at $38 or less, including 3,800 shares tendered by eligible odd-lot holders.  The apparel concern accepted all shares at this price by odd-lot holders.  Banner Industries Inc. said its merger with Fairchild Industries Inc. was effective Friday.  As a result, each remaining publicly held share of Fairchild's common stock has been converted into the right to receive $18 in cash.  Banner, which supplies replacement parts to the aerospace industry, offered $400 million, or $18 a share, for Fairchild.  Fairchild, based in Chantilly, Va., is involved in a variety of businesses, including space and defense electronics.  Hilb, Rogal & Hamilton Co. said it agreed in principle to merge with Grinnan, Harris, Tabb & Co., an independent insurance agency also based in Richmond.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The insurance concern said the merger of Grinnan Harris into one of its Richmond subsidiaries will be completed around Sept. 1, assuming approval by both companies.  Registered common shares of Hilb Rogal will be issued in the transaction.  Craig Drill Capital L.P., a New York investment partnership, said it holds 5.08% of the common shares outstanding of Jan Bell Marketing Inc., a jewelry concern.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Craig Drill said it holds 982,200 Jan Bell shares, including net purchases of 314,850 from June 13 to July 13 for $16.88 to $18.30 a share.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Jan Bell shares closed at $21.25, up $1.75.  The filing said Craig Drill acquired the stock in the ordinary course of business.  Jan Bell's treasurer, David Boudreau, said of the Craig Drill stake, "From what we know, it's for investment purposes."  Canadian bankruptcies totaled 2,573 in July, up 7.5% from 2,393 a year earlier, the federal Consumer and Corporate Affairs Department said.  Last month's bankruptcies included 2,009 by individuals and 564 by businesses.  For this year through July, bankruptcies totaled 20,747, a 6.3% increase from 19,523 a year earlier.  Johnson & Johnson, Chiron Corp. and Abbott Laboratories said they formed an alliance in several medical diagnostic fields.  Among other things, the firms-makers of pharmaceutical and diagnostic goods have agreed to collaborate in developing and supplying the first hepatitis C diagnostic products for blood banks, hospitals and laboratories.  After years of circling the movie business here, a giant Japanese corporation has finally made a move, and it's not Sony Corp.  Newly formed JVC Entertainment Inc., a unit of JVC/Victor Co. of Japan Ltd., said it will form a joint venture with Hollywood producer Lawrence Gordon to develop, produce and finance motion pictures.  JVC/Victor is 50% owned by Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., a Sony rival.  Mr. Gordon said the initial investment would be "well in excess of $100 million" with more capital infusions scheduled, but wouldn't provide further details on the financing.  JVC/Victor thus dips a toe into film-making waters rather than taking the plunge of buying a major studio.  Sony nibbled at MGM/UA Communications Co. recently, and reportedly has been interested in Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc.; MCA Inc., which owns Universal Pictures, has been linked to Japanese suitors in the past.  The new company, Largo Entertainment, won't truly be a new studio because it won't distribute its own movies, instead depending on major studio distribution on a film-by-film basis.  JVC/Victor also won't be getting a film library in the deal.  "If they don't have distribution, they're still playing in the minor leagues," said entertainment analyst Harold L. Vogel of Merrill Lynch & Co.  "By taking this half-step they'll learn the business, but they'll still be far from the center of it.  The significance is that this is someone with substantial financial resources which can be sustained for a long period."  JVC/Victor revenue last year was $6.2 billion.  The company is best-known for developing the VHS video format, but is a major consumer electronics manufacturer.  Japanese hardware manufacturers have long been interested in entering the software business.  Sony bought CBS Records in 1987.  Mr. Gordon, 53, is a former president of what is now Fox Inc. who got his start as a television producer.  He has become one of Hollywood's most successful producers, recently producing "Field of Dreams" for Universal and "Die Hard" for News Corp. Ltd.'s Fox.  Mr. Gordon will own half of Largo.  He is just coming off a non-exclusive production deal with Fox, and given his track record of late he could have signed a rich agreement with any of a number of major studios.  "But that way, there are two things I wouldn't have," said Mr. Gordon.  "I wouldn't get to say 'yes' to movies, and I wouldn't have been an owner."  Mr. Gordon, who will be chairman and chief executive officer of Largo, said he hopes to produce six films a year when the company is up and running, with a first release ready for late next year.  He said the company would aim for "good films that obviously would play well on a world-wide basis."  In a statement, JVC/Victor senior managing director Seiichiro Niwa said, "We are pleased to be introduced to American film-making through the eyes and ears of Mr. Gordon."  Largo said it plans to expand into all areas of the entertainment business.  A group including Sequoia Partners L.P., a New York investment partnership, said it increased its stake in Counsellors Tandem Securities Fund Inc. to 13.4% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the group said it holds 650,800 Counsellors Tandem common shares, including 50,100 shares bought by group member South Pacific Land Investments Corp. of Monaco on Aug. 16 and 17 for $10.25 to $10.375 each.  As reported, the group has said it may consider seeking the conversion of Counsellors to an open-end mutual fund, influencing the fund's management, or seeking control of the fund for the purpose of merging, selling or liquidating its assets.  Counsellors is based in New York.  Maxxam Inc.'s KaiserTech Ltd. unit completed its spinoff of its Filtrol Corp. unit to Dutch chemical giant Akzo N.V. Terms weren't disclosed.  Filtrol, of Brea, Calif., makes fluid-cracking catalysts used by petroleum refiners in processsing crude oil.  KaiserTech, the holding company for Kaiser Aluminum & Chemical Corp., had been trying to sell Filtrol since 1987.  Maxxam is engaged in forest products operations, aluminum production and real estate management and development.  The Treasury plans to raise $50 million in new cash Thursday by selling about $9.25 billion in 52-week bills and redeeming $9.21 billion in maturing bills.  The bills will be dated Aug. 31 and will mature Aug. 30, 1990.  They will be available in minimum denominations of $10,000.  Bids must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Thursday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  British Airways, in its apparent bid for a stake in UAL Corp., is following a strategy of expansion abroad while trying to strengthen its position at home.  In seeking a stake in a U.S. carrier, British Airways is one of many European airlines that have recently invested in American companies.  KLM Royal Dutch Airlines set the tone by taking a stake in an investor group buying NWA Inc., parent of Northwest Airlines.  Swissair then agreed to buy 5% of Delta Air Lines.  Now British Airways apparently is bidding, perhaps with partners, for up to 25% of UAL, owner of United Airlines.  British Airways declined to comment on its intentions toward UAL.  But it already has extensive knowledge of United Airlines as a result of a joint marketing pact completed in December 1987.  The British airline has been aggressively moving in recent months to consolidate its position in the United Kingdom, to expand in Europe, to dominate computer booking systems and to find partners abroad.  British Airways bought No. 2 U.K. carrier British Caledonian Airways in December 1987.  It also bought -- together with KLM Royal Dutch Airlines, Alitalia and Swissair -- 50% of United's Covia Corp. computer reservations unit called Apollo.  The four European carriers are among the leading shareholders of a big European computer reservations company called Galileo, which in May plucked United's chief of planning and marketing, John R. Zeeman, to be its chief executive.  More recently, British Airways has been negotiating to buy 20% of Sabena World Airlines, the air transport subsidiary of Belgian's Sabena airlines group.  KLM is also negotiating for 20% of the Sabena unit.  British Airways has several important strengths when judged against European competitors.  First, it is Europe's largest airline outside the Soviet Union, with 22.5 million passengers last year.  It controls London's Heathrow Airport, the busiest international airport in the world.  Through its ownership of British Caledonian, the carrier also has considerable say at London's second-largest airport, Gatwick.  Moreover, British Airways has been taken public by the U.K., slimmed down, reinvigorated by new management and given a facelift.  It's even introduced a touch of U.S.-style marketing to the European aviation field.  Late last year, British Airways introduced its answer to frequent-flier plans.  In its Air Miles frequent-buyer plan, shoppers who accumulate points at participating U.K. retailers are rewarded with mileage toward free tickets.  The carrier says the program is very popular.  Britain's retail price index rose 0.1% in July from June and was up 8.2% from a year earlier, the Department of Employment said Friday.  The department said the July index stood at 115.5, with January 1987 equaling 100.  Economists had predicted the year-to-year rise in the July index would be unchanged from June's 8.3%.  Aristech Chemical Corp. said it has terminated discussions with a group of potential buyers of its dibasics and alcohols, unsaturated polyester resins and plasticizers business group.  It wouldn't identify the potential purchasers.  The chemical producer said talks didn't "produce an acceptable agreement providing what it considers fair value for these assets."  Aristech announced in June that it was exploring sale of those assets, which have been estimated to represent about 25% of its $1.07 billion in revenue, saying those businesses weren't considered strategic to long-term plans.  Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd., said the Delaware Court of Chancery will begin hearing their suit against Dunkin' Donuts Inc. Sept. 11.  As previously reported, Unicorp and Cara, which are bidding jointly for Dunkin' Donuts, are seeking to overturn the doughnut chain's takeover defenses.  The two Canadian companies have made a $43-a-share offer for Dunkin' Donuts and will offer $45 a share if the company's poison pills are dismantled.  Unicorp and Cara filed the suit last week, asking that the Dunkin' Donuts board redeem preferred shares issued to General Electric Capital Corp. and poison-pill share purchase rights, as well as to rescind Dunkin's employee stock ownership plan.  Eric Evans, vice president of Unicorp, said the litigation is likely to continue until the end of next month.  UAL APPEARS LIKELY to respond favorably to any overtures by British Airways that would compete with Marvin Davis's $6.19 billion bid for the parent of United Airlines.  The two carriers already enjoy a harmonious cooperative relationship.  UAL's unions and management could join with the British company to try to buy the U.S. firm.  ---  Consumer prices rose only 0.2% in July, largely because of falling energy prices.  The report caps a two-week streak of positive economic news that relieves pressure on the Fed to push interest rates down quickly.  ---  Unisys announced a plan to cut debt, inventory and accounts receivable.  The restructuring seems likely to restore the company to profitability but means it is backing away from its ambitious growth plans.  ---  GM is closing three U.S. light-duty truck plants for a week starting next Monday because of slow sales.  GM's Cadillac division is raising the base prices of its most popular models as much as 7.2%.  ---  Gateway's U.S. and British suitors agreed to a truce that clears the way for the planned breakup of Britain's third-largest food retailer.  ---  A JVC/Victor unit plans a joint venture with a Hollywood producer to make motion pictures.  The initial investment in the project is expected to exceed $100 million.  ---  Pacific Telesis and the Communications Workers tentatively agreed on a new contract, ending a 15-day walkout.  The union is still on strike against three other regional Bell companies.  ---  Several big advertising agencies report that ad spending in this year's second half is below expectations.  ---  Goldsmith said his hostile bid for B.A.T is entirely open to negotiation, and invited the conglomerate's chairman to discuss the offer.  ---  Two SEC decisions regarding the futures industry were reversed by an appeals court, giving a boost to the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  ---  A racketeering suit filed by Phillips Petroleum holders against T. Boone Pickens and his Mesa Partners was reinstated by a U.S. court.  ---  A Pritzker family company bought a Hungarian government-controlled trading firm, becoming the first U.S. concern to acquire all of an existing business in the Communist nation.  ---  Wellcome's shares soared 32% in London in response to a U.S. study that found the company's AIDS drug AZT to be safer and more effective than previously thought.  ---  Warner settled one of two remaining suits by Chris-Craft, its biggest holder.  The pact puts Warner a step closer to being acquired by Time.  ---  Oxdon Investments offered to raise its bid for Steinberg to $1.25 billion and to provide incentives for Socanav to drop a rival offer for the Montreal food retailer and real-estate concern.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 145,810,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2687.97, up 8.34; transportation 1442.39, up 14.05; utilities 216.93, up 0.38.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3289.54, off 1.10.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.97, up 0.15; spot index 129.34, up 0.13.  Dollar: 142.60 yen, off 0.93; 1.9563 marks, off 0.0084.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S. TREASURY  @ Today  $14.4 billion of three- and six-month bills, raising approximately $525 million in new cash, to settle Aug. 24.  @ Tuesday  $9.5 billion of two-year notes, raising, in combination with its sale of $7.75 billion of five-year, two-month notes, approximately $6.63 billion in new cash, to settle Aug. 31.  @ Wednesday  $7.75 billion of five-year, two-month notes, raising, in combination with its sale of $9.5 billion of two-year notes, approximately $6.63 billion in new cash, to settle Aug. 31.  @ Thursday  $9.25 billion in 52-week bills, raising approximately $50 million in new cash, to settle Aug. 31.  @ CORPORATE  @ One Day This Week  Bally's Park Place Funding Inc. -- $350 million first mortgage notes due 1999 via Bear Stearns & Co.  Bankers Trust New York Corp. -- Four million shares of fixed and adjustable-rate cumulative preferred stock via Morgan Stanley & Co.  Brite Voice Systems Inc. -- Initial 1.5 million common shares via Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood Inc.  Chart House Enterprises Inc. -- Initial 3.8 million common shares via First Boston Corp.  Southeastern Savings Institutions Fund Inc. -- Initial two million common shares via Interstate Johnson Lane Corp.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Tuesday  Hampton Roads Sanitation District, Va. -- $65 million primary pledge sewer revenue bonds, Series 1989, with serial and/or term bonds due 1990-2009, via competitive bid at 11 a.m. EDT.  @ Thursday  Texas -- $450 million tax and revenue anticipation notes, Series 1989, dated Sept. 1, 1989, and due Aug. 31, 1990, via competitive bid at noon EDT.  @ One Day This Week  Washington Public Power Supply System, Wash. -- $450 million nuclear projects Nos. 1 and 3 refunding revenue bonds, Series 1989A, via a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group.  Transportation Board of the State of Arizona Department of Transportation -- $330 million 1989 resolution transportation excise tax revenue bonds (Maricopa County Regional Aread Road Fund), Series A, via a Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. group.  Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority, N.Y. -- $150 million to $250 million general purpose revenue bonds, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Hoboken-Union City-Weehawken Sewerage Authority, N.J. -- $125 million sewer revenue bonds, Series 1989, via a PaineWebber Inc. group.  University of Maryland System -- $96.76 million auxiliary facility and tuition revenue bonds, 1989 Series B, via an Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. group.  Detroit, Mich. -- $88 million tax increment bonds, including $71 million taxable bonds due in 2010 and $18 million tax-exempt bonds due 1995-2003 and 2010, via a PaineWebber Inc. group.  Pennsylvania Higher Educational Facilities Authority -- $61 million revenue bonds (Thomas Jefferson University Life Science Building), via a Morgan Stanley & Co. group.  Los Angeles County, Calif. -- $56.61 million 1989 certificates of participation (Van Nuys Courthouse Refunding Project), via a Bear, Stearns & Co. group.  The Board of Trustees of the University of Alabama -- $57,439,846.75 University of Alabama at Birmingham general revenue bonds, Series 1989, via a Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. group.  Pending San Antonio, Texas -- $640 million gas and electric revenue refunding bonds, via a First Boston Corp. group.  South Dakota Health and Educational Facilities Authority -- $51.6 million revenue refunding bonds (Rapid City Regional), Series 1989, via a Dougherty Dawkins Strand & Yost Inc. group.  Indefinite Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million consolidated bonds, 65th Series, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million consolidated bonds, 66th Series, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  U S West Inc. said it sold its rights to Netcenter software products to International Business Machines Corp. Terms weren't disclosed.  The telecommunications concern said IBM will sell the communications-network software through its sales organization.  O'Brien Energy Systems Inc. said it would build a $12 million cogeneration plant to provide electricity and steam at Acme Steel Co.'s Riverdale, Ill., headquarters.  O'Brien added that it has signed a 20-year contract with Acme, guaranteeing to provide electricity and steam at lower rates than Acme would get from local utilities or by producing it itself.  The energy-product developer said annual gross revenue from the facility is expected to be about $5 million.  O'Brien said the plant, which it expects to finish by late 1991, would be capable of producing 12.2 megawatts of electricity and 100,000 pounds of steam an hour.  MAI Basic Four Inc. said Brooke Partners L.P., which is controlled by MAI Chairman Bennett S. LeBow, agreed to make an equity investment that will give it a 51% stake in MAI.  MAI said Brooke agreed to invest $30 million in cash and to convert $25 million of its Series B Preferred Stock to MAI restricted common stock, and provide certain financial guarantees to MAI through fiscal 1990.  MAI senior staff attorney Eric L. Christensen couldn't specify how much common stock would be issued to Brooke, but said the company plans a rights offering later this year designed to allow shareholders to maintain their equity position in MAI. Still, he added, Brooke has been granted the option to buy additional common stock if the rights offering reduces its stake in MAI to less than 51%.  Earlier this month, MAI said it expects to report a "significant" loss for the third quarter ended June 30, after taking nearly $40 million in unusual charges and incurring as much as $6 million of operating losses.  Late last month, the computer maker dropped its hostile tender offer for Prime Computer Inc., Natick, Mass., in the wake of a higher, friendly bid from J.H. Whitney & Co., New York.  MAI let stand an alternative offer for Prime's minicomputer business, but MAI abandoned the attempt last week.  Although MAI is no longer pursuing Prime, MAI's Mr. LeBow will go ahead with a planned proxy fight to unseat Prime's seven-member board through Brooke.  The transaction with Brooke is subject to MAI's amending its credit agreement and approval of MAI's shareholders, both boards and regulatory approvals, among other things.  MAI said it expects the transaction to close by Sept. 15.  Separately, Whitney said about 60 million shares of Prime were tendered to its DR Acquisition Corp. unit under its $20-a-share tender offer.  Whitney's offer for 49.5 million Prime shares expired midnight EDT Friday.  Whitney said that within about 10 days it will determine the prorated number of Prime shares that it will purchase from holders who tendered shares under the offer.  The venture capital concern added that about 91% of Prime's fully diluted shares were tendered to it under the offer.  The transaction has a total value of about $1.13 billion.  A Whitney spokeswoman said Whitney's acquisition of Prime is expected to be completed within several weeks.  JARUZELSKI PROPOSED a Solidarity activist as Poland's next prime minister.  The Polish president named Tadeusz Mazowiecki to be the first non-Communist prime minister in Eastern Europe since the late 1940s.  At a rally in Gdansk, with union leader Walesa at his side, the Solidarity newspaper editor implored 10,000 cheering Poles not to lose faith as he seeks to form a government.  Meanwhile, Poland's Communist Party demanded a larger role in the cabinet.  Solidarity has offered the party the defense and interior ministries, but senior party officials said the Communists must have more portfolios.  Mazowiecki expects to decide by the end of August how to divide the ministries among Solidarity, two minor parties allied with it and the Communists.  ---  Police in Colombia detained about 10,000 suspects and raided nearly 300 homes in an unprecedented crackdown on cocaine traffickers blamed for the assassination Friday of a leading presidential candidate.  In Washington, Attorney General Thornburgh expressed support for sending U.S. troops to Colombia to help fight drug lords.  ---  Iran's parliament delayed a showdown over ousting the anti-Western interior minister from Rafsanjani's cabinet, but hardliners showed their strength by refusing to impeach another outgoing minister.  A majority of the parliament has petitioned the president to retain the interior chief, who has ties to Moslem militants in Lebanon.  ---  A 3,000-ton barge rammed into a pleasure boat filled with birthday party guests on London's Thames River early Sunday, killing at least 26 people.  Police said at least 78 passengers survived when the cruiser snapped in two and sank.  Estimates of the number of passengers varied, but a detective said the death toll could reach 60.  ---  The Justice Department threatened to subpoena CBS News phone records to identify the source of government leaks about an investigation of the congressional office of Democrat William Gray of Pennsylvania.  On NBC's "Meet the Press," Thornburgh said such demands wouldn't violate the First Amendment.  ---  Banned anti-apartheid groups announced at a cathedral in Cape Town that they would defy South Africa's emergency laws by operating openly again.  Other protesters trying to hold a rally in Johannesburg were beaten by police.  The declarations are part of a campaign to challenge the government before the Sept. 6 parliamentary elections.  ---  A pro-Iranian group said it would consider killing U.S. hostages Joseph Cicippio and Edward Austin Tracy if the French navy intervenes in Lebanon.  France has sent an aircraft carrier and a destroyer to the eastern Mediterranean, but President Mitterrand said France won't intervene.  ---  The FDA plans to broaden its efforts against corruption in the generic-drug industry by scrutinizing the work of about 15 independent drug-testing laboratories.  The agency has approved hundreds of generic drugs for marketing on the strength of test data from the labs.  ---  A Palestinian strike halted almost all movement of Arab workers into Israel from the occupied Gaza Strip yesterday.  The strikers were protesting the magnetized plastic entry cards that Israel began requiring Friday.  The Israeli army said only 350 vehicles had crossed into Israel by noon.  Up to 50,000 people enter most Sundays.  ---  An Afghan general has defected to the side of U.S.-backed rebels.  Mohammad Farouk Zarif, who led President Najib's personal security force, said in Peshawar, Pakistan, that he had information that could breach Najib's security and that the government is weak and could soon fall.  Zarif's brother is one of Najib's closest advisers.  ---  South Korea brought formal charges against a student activist who defied a ban on attending a world youth festival in North Korea.  Im Su-kyung, who surrendered at the border Tuesday as she returned home, could face the death penalty.  The episode is expected to accelerate the deterioration of relations between Seoul and Pyongyang.  ---  Czech police detained dozens of people in Prague in an effort to thwart protests marking the 21st anniversary of the Soviet-led invasion of Czechoslovakia.  More than 30 people were led away after they assembled for a silent march to press demands for political reform.  Many other dissidents had gone into hiding at the start of the weekend.  The quarterly stock-picking study in the accompanying article covers the 10 brokerage houses with the largest number of registered representatives.  Within reason, each firm may choose what list of stocks it will be judged on, so long as it specifies in advance.  Most houses are judged on their official recommended list.  Some firms have a long recommended list and a shorter list consisting of the stocks most highly recommended.  Most of them elected to be judged by the longer list; Goldman Sachs chose to be judged on its shorter "Focus" list.  A.G. Edwards and Merrill Lynch don't regularly publish a recommended list.  Merrill is judged on the stocks its individual analysts rate "No. 1" for the coming six to 12 months.  Edwards is judged on the stocks its analysts say to "buy" or "accumulate."  Kidder Peabody and Thomson McKinnon publish various recommended lists for investors with differing objectives, such as income or aggressive growth.  Kidder asked to be judged by its individual analysts' picks; Thomson by the combination of its "High Quality Portfolio" and "Balanced Portfolio."  The study assumes that an investor buys all the recommended stocks, and sells any others, even if they are designated as "holds" or "weak buys."  Equal dollar amounts are put into each stock, and portfolios are adjusted monthly to keep the amounts equal.  All buying and selling is on the last trading day of each month.  Commissions and taxes are disregarded; dividends are included.  All 10 brokerage houses checked the data for accuracy.  (See related story: "Your Money Matters: Goldman, Smith Barney Top Lists in Survey of Stock-Picking Success" -- WSJ Aug. 21, 1989)  E-Systems Inc., a defense electronics concern, said it acquired Engineering Research Associates, a Vienna, Va., maker of high-frequency surveillance systems, for about $23 million, which will be paid over several years.  Upward pressure on the dollar is expected to continue building this week, but many traders are bracing for roller-coaster trading.  In recent weeks, the dollar has seen a re-emergence of the feverish bullish sentiment that propelled it during the early summer.  But currency analysts say a climb could be rougher this time because U.S. interest rates, while still seen as attractive, are below the level of a month ago.  Also, there are persistent concerns that central banks will pounce on the dollar with heavy sales when they perceive the timing is right.  The dollar "doesn't have the same feel to it this time around.  I see a little bit more of a seesaw type movement" as it works its way higher, says Douglas Madison, a corporate trader at Bank of America in Los Angeles.  Hubert Pedroli, manager of foreign exchange dealings at Credit Suisse, says, "It's going to be much slower this time" on the upside.  The dollar has the potential to rise as high as 1.98 marks and 144 yen this week, but it wouldn't be surprising to see a test of support at 1.95 marks and 141.50 yen at some point, contends Mr. Pedroli.  Backing the dollar, traders say, is evidence of continued strength in the U.S. economy and news of the unexpectedly narrow $8.17 billion U.S. merchandise trade deficit in June.  In late trading here Friday, the dollar stood at 1.9563 marks and 142.60 yen, off on profit-taking from 1.9647 marks and 143.53 yen late Thursday.  But since the beginning of the month, the dollar has risen more than 10 pfennigs and six yen.  In early Monday trading in Tokyo, the dollar was little changed, but had managed to hold on to gains in early Asian trading.  The dollar rose from late New York levels, but buying interest dried up after the dollar reached 143 yen.  As far as U.S. interest rates go, there will be a particularly close watch on rates this week because the Federal Open Market Committee meets tomorrow.  The committee, the policy-making arm of the Federal Reserve, is expected to leave the central bank's monetary policy unchanged for now.  But several U.S. administration officials have made it clear that they would favor another easing of credit by the Fed to avoid a recession.  Many analysts believe the Fed will resist the wishes of the administration, choosing instead to leave its policy steady and continue a gradual easing process that will encourage growth and keep inflation in check.  Some see the administration's call for lower rates as a move to avoid being blamed for any recession, rather than a serious attempt to influence Fed policy.  The Federal Reserve probably "doesn't want to tamper with what it has already set in motion," asserts Roger Shields, chief international economist at Chemical Bank.  The Fed, contends Mr. Shields, is cautious about loosening credit too swiftly because "there seems to be some underlying strength that keeps us away from that recession door."  Also, "Inflation is still a bugaboo," he says.  As reported Friday, the U.S. consumer price index rose 0.2% last month, following a similar rise in June.  The latest data were in line with expectations, but many economists note that the index rose 0.4% in July excluding food and energy, a rise that indicates inflation may still be a problem.  The Fed probably will leave the closely watched federal funds rate around its perceived median at 9% for now, after letting it slip from 9 3/4% in early June, many economists say.  The fed funds rate is the rate charged on overnight reserves traded among commercial banks.  The course of U.S. rates is an important influence on the dollar because it helps determine the appetite for dollar-denominated investments.  There are few expectations for a near-term Fed easing, but if the Fed were to surprise the market and loosen credit, traders say the dollar would be in danger.  "If Fed funds eased down to 8 3/4%, the dollar would come under some pressure," says Louis Quilici, an investment officer at Harris Trust & Savings Bank in Chicago.  But even if the dollar slid in such a situation, Mr. Quilici doesn't envision a decisive fall below strong support at 1.90 marks and 140.50 yen in the near future.  A possible hurdle to more big dollar gains is the expectation that global central banks will try to slap the dollar lower with sales before it has a chance to hop over resistance at 2.0 marks.  Many traders are especially concerned that the Bank of Japan "may come out swinging" with heavy sales, says Mr. Madison of Bank of America.  There are estimates that the Bank of Japan spent more than $6 billion in June to foil the dollar's rally, and some Japanese officials have warned the central bank is ready to act again if the dollar's strength is seen as excessive.  Last week, though, central banks left the market guessing about their plans.  There were scattered rumors about intervention by the Bank of Japan and the Fed on several days, but there wasn't any action like the wave of coordinated sales Aug. 11.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery settled at $368.10 an ounce, down 20 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 2.2 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at $365.70 an ounce.  Two Massachusetts investors said they own 120,000 or 5.21%, of the common shares outstanding of People's Savings Bank of Brockton, in Massachusetts.  Matthew and Eleonore Welch said in filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that they purchased the shares for investment purposes, but they didn't rule out seeking a larger role in the company in the future.  The Welchs' most-recent purchases occurred on Aug. 1 and Aug. 2, when they bought 10,000 shares for $6.75 each.  Roger Kibart, president and chief executive officer of People's Savings Bank, declined to comment on the SEC filing by the Welchs.  Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp., a maker of glass-fiber materials and polyester resins, said it acquired full ownership of its Fiberglas Canada affiliate by purchasing PPG Industries Inc.'s 50% interest in the company's voting equity for about $200 million.  Owens-Corning will record a transaction-related one-time charge of $10 million in the third quarter of 1989.  But a spokesman for the company said the acquisition is "expected to make a positive addition to cash flow and earnings beginning in 1990."  A year after unveiling the idea, Brad Champlin is still trying to get the Elvis Presley MasterCard onto center stage.  Mr. Champlin, executive vice president of Leader Federal Bank for Savings in Memphis, Tenn., figured the specialty card would become a quick hit.  But it hasn't, and Leader Federal isn't alone in its frustrations.  Banks, finance companies and thrifts are learning belatedly that "affinity" cards -- credit cards tailored to certain groups of consumers -- aren't the successes they hoped for.  The pace of new cards coming out has slowed, some issuers have expressed discouragement and a few, including Chemical Bank, have even abandoned the concept.  Affinity cards were supposed to help answer a big problem: the saturation of the U.S. credit-card market.  With consumers holding an average three credit cards each, card issuers needed new ways to find and attract customers.  Through affinity programs, issuers tapped into groups of potential customers by teaming up with charities, nonprofit groups, sports teams, airlines and other organizations.  The plan was simple: Banks seek the imprimatur and the mailing list of these groups, which in exchange typically get part of the annual fee for each new cardholder, some of the fee charged on purchases made with the card and a portion of the interest that consumers pay.  For banks, part of the appeal is the ability to target certain groups, such as doctors, who are good credit risks.  Today, three or four years after affinity cards began appearing, some 3,000 specialty-card groups exist, each with its own distinctive-looking card.  Each type of card theoretically carries its own allure.  People who hold cards tied to nonprofit groups expect their purchases to help a worthy cause.  Those using airline affinity cards earn points toward free or reduced-price plane tickets.  Groups whose members have good payment records, such as golfers, get cards with below-market interest rates and fees.  Others, like the Elvis card, appeal mainly to whims.  Most issuers don't disclose figures on their credit-card bases, but within the industry certain affinity cards are known as successes.  They're usually the ones linked to big, identifiable groups.  Among them are: the AAA Auto Clubs and Bank One, a unit of Banc One Corp.; the AFL-CIO labor union and Bank of New York Co.; the American Medical Association and Maryland Bank, a unit MNC Financial Corp.; and the National Football League and Citibank, a unit of Citicorp.  Results elsewhere haven't been so good.  Chemical Bank, a unit of Chemical Banking Corp., abandoned all nine of its affinity programs, at a cost of more than $200,000.  "There just wasn't any money to be made," a spokesman says.  "The groups that you affiliate with want big marketing dollars spent up front. {And} giving affinity cards to people who have no other connection to our bank just doesn't jibe with our philosophy of building relationships with customers."  Chemical Bank's affinity cards targeted relatively narrow groups.  Industry executives say that besides demanding too much cash, some affinity groups haven't helped to promote the card.  In others, the dynamics of card usage hasn't worked out as planned.  "The inside scoop that I hear is that the banks that have affinity cards with airlines aren't happy with the economics of their deals," says Don Berman of CMS Associates, a Garden City, N.Y., credit-card consultant, says.  "A number are trying to renegotiate their deals."  The problem, he says, is that too many holders of airline affinity cards pay off the balance each month.  This undermines the banks' profit motives, because typically with affinity cards the issuers forfeit the merchant fee they would normally collect on each sale, and rely on the interest charged on unpaid balances.  Citibank won't talk about its airline affinity card, the American Airlines Advantage card, or whether the levels of unpaid balances have been disappointing.  Industry sources, however, say the card has been a success.  More generally, many in the credit-card industry argue that a good idea has been overdone.  "In the beginning the idea was wonderful," says James Bailey, Citibank's group executive for U.S. credit cards.  "But in some cases it has been carried too far and become faddish."  Witness some of the "affinities" that card-issuers have hit upon: For aficionados of wild sheep, First Interstate Bank of California and the Foundation for North American Wild Sheep offer a Visa card.  Aspiring space pioneers can get a Visa card promoted by the Young Astronauts of Utah and First Security Bank in Salt Lake City.  There's even one for ice cream lovers from Breyer's ice cream and Marine Midland Banks in New York.  And proving that no group is too small, Maryland National Bank and the Society for the Preservation and Encouragement of Barber Shop Singing in America are sponsoring a MasterCard.  David C. Mann of Affinity Group Marketing Inc., a New York marketing consultant, calls quirkier programs like the Elvis card "silly."  Mr. Champlin, for one, disagrees.  He says the Elvis card is fun for customers and that some of the money goes toward music scholarships.  So far, the Elvis card has 5,000 people signed up.  But it's been tough going: The card is now in its fourth phase of test marketing.  The first batch of direct mail solicitations drew a good response, but too many applicants didn't meet Leader Federal's credit criteria.  Subsequent mailings fell on dry soil.  Mr. Champlin now says that he's getting a good response through record clubs and other music-related activities.  Besides sporting a portrait of the King, the Elvis card bears a 17.88% annual interest rate and a $36 yearly fee.  The fee is fairly standard, but the interest rate is lower than the 19.8% that the top 10 card issuers charge.  "It takes a lot longer to get one of these programs going than anyone realizes, including me," he confesses.  One of the affinity cards that Chemical Bank dropped was marketed to alumni of New York University.  "We were satisfied with the program while it was running," says Robert Cunningham, director of alumni relations at NYU.  "But it ended at Chemical's suggestion."  Under the arrangement, Chemical paid NYU's alumni program $3 for each new cardholder and 0.5% of a purchase each time the card was used.  About 2,000 cards were issued, and the alumni program earned about $15,000 a year.  Another Chemical affinity card was linked to the Leukemia Society of America.  The charity hoped to sign up about 1,000 people, but got only 350.  "Unfortunately, it didn't generate enough interest," says Rudolph Badum, executive vice president of the society.  "I don't think that we went out and pushed it as much as we could have."  Still, Mr. Badum says, "We'd consider another affinity-card program."  John Love, who heads banking publications for Faulkner & Gray Inc., a New York publisher, says, "I don't think that affinity marketing has run out of steam, but I do think that the easy affinity programs are gone.  The programs have got to go beyond mere appeals to loyalty to a group."  Citibank agrees, and claims that its own cards do.  "Our customers are buying our credit cards for the quality of our services," says Mr. Bailey, citing Citibank's 24-hour card-replacement help and credit-line increases.  But those perks are available for any Citibank credit cards.  Mr. Mann of Affinity Group Marketing says affinity cards have to offer consumers something that they can't get with a standard credit card, such as a lower interest rate.  "An issuer," he argues, "needs to say, 'you're special and you deserve a special deal.'"  Goldman Sachs & Co., appearing for the first time in a continuing study of brokerage houses' stock-picking prowess, came away with a lot of the marbles.  But it didn't walk away with the game.  Goldman, long one of Wall Street's most prestigious houses, ranked first among 10 brokerage houses for the three years ending June 30, 1989.  More recently, however, the firm hasn't done as well.  Goldman was in the middle of the pack for the second quarter and the latest 12 months, according to the study by this newspaper and Zacks Investment Research Inc. of Chicago.  Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., a unit of Primerica Corp., won top honors for the quarter and the 12 months.  The laggard in the study so far is Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., a unit of Prudential Insurance Co. of America, which ranked last for both the three-year and 12-month periods.  Stock-picking advice is one of the major services investors buy when they deal with a full-service brokerage firm.  The quarterly study is an attempt to evaluate just how good that advice is.  Goldman Sachs, which caters to institutions and a few wealthy individuals, was added to the survey this quarter to replace Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., which dismantled its retail broker network.  Here is a firm-by-firm rundown in the order they finished for the 12-month period:  SMITH BARNEY: A snappy 13% return in the second quarter put Smith Barney on top of the 12-month standings a second straight time.  The firm gradually has shifted its stock-picking strategy.  A year ago, when the market was stuck in a trading range, it emphasized dividends.  Lately it has become "much more interested in pure growth stocks," says John B. Hoffman, associate director of research.  Samples: Middleby Corp., Medtronic Inc. and PepsiCo Inc. Big hits in the second quarter were contrarian plays in troubled utilities such as Nipsco Industries Inc. (up 29% for the quarter) and Gulf State Utilities (up 28%).  PAINEWEBBER: Turn on your radio and you might hear a PaineWebber Inc. ad expounding on "ruler stocks," whose earnings grow "virtually as straight as a ruler."  The concept "has been a big winner for us," says James Voytko, research director for the PaineWebber Group Inc. unit.  Among the steady growers the firm likes are McDonald's Corp., Merck & Co., PepsiCo and Coca-Cola Co. PaineWebber's 12-month standing was boosted by a pair of securities that more than doubled: United Telecommunications Inc. and Federal National Mortgage Association.  For the three-year and three-month terms, however, PaineWebber was in the middle of the pack.  A.G. EDWARDS: "Any time I can get 9.3% for a quarter, I'm very pleased," says Terry Dessent, research director at A.G. Edwards & Sons.  The firm's goal is to outperform down markets; during advances, beating the market is "icing on the cake," he says.  Mr. Dessent notes that it's getting harder to find attractive buys: The number of stocks Edwards recommends has dropped to about 60 from near 100 a few months ago.  But the St. Louis firm continues to find stocks little followed on Wall Street.  Its best gainers last quarter were Edison Brother Stores Inc. (up 48%) and Sanderson Farms Inc. (up 36%).  DEAN WITTER: Playing defense, Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co., stuck mainly with stocks that would hold up in an economic slowdown (healthcare, food, tobacco, and leisure stocks) or benefit from falling interest rates (banks and insurance companies).  The strategy yielded "positive results," says research director Manny Korman: Dean Witter beat the market averages by a nice margin for the quarter and the 12 months.  Other firms, however, outperformed the averages by even more.  GOLDMAN SACHS: That Goldman picks stocks well isn't a big surprise: Last year, 42 of its analysts made Institutional Investor magazine's "All-America Research Team," the highest total of any Wall Street firm.  Goldman's success in the three-year rankings came partly from picking stocks that held up fairly well in the 1987 crash.  Back then, recalls research director William Kealy, Goldman mostly recommended "quality growth" stocks such as Automatic Data Processing Inc., Johnson & Johnson and Philip Morris Cos.  Recently, it has emphasized cyclical stocks whose performance tends to track the ups and downs of the nation's economy, such as Aluminum Co. of America and Deere & Co.  That hurt in the latest quarter, but Mr. Kealy says cyclicals are "just awfully cheap" and will pay off if a recession is averted.  KIDDER PEABODY: After cruising nicely through April and May, Kidder Peabody & Co., a unit of General Electric Co., tripped in June.  "We stayed too long in small technology stocks," such as 3Com Corp. and Amdahl Corp., says strategist Dennis Jarrett.  Research director Joe Fuchs says Kidder would have looked much better had its sell recommendation on semiconductor stocks been issued only a few days sooner. (It would then have counted at the end of May, rather than the end of June, under the study's methodology.) High-tech wasn't the whole story, though: The quarter's biggest loser was Marble Financial Corp., down 44%.  SHEARSON: Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., which had been the long-term leader, dropped into second place, a nose ahead of Smith Barney.  The American Express Co. unit caught its share of takeover stocks, including NWA Inc., up 35% for the quarter and 152% for the 12 months.  "We continued to be pretty strong in the entertainment stocks," says research director Jack Rivkin.  That included all three of the parties in the quarter's epic takeover brawl: Time Inc. (up 34% for the quarter), Warner Communications Inc. (up 29%) and Paramount Communications Inc.(up 24%).  THOMSON MCKINNON: This is the swan song in the study for Thomson, which has sold its retail brokerage assets to Prudential-Bache.  Long-term, Thomson did creditably, finishing fourth for the 36 months.  Lately, it has favored stocks of huge companies (average market value $9 billion), meaning that it has had remarkably few losers, but few big winners.  Thomson never tried for "spectacular performance," says Harry Zisson, research director.  Rather, he says, its goal was to show good long-term results and keep "some cushion on the downside."  MERRILL LYNCH: With no recommended list, Merrill Lynch & Co. is judged on the picks of its analysts, who tend to favor small growth companies.  Andrew Melnick, director of research, says some of those companies "are starting to perform" better now.  Issues such as Kelly Services Inc. (up 35% last quarter), Uniforce Temporary Personnel Inc. (up 34%) and J&J Snack Foods Corp. (up 28%) helped Merrill to a strong quarter.  Previously, small growth stocks hadn't done much, which is why Merrill ranked ninth for the 12 months with a 16% return.  PRUDENTIAL-BACHE: Last for the long term and the 12 months, Prudential-Bache was ninth in the most recent quarter.  Loyalty to cyclical stocks and some high-tech issues has "killed us," says research director Michael Culp.  Losers last quarter included Nu-West Industries Inc. (down 35%), Steel Technologies Inc. (down 23%) and Stone Container Corp. (down 16%).  But Mr. Culp doesn't plan to change strategy now, because he believes it is finally starting to pay off.  "Paper stocks are on fire right now" and other cyclicals have also started to rebound, he notes.  "We're sticking with it because our outlook continues to be for moderate economic growth and declining inflation in 1990."  ---  @ Comparing Brokerage Houses' Stock-Picking Prowess  @ Estimated performance of stocks recommended by major securities firms in periods ended June 30, 1989, ranked by performance in the most recent 12 months.  Also shown are the firms' biggest winners and losers during the 12 months.  @BROKERAGE HOUSE 3 MONTHS 12 MONTHS 36 MONTHS  @Smith Barney 13.0% 28.6% 50.9%  @ Biggest Gain*: Middleby Corp. + 61%  @ Biggest Loss*: IBM - 13%  @PaineWebber 8.7 23.6 43.1  @ Biggest Gain*: United Telecom +110  @ Biggest Loss*: Ashton-Tate - 33  @A.G.  Edwards 9.3 22.7 39.5  @ Biggest Gain*: Kraft + 93  @ Biggest Loss*: Burr Brown - 32  @Dean Witter 9.3 22.4 30.5  @ Biggest Gain*: RJR Nabisco + 77  @ Biggest Loss*: Amre - 50  @Goldman Sachs 8.4 22.0 62.3  @ Biggest Gain*: Fed.  Natl.Mortgage +108  @ Biggest Loss*: Micropolis Corp. - 60  @Kidder Peabody 7.5 21.6 35.7  @ Biggest Gain*: Cellular Inc. +104  @ Biggest Loss*: Daisy Systems - 44  @Shearson 10.1 20.8 51.5  @ Biggest Gain*: NWA +152  @ Biggest Loss*: Eagle Picher - 54  @Thomson McKinnon 8.0 16.3 43.9  @ Biggest Gain*: Kroger + 60  @ Biggest Loss*: AMP Inc. - 19  @Merrill Lynch 10.2 16.0 32.5  @ Biggest Gain*: FHP International +147  @ Biggest Loss*: National Education - 49  @Prudential-Bache 7.8 12.9 30.3  @ Biggest Gain*: Coca-Cola Co. + 51  @ Biggest Loss*: Nu-West Industries - 38  @Comparison yardsticks  @Dow Jones Industrial Av. 7.6% 18.7% 43.8%  @S&P 500-stock index 8.8% 20.5% 40.4%  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research Inc.  @ Note: All figures include dividends.  Individual investors' results will vary.  @ *For that portion of the 12-month period during which a particular brokerage house recommended the stock.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Jamesway Corp. $ .07 ... $ .06 (4) 16.67  @ NEGATIVE  @Navistar Intl $ .08 $ .10 (8) $ .10 (8) 20.00  @Dresser Inds $ .62 $ .66 (13) $ .66 (13) 6.06  @Gerber Scientif $ .32 $ .34 (5) $ .34 (5) 5.88  @Land's End $ .11 ... $ .21 (10) 47.62  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  WHEN THE RUSSIANS ORBITED their first Sputniks in late 1957, a fascinated world tuned in to the radio signals the satellites beamed back, and the U.S. went into shock.  The world's technological champion had been asleep at the switch.  The first catch-up try was a fresh disaster.  The Navy had been readying for a grapefruit-sized satellite called Vanguard, and this was rushed to Florida for a quick blast-off in December 1957.  The rocket blew up on the launching pad.  The U.S. did get into the space race with Explorer 1 a month after the Vanguard fiasco.  It was launched by a Jupiter rocket from the Army's Redstone arsenal, developed by Werner Von Braun, one of the German scientists brought to the U.S. after World War II.  Explorer 1 went into Earth orbit Jan. 31, 1958, and stayed aloft for more than two years.  During that time, it enabled U.S. scientists to discover and chart the Van Allen belt of magnetic radiation.  The huge lifting power of Soviet military rockets kept widening the Russian lead.  In April 1961, Yuri Gagarin became the first man in space in Vostok 1.  The U.S. had to be content with suborbital manned flights until February 1962, when John Glenn became the first American to orbit the Earth.  That same year, AT&T launched Telstar 1, the first commercial communications satellite.  John F. Kennedy gave the U.S. a goal in space with his 10-year, $10 billion plan to put a man on the moon, climaxed in 1969 when Neal Armstrong first walked there.  A year later, the Soviet Union brought back moon samples with its Luna 16 and sent its Luna 17 robot rover to explore the moon's surface.  But the laurels in the "race to space" went to the U.S.  That ended the public relations phase of space exploration.  From then on the goals would be scientific, military -- and commercial.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  BUCK ROGERS, THE HERO of the 1929-1967 adventure strip, had less trouble with his ray gun than did 1958 inventors of an idea for a beam device later called a laser.  Arthur L. Schawlow of Bell Laboratories and Charles H. Townes, a Bell consultant from Columbia University, on Dec. 15, 1958, published their "optical maser" paper and also filed the patent, assigned to Bell.  "Maser" is for "microwave amplification by stimulated emission of radiation."  But Gordon Gould, also of Columbia, in an over-two-decade battle claimed he recorded his similar "laser" idea in November 1957 with a candy store notary.  "Laser" stands for "light amplification by stimulated emission of radiation."  Both "masers" and "lasers" are devices containing crystal, gas or other substances that get atoms so excited as they bounce back and forth in step between two mirrors that they finally burst out in one coherent beam.  Other light rays are merely incoherent waves.  Gould argued that his work was classified so he couldn't make his patent filing before Bell's.  After the long dispute, he won his patent on Oct. 11, 1977, by which time the Bell patent had expired.  On March 1, 1982, a court upheld his victory, and he became rich.  In December 1988 he won still another laser patent.  Neither Gould nor the Schawlow-Townes team ever made a working laser.  The first one, using a ruby crystal, was built by Theodore H. Maiman of Hughes Aircraft in 1960.  Today there are millions of lasers, ranging in size from a grain of salt to a living room.  They are used in everything from eye operations to automated supermarket checkouts to compact disc players to phone systems and three-dimensional photos.  Future lasers could knock out enemy spacecraft.  Welcome back, Buck Rogers.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  WHEN THE JET AGE ARRIVED, U.S. airlines ignored it.  The British Comet took off in 1946 and by 1952 was flying from London to South Africa, Ceylon and Singapore.  Then, in 1954, two of the 490-mph jets disintegrated over the Mediterranean.  Metal fatigue, brand-new to aviators, was blamed.  American carriers were more determined than ever to stick with their proven, if slower, pitson-powered airplanes.  Boeing still thought it was time for a commercial jet, and it needed one.  Sales of its Stratocruisers had been left behind by Douglas's DC-6 and Lockheed's Constellation.  The Renton, Wash., company famed for the Flying Fortress and the B-52, had learned jet technology with its B-47 bomber.  In 1952, William Allen, Boeing's president, decided to spend $14 million of the company's money for the 707, America's first jetliner.  The 707 breezed through its tests.  Chief pilot Tex Johnson sent Allen into shock by executing a slow roll with it.  The Air Force helped in 1954 by ordering 24 as K-135 jet tankers for in-flight refueling.  The commercial breakthrough came in 1955 when Pan American boss Juan Trippe, aviation's perennial front-runner, placed a $296 million order for 54 of the new 707s.  Boeing delivered the first production model in August 1958 and that October Trippe put it on the transAtlantic run.  The 707 beat rival Douglas's DC-8 jet by a full year.  The 707 didn't fly Boeing to prosperity overnight.  The company was still in a financial bind when it was working on the workhorse 727 in the early 1960s.  But the pioneering 707 and succeeding jets would establish Boeing as the premier commercial aircraft company in the world.  In mid-1989, it had a backlog of 661 plane orders worth $35 billion.  Boeing crafted almost 1,000 of the 707s and still turns them out as military tankers and AWACS radar warning planes.  Commercially, about 230 are still flying, mostly abroad, and five 707s are in the White House fleet.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  POET MARIANNE MOORE WANTED TO CALL IT "Utopian Turtletop" or "Resilient Bullet."  Ford's designers called it the "E-car," and when they unveiled a full-scale mockup, their top executives broke into applause.  New Edsels, the first all-new automobile from Detroit's Big Three in 18 years, rolled out of the showrooms in the fall of 1957 and headed for oblivion.  Ford spent $250 million to develop the Edsel, prpbably the most lavishly research car in histroy.  To name it, they sifted through 18,000 suggestions, then hires poet Moore to get more.  The final choice turned out to be the first, the Edsel. (Besides, it was the marque Henry Ford II had wanted all along, in memory of his late father.) The new car's distinctive, purse-mouthed oval gril and dual headlights made it recognizable at any distance.  It also featured such touches as buttons on the steering wheel for the automatic transmission.  The company culled 1,400 dealers from 4,600 applicants and spent $100,000 on "depth studies" to determine its slot in the market.  On paper, the Edsel looked like a natural.  Ford got a medium-priced car to match those made by General Motors and Chrysler, and that price bracket was red hot during the planning stages.  In 1955, when Detroit sold a record 7.2 million automobiles, medium-priced models were more than a third of the total.  To reach their first-year goal of 200,000 Edsels and 3.5% of the car market, Ford budgeted a $10 million ad campaign.  Nothing worked.  For one thing, the medium-price market had cooled down.  The economy was headed for the 1958 recession, and buyers were getting interested in small cars.  The pricing was confusing, ranging all the way from the low-priced Ford almost to the high-priced Lincoln.  After two years and fewer than 111,000 cars, Ford awoke from its dream and scrapped the Edsel for good in November 1959.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  JOHN V. BORDEN, A DENTIST in Washington, D.C., displayed a new high speed drill that was the "sensation" of the 1957 International Dental Congress in Rome.  Its tiny blade head, cooled by a spray of water, spun at a rate of 350,000 revolutions a minute, more than five times as fast as the ten-speediest drills.  It meant patients had less agony time and dentists could treat more patients daily.  Called an "Airotor" because it used compressed air to spin the cutting blade, the product evolved from slower versions dating to about 1940.  In 1951, a Swedish dentist made an air turbine drill with 50,000 r.p.m.  Another early type, in 1953, used water instead of air to drive the blade.  Robert J. Nelson, a dentist, aided by John Kampula, an engineer, created it at the National Bureau of Standards with funding from the American dental Association.  It remained cool in the dentist's hand despite speeds up to 61,000 r.p.m., and it did away with pulleys and belts.  Borden's pioneer had bothersome features such as a high-pitched noise.  The lubricating oil mist became controversial because of the uncertainty of what effects it might have.  And its tiny ball bearings had unpredictable lives.  By 1971, however, it had be refined into a commonly used drill.  And it spurred many high-speed competitors such as the 680,000 r.p.m.  Silentair from England.  Superfast models, though, tended to burn out.  Within a decade the speed race -- like Detroit's horsepower race in the 1950s -- had spent itself.  But improvements have continued.  Today, quiet, low-vibration drills of up to 430,000 r.p.m. are common.  Some even include fiberoptic tubes to illuminate teeth in the otherwise dark cavern of the mouth.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  DWIGHT EISENHOWER TOLD THE UNITED NATIONS in 1953 that the U.S. would build a nuclear reactor as part of its electric power utility system.  In December 1957, a Westinghouse pressurized water reactor in Shippingport, Pa., went on stream and began pumping 72,000 kilowatts into 250,000 Pittsburgh-area homes.  The new plant was a collaboration of public and private industry.  The Atomic Energy Commission provided money -- $32 million for the reactor, and $52 million for R&D.  The reactor design was salvaged from a nuclear carrier that a budget-minded Congress had torpedoed.  Adm. Hyman Rickover, "father of the nuclear navy," was in charge. (Westinghouse had built the power plant for the admiral's first nuclear submarine, the Nautilus.) Duquesne Power & Light supplied the customers, $5 million for the reactor, $15 million for Westinghouse-built stream turbines and other generating gear, and operated the plant for AEC.  Twenty-five years and 6.5 billion kilowatt-hours later, in December 1982, Shippingport was ready for decommissioning and dismantling.  The nuclear core was removed and shipped to Idaho in 1984.  Last December the reactor kettle, with concrete replacing the water jacket that had shielded it, was lifted onto a barge.  After a 7,800-mile voyage down the Ohio and Mississippi, through the Panama Canal and up the Columbia River, the 1,000-ton empty shell was dropped into a huge pit in Hanford, Wash.  The field where the plant once stood will go back to Duquesne P&L.  Westinghouse was present at the creation of Shippingport but the Department of Energy gave the $98 million job of dismantling it to its arch-rival, General Electric.  Still, Westinghouse has profited mightily.  The world has close to 400 nuclear power plants operating (111 in the U.S.), with 120 more under construction, and the Pittsburgh company has supplied the technology for more than half of them.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  MALCOM P. MCLEAN, A 43-YEAR-OLD TRUCKER, first tested his idea of moving freight in ocean-borne trailers on the Ideal X, a World War II tanker that sailed from Newark, N.J., on April 26, 1956, for Houston.  A new hauling mode -- containerization -- was born.  By October 1957, McLean had converted his first vessel, the Gateway City, into a ship designed for stacks of van-sized boxes on its deck.  And in 1966, eight years after he started regular U.S.-Puerto Rico service, his SS Fairland made the first U.S.-Europe containership runs.  In 1967 came the Pacific and, after that, many competitors.  McLean's idea cut terminal handling time, stealing and insurance costs.  And it created a number of industries -- van makers, special ships, new types of rail flatcars, handling facilities and innovative lessors.  Business boomed until fare wars broke out in the late 1970s, sending many new companies into bankruptcy.  McLean made his first fortune selling his Sea-Land Service to R.J. Reynolds Tobacco in 1969.  Then, in 1978, he bet $1 billion on 12 Korean-built huge "econships" that he hoped could restore ailing U.S. Lines (purchased for $360 million) as a world leader.  But his company, too, was hit by fare wars and entered bankruptcy on Nov. 26, 1986.  "Malcom McLean is a genius.  But the other side of genius is great error," said Clifford Sayre Jr., DuPont's director of ligistics.  McLean said, "If I had it to do over, I'd do the same thing."  "Malcolm McLean invented containerization, but we're on the raod to perfecting it," said an officer of Evergreen Marine, a Taiwanese company that replaced U.S. Lines as a world leader.  Today, 75% of U.S. ocean merchandise trade with the rest of the world is hauled in big containers instead of in all those crates, tubs, sacks and boxes used in 1955.  COMSTOCK RESOURCES Inc. said it plans to sell about $25 million in debentures in a private placement next month.  The Dallas-based oil and gas concern said proceeds will be used to refinance bank debt, to purchase additional working interests in some properties, and for working capital.  Rauscher Pierce Refsnes Inc. has been hired to place the debt, Comstock said.  Wean Inc. said a unit received a letter of intent to supply a $20 million galvanizing line at New Carlisle, Ind., site of a proposed joint venture between Nippon Steel Corp. and Inland Steel Industries Inc.  Wean, a designer and maker of equipment used to process metal, rubber and plastics, said the Nippon-Inland joint venture is expected to be completed next month.  At that point Wean said it expects to receive a formal order for the mechanical equipment.  Japanese consumer spending shook off the aftereffects of the new sales tax and turned back upward in June, rising 0.7% from a year earlier after adjustment for inflation.  According to the announcement by the Statistics Bureau of the Prime Minister's Office, the average household in Japan spent 279,973 yen ($1,970.25) in June, up 3.7% from a year ago before adjustment.  In May, adjusted consumer spending fell 2.9%, following a 0.7% drop in April.  The Prime Minister's Office said the drops were in reaction to a spending spree ahead of the introduction of a sales tax in April.  In March before retailers began collecting the tax, consumer spending rose 6.3%.  A Statistics Bureau spokesman said, "We think that, in relation to the effect of the sales tax, the situation has probably stabilized."  China said it ran a surplus in its balance of payments in 1988, boosting its total foreign-exchange reserves to $17.35 billion from $15.24 billion in 1987.  An official of the State Administration of Exchange Control said China posted a $3.8 billion deficit in its regular accounts, including foreign trade and tourism.  But it ran a $7.13 billion surplus in its capital accounts, including direct investments and international loans, according to the official Xinhua news agency.  Vested Interests  My stock club's been meeting for years  And it has been an education:  At first with discussions on stocks  And now our health and medication.  -- Arnold J. Zarett.  ---  Touchy Subject  There are two things about hands  That always set me to ruing:  One either washes the other,  Or doesn't know what the other's doing.  -- Mimi Kay.  the second most valuable traded commodity after crude oil -- fell yesterday to a new 14-year low, according to the International Coffee Organization.  The organization's indicator of the daily average world market price of coffee was 66.39 cents a pound, a level last seen in mid-1975.  Coffee has fallen in value by more than 30% since the start of this month, when the coffee organization removed its safety net of export quotas.  Coffee costs less than half what it did at the start of the year.  Traders here said the latest fall followed heavy selling pressure by Brazil, the world's biggest producer and exporter.  Thermedics Inc. said its Corpak unit introduced a device to enable patients who can't eat normally to insert a feeding tube into the intestinal tract through the abdominal wall.  The maker of analytical instruments and medical products said the device will be nationally available by the end of September.  Thermedics claimed the new device is easier to use and causes less discomfort than alternative feeding tubes.  Among other features, the device includes a small balloon that is inflated to hold the tube in place during use and deflated during insertion and removal, the company said.  As a footnote to David Brooks's appreciation of Sidney Hook (Leisure & Arts, July 18), your readers may be interested in one of Mr. Hook's efforts to correct distortions of history.  Just before he went into the hospital, Mr. Hook wrote a letter to Tom Wicker protesting against the columnist's defense of Owen Lattimore.  Mr. Hook noted that, contrary to Mr. Wicker's assertion that Mr. Lattimore had not been a communist fellow traveler, Mr. Lattimore had in fact defended the Moscow purge trials as a triumph of democracy.  He enclosed an article written by Mr. Lattimore.  Moreover, Mr. Hook included one of his old articles in which he noted that Mr. Lattimore accepted the guilt of those framed by Stalin on the basis of far less credible evidence than had been produced against him.  Mr. Hook's irrefutable demonstration of Mr. Lattimore's fellow traveling did not sway Mr. Wicker, who subsequently wrote yet another defense of a man who applauded Stalinist frame-ups.  That should demonstrate that the battles Sidney Hook fought so valiantly are not yet won.  Harvey Klehr  Emory University  Atlanta  ---  This refers to the paragraph in Mr. Brooks's article about Mr. Hook's "famous atheism": "Somebody once asked (Mr.  Hook) what he would say if, after he died, he went to heaven and found there was indeed a Divinity."  In fact the "somebody" who asked him was I, but not quite as stated in your article.  Sidney and I were enjoying a midafternoon immersion in the Jacuzzi that is one of the amenities of our condominium complex at Stanford University.  I asked Sidney whether he was still a confirmed agnostic.  His answer was, "Of course.  Interesting that you should ask."  Then he added, "The other day I was talking to a local minister who asked me the same question."  Then I asked, "Suppose you were to come face-to-face with God, and God demanded that you explain yourself.  What would you say?"  Sidney replied, "I would say, 'God, I'm sorry, but you never gave me enough evidence.'"  I then asked, "Sidney, how would you know that you had enough evidence?"  And he replied, "I don't know now, but I don't doubt that I would recognize what is enough should I ever confront it."  Jon Eisenson  Professor Emeritus  Hearing and Speech Science  Stanford University  Stanford, Calif.  ---  Mr. Brooks's article awakened memories of my time as Mr. Hook's student at New York University's Washington Square College some 28 years ago.  One of Mr. Hook's most remarkable parables still stays fresh in my mind.  He told of an old man, dying in the springtime, who called his sons to his bedside.  "My treasure," he said, "is buried somewhere on this farm.  You have only to dig to find it."  He died, and the sons went for their shovels.  Sure enough, that autumn they found and shared the treasure.  This was Sidney Hook's parallel for the advantages of democracy.  Bernard Abrams  Schooley's Mountain, N.J.  An airport radar system designed to detect dangerous wind shears helped three jetliner pilots avoid a potentially catastrophic shear last month, officials said.  "You can definitely say the system worked," John McCarthy, director of wind-shear research for the National Center for Atmospheric Research in Boulder, said.  A wind shear is a sudden change of wind direction that creates a powerful downburst of air.  The gust can be strong enough to drive a jetliner into the ground when it is landing or taking off.  Powerful wind shears called microbursts have caused at least five accidents that claimed more than 500 lives in the past 15 years, including the 1985 crash of a Delta Air Lines L-1011 that killed 137 people near Dallas.  A microburst recorded at 95 knots, or 109 miles an hour, was detected July 8 by Stapleton International Airport's Low-Level Wind Shear Alert System, officials said.  That was about 25 knots faster than the microburst that downed the Delta jet.  Three planes were approaching Stapleton when air-traffic controllers alerted them to the probability of the wind shear, Federal Aviation Administration spokesman Mitch Barker said.  The pilots, whose names and carriers weren't identified, took evasive action.  "The absence of the alert to the pilots could have been very potentially catastrophic," Mr. McCarthy said.  The crew of one of the aircraft said the microburst was so strong that it slowed the jet by approximately 58 mph and caused it to drop 400 feet, to within 600 feet of the ground, he said.  The wind shear, which lasted 10 minutes, was detected by a recently upgraded Doppler radar system using 16 wind-detection sensors spread over the airfield.  Officials have been testing Doppler systems at Stapleton for their ability to detect wind shear.  Last November, the FAA awarded a $180 million contract to Raytheon Co. to install such systems at 47 major airports across the country, beginning in the early 1990s.  The Stapleton microburst is the strongest ever measured by a machine, Mr. McCarthy said.  But he added, "We think microbursts can be a lot stronger than this 95 knotter."  Scientists estimate microbursts can be as powerful as 200 knots.  In response to Peter F. Drucker's July 25 editorial-page article, "Sell the Mailroom," I find it quite amusing that Mr. Drucker views the clerical, maintenance and support staffs of corporate America as the cancer causing the present-day ills of ill-managed American corporations.  Did the support staffs lose the U.S. world competitive edge?  Did lower-level employees lend billions of dollars to stumbling Third World countries, thus strapping U.S. corporate growth?  Of course not.  These high-risk capital decisions were made by six- and seven-figure corporate "managers."  Mr. Drucker's solutions are purely cosmetic -- totally out of touch with the reality of the true problems plaguing U.S. business.  The solution to increased productivity in support staffs is the same solution to increased high-level management competence: educating competent individuals in management style and technique, and in garnering employee loyalty from all levels up and down the line.  Only then will maximum productivity from all corporate areas be achieved.  Hiring outside contractors will not increase productivity or lower costs.  You will not lower overhead and you will not attain quality or interest in job duties from part-time employees or from outside contractors.  The only way American business will survive in the future is the way it began -- from within.  Kenneth Strand  San Francisco  ---  Mr. Drucker's suggestion that independent, outside contractors be retained generally makes little economic sense for hospitals or other nonprofit institutions.  To farm out the hospital like a "flea market" to entrepreneurs who are expected to make a profit, pay dividends and pay taxes defeats the very reason for the nonprofit status of the institution.  There may be exceptions, but what is everybody's business soon becomes nobody's business.  An option not mentioned is the prudent use of consultative services with control maintained by the people who are retained to manage and who should be held accountable.  Richard L. Suck  Retired President  St. Luke's Hospital  Bethlehem, Pa.  British Telecommunications PLC reported a 4.1% increase in pretax profit for its first quarter ended June 30 to #635 million ($1 billion) from #610 million a year earlier, exceeding market expectations.  Profit after taxes and minority interests, or profit attributable to shareholders, rose 4.6% to #408 million, or 6.8 pence a share, from #390 million, or 6.5 pence a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 11% to #2.92 billion from #2.63 billion a year earlier.  The increase resulted almost entirely from volume growth, as prices for services have been held steady for about three years.  Chairman Iain Vallance said the "progressive modernization" of the company's network is leading to improvements in the quality of services, as well as encouraging business growth.  Operating profit for the fiscal first quarter rose 7.1% to #740 million from #691 million a year earlier.  KLM Royal Dutch Airlines reported that net income for its first quarter ended June 30 more than doubled to 230.1 million guilders ($105.1 million), or 4.36 guilders ($1.99) a share, from 105.5 million guilders, or two guilders a share, a year earlier, boosted by proceeds of 125 million guilders from the sale of a subsidiary.  Revenue rose 11% to 1.64 billion guilders from 1.47 billion guilders a year earlier.  The results fell within the range of Dutch analysts' expectations.  The 39.4% Dutch state-owned flag carrier said pretax profit rose 40% to 148.1 million guilders from 105.5 million guilders a year earlier, when KLM didn't make tax provisions; it wasn't until later in fiscal 1989 that the carrier began paying taxes, after exhausting available tax-loss carry-forward credits.  KLM made a tax provision of 43 million guilders in the fiscal 1990 first quarter.  The one-time gain that boosted profit derived from the April sale of KLM's XP Systems VOF express parcel delivery unit.  The results also included 16.8 million guilders from asset sales, mainly aircraft.  AB Electrolux said that group pretax profit rose 10% to 1.99 billion kronor ($302.1 million) for the first six months this year from 1.81 billion kronor in the year-earlier period.  The Stockholm-based home appliance group said revenue grew 23% to 44.39 billion kronor from 36.07 billion kronor.  Several brokerage firms had predicted Electrolux profit to be in the range of 2 billion to 2.2 billion kronor.  Electrolux said operating profit rose 20% to 2.88 billion kronor from 2.4 billion.  particularly from manufacturers -- machinery orders received by Japanese companies surged 19.2% in June from a year earlier to 1.845 trillion yen ($12.97 billion), the Economic Planning Agency said.  June's surge followed a 12.4% annual expansion in May and a 20.8% climb in April.  The category has posted robust growth -- well above the 10% level -- since Jan. 1 on the back of expected capital equipment investment outlays by major corporations and the beneficial impact of Japan's continuing personal spending boom.  Orders from overseas, however, crept up on an annual basis in June and fell noticeably from the prior month as part of what was called a natural downturn after unusually brisk May orders.  After seasonal factors are taken into consideration, orders in June rose 8.9% to 1.845 trillion yen.  Hyde Athletic Industries Inc. said Silvershoe Acquisition Corp. may not have enough bank financing to complete its proposed $8.50-a-share acquisition of Hyde.  Separately, Hyde, a maker of athletic footwear, said Silvershoe received an extension of its financing commitment to Sept. 15 for the proposed acquisition.  The financing commitment, from Bank of New York Commercial Corp., was scheduled to expire Wednesday.  Silvershoe was formed by Silvershoe Partners, a general partnership formed by Mayflower Resources with an affiliate of Spear Leeds & Kellogg Co., both of which are New York investment firms.  Hyde said "it appears that a gap exists between the amount {of financing} required to close the transaction and the amount of funding available to Silvershoe under the bank's financing commitment.  It is not clear that this gap will be closed."  Hyde added it requested a meeting with Silvershoe and the bank to discuss the issue.  Hyde shareholders in June approved the acquisition by Silvershoe.  Canada's merchandise trade surplus narrowed to 127 million Canadian dollars (US$107.9 million) in June from a revised C$543 million in May, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  In June, exports fell more than C$1 billion to C$11.1 billion, the lowest level since July 1988.  Imports were down C$914 million to C$11 billion, the lowest level of the past six months and the first substantial drop in imports since September 1988.  ChemDesign Corp., a specialty chemical maker, said it expects third-quarter sales to be "relatively level" with the $10.1 million posted for the second quarter.  The forecast represents an indicated 36% increase from year-earlier third-quarter sales of $7.4 million.  ChemDesign said the "lack of expected growth" in sales from the second to the third quarters owes to a slower-than-expected start-up of a new manufacturing facility, an increase in trial production runs of certain new products and other factors.  Michael G. Repoli, 41 years old, was named president and chief executive officer of the insurer's Baltimore-based Maryland Casualty Co. unit.  Mr. Repoli, who was president of Maryland Casualty's commercial insurance division, fills the positions vacated by Joe D. Heusi, who resigned in July.  This maker of paints, varnishes and other chemical coatings elected Charles E. Bennett a director.  Mr. Bennett, Guardsman's chief financial officer and a vice president, is the third company employee on the 10-member board.  John L. Slack, previously president and chief operating officer of Ardak Corp., was named president and chief executive officer of this defense contractor.  As chief executive, he succeeds Howard N. Hebert, who remains chairman, and as president, Mr. Slack succeeds Gerald A. Nathe, who was named executive vice president and remains chief operating officer.  Mr. Slack also was named a director, expanding board membership to 10.  American Exploration Co., which purchases and operates oil and gas producing properties on behalf of investors, said it agreed to buy interests in 21 producing oil and gas fields in Texas and New Mexico from a unit of Boston-based Cabot Corp., a mineral concern, for $25.7 million.  Canadian steel ingot production totaled 284,207 metric tons in the week ended Saturday, down 6.9% from 305,149 a week earlier and up 25.6% from 226,197 a year earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  For this year through last Saturday, output totaled 9,794,767 tons, up 6.9% from 9,162,673 a year earlier.  French consumer prices in July rose 0.3% from June and were up 3.5% from a year earlier, according to provisional figures released by the National Statistics Institute.  The July result, which follows a monthly rise of 0.1% and a year-to-year gain of 3.6% in June, was within the expectations of economists, who had forecast a rise of between 0.2% and 0.3%.  If the provisional figures are confirmed later by the state agency, this would put the consumer price index, based on the year 1980 equaling 100, at 178.2 or 178.3, up from 177.7 in June and 172.2 in July 1988.  French companies produced 1,562,000 metric tons of crude steel in July, up 3.2% from a year earlier, the National Steel Manufacturers' Association said.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  The July result brings French production for the first seven months of the year to 11,863,000 tons, up 4.9% from a year earlier.  Orders on hand at the 200 largest local manufacturers in June fell 2% from May and were unchanged from a year earlier, according to government figures.  The backlog of orders in the clothing industry, Hong Kong's largest export sector, fell 1% from May and was unchanged from June 1988.  The largest surplus of orders was recorded in the electrical and electronic products sector, which slipped 1% from both May and a year earlier.  The government also said the number of persons employed in the manufacturing sector rose 3% from May, but fell 9% from June 1988.  Per capita earnings in the sector fell 3% from May, but jumped 18% from a year earlier.  Switzerland's trade deficit in July narrowed to 670.1 million Swiss francs ($400.7 million) from a revised gap of 974.1 million francs in June and from 695.1 million francs in July 1988, the government said.  J. Higby's Inc., a franchiser of yogurt shops, said it signed a letter of intent to be acquired by Spinner Corp., a candy and nut concern based in Chino, Calif.  The acquisition will involve an exchange of Higby's stock for newly issued preferred shares in Spinner and warrants to purchase Spinner common.  But precise terms of the exchange weren't disclosed, pending review and approval of the plan by both companies' boards.  Merrill Lynch & Co.'s Merrill Lynch Mortgage Corp. began an offer to purchase all the preference units of Fine Homes International L.P. for $18 each.  The offer, to expire Sept. 14, is part of an agreement by Merrill to sell certain real estate businesses to Prudential Insurance Co. of America for more than $300 million.  It is not conditioned upon any minimum number of shares being tendered.  Merrill Lynch will sell to Prudential, of Newark, N.J., all Fine Homes preference units received as a result of the offer.  In addition, Merrill will sell to Prudential its 74% stake in Fine Homes and its 100% equity interest in Fine Homes' general partner.  Fine Homes, a master limited partnership, operates Merrill Lynch's residential real estate and relocation businesses and several related operations.  GILLETTE Co. sold preferred shares to Warren Buffett that have a conversion premium of 20%, and offered the investor one seat on the board.  An earlier edition misstated the numbers.  (See: "Heard on the Street: Buffett's Savior Role Lands Him Deals Other Holders Can't Get" -- WSJ Aug. 14, 1989)  Capital spending in the manufacturing industry rose 13% in the second quarter from the first quarter and 8% from the year-ago quarter, the Central Statistical Office said.  It said that expenditure totaled #3.138 billion ($1.985 billion), up from #2.773 billion in the first quarter and up from #2.911 billion in the second quarter of 1988.  The second-quarter expenditure represented #2.783 billion of direct spending and #355 million of leased assets.  The office noted that total investment over the past 12 months is 6.5% higher than on the preceding 12 months.  This includes more than an 18% rise for vehicles, almost a 7% increase for plant and machinery but a 3.5% fall for new building work.  Hewlett-Packard Co., citing disappointments in its minicomputer business, reported a 3% drop in net income on a 23% revenue increase for its third quarter ended July 31.  Earnings for the Palo Alto, Calif., maker of computers and electronic instruments were $187 million, or 79 cents a share, compared with $192 million, or 80 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $3 billion from $2.4 billion.  "Obviously the minicomputer flu has caught up with HP," said David Wu, an analyst at S.G. Warburg.  He noted that earlier this year Hewlett-Packard's minicomputer business had performed well in contrast to Digital Equipment Corp. and other makers of computers that run factories, financial departments and other large departments.  On Monday, Hewlett-Packard said it expected earnings to fall significantly below analysts' estimates of about 90 cents a share but gave few explanations for the drop.  In a telephone conference with analysts, Hewlett-Packard offered a fuller explanation of its quarterly results, calling its outlook for minicomputers "uncertain" and blaming order cancellations for what it described as "weakness in demand" for these machines.  The company said that strong sales for its personal computers, printers and workstations offset the weakness in minicomputers, but make forecasting more difficult since many of these products are largely sold through dealers.  This growing reliance on third parties to sell products could hinder Hewlett-Packard's ability to manage its business -- and make the company's stock less attractive to investors.  "You bought HP {stock} in the past because it had more control over its destiny than other electronics firms," Mr. Wu said.  "Today, HP has less control over its future."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Hewlett-Packard fell $1.50 a share to $51.  Hewlett-Packard said that poor forecasts across its diverse businesses resulted in revenue falling $100 million below expectations.  As expected, the company also reported that its net income was reduced 13 cents a share as a result of its acquisition of Apollo Computer Inc. earlier this year.  It said it was pleased with its progress in merging Apollo into its operations, but offered no details about how it plans to address the overlapping workstation products of the two companies.  Wickes Cos. said its board authorized the repurchase of as much as $50 million of its $1.6 billion of publicly traded debt from time to time on the open market.  The repurchases will be funded with proceeds from Wickes's continuing divestiture program.  Wickes, jointly owned by Blackstone Capital Partners Limited Partnership and Wasserstein Perella Partners Limited Partnership, so far has completed the sale of about $700 million in assets, and has agreed to sell its Elco Corp. unit to Kyocera Corp. for about $250 million.  Wickes is a maker of automotive and industrial products, wall coverings and decorative fabrics, and also operates a home-improvement retail chain.  Marathon Oil Co., a unit of USX Corp., said it successfully tested a wildcat well in Columbia County, Arkansas.  The Marathon No. 1 M.D. Haynes Jr. Heirs well flowed at a daily rate of 1.75 million cubic feet of gas and 327 barrels of condensate through a 16/64-inch choke from the Jurassic Haynesville Formation between 10,670 feet and 10,730 feet, Marathon said.  Marathon said it holds a 75% working interest in the well, is the operator and owns more than 1,100 net acres in the area.  Hardy Oil & Gas USA Inc. holds the other 25% working interest.  William P. Vititoe, president of this telecommunications concern's Ameritech Enterprise Group unit, was elected director, increasing board membership to 16.  Alan F. Kane, president of two company subsidiaries, was named president and chief operating officer.  As president, Mr. Kane succeeds Arland D. Dunn, 50 years old, who remains chairman and chief executive officer.  The post of chief operating officer is newly created.  Mr. Kane, 51, was also named a director, increasing board membership to six.  Traditional is a seller of photo packages, usually to newlyweds and new parents in small and rural towns.  The company last month reached a settlement with the Federal Trade Commission over some of its sales practices.  Vito J. Guarino Jr., 51 years old, was elected president of this holding company.  Mr. Guarino succeeds James S. Brown, who will continue as chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Guarino will continue as chief operating officer and as a director of BSD, posts he has held since 1986.  B.A.T Industries PLC is encountering pressure from institutional investors to enhance its share value in response to Sir James Goldsmith's #13.35 billion ($21.11 billion) hostile takeover bid.  The London-based tobacco, retailing and financial services conglomerate is expected to release on Monday or Tuesday a largely traditional British defense strategy to combat the all-paper, highly leveraged bid from Sir James's Hoylake Investments Ltd., an investor group.  Hoylake, whose backers include financiers Jacob Rothschild and Kerry Packer and former U.S. Treasury Secretary William Simon, wants to sell all of B.A.T's businesses except tobacco.  Proceeds would be used to pay more than #10 billion in debt needed to finance the transaction, Europe's biggest takeover bid.  People familiar with B.A.T say the company's plan is to defend B.A.T's performance while assailing Sir James for "glib" mischaracterizations of B.A.T's record.  B.A.T also will go on the offensive, attacking the structure of Hoylake's offer by claiming Sir James and his backers could wind up with a windfall of hundreds of millions of pounds if the bid succeeds.  Specifically, the defense document is expected to say B.A.T has outperformed some of the largest British companies in generating total returns for shareholders over the past six years, and that a criticized diversification into retailing is turning around.  B.A.T will say its 33.06% total annual compound return to shareholders -- share-price growth plus gross dividends reinvested -- led 10 of the largest British companies, including conglomerates and single-industry companies over the period.  According to B.A.T, its performance compares with a 32.05% return for Hanson PLC, 22.6% for British Petroleum Co. and 3.1% for General Electric Co. of Britain, a Hoylake backer.  As things stand, Sir James faces much skepticism about his bid.  Investors want to see a sweetened, largely cash offer, and Sir James seems mired in U.S. regulatory disputes about B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc. unit that could effectively scuttle his effort.  But B.A.T could face longer-term uncertainty even if Sir James's bid fails.  The Anglo-French financier appears to have struck a sympathetic chord among some institutional shareholders with his arguments that B.A.T's value would be increased by "unbundling" its assets.  Sir James appears to have ensured that B.A.T's institutional holders will put pressure on the company to propose ideas that could bolster shareholder value.  "We hope B.A.T will come up with an imaginative defense," says Stewart Gilchrist of Glasgow-based Scottish Amicable Investment Managers, which holds just under 1% of B.A.T.  "It might be a Pyrrhic victory to (defeat) this bid and be left with a dissatisfied shareholder base, which could make (B.A.T) vulnerable" to other subsequent bids.  Several large B.A.T holders say they have held informal conversations recently among themselves about recapitalization proposals and other mechanisms to unlock B.A.T asset values and lock in recent share-price gains.  Such plans could include accelerated sales of underperforming assets and higher payouts to shareholders.  Some institutions also have been in contact with B.A.T about its defense.  Among the institutions believed to be interested in exploring asset-enhancing proposals are Britain's Legal & General, Postel Investment Management and Prudential Assurance Co., according to people familiar with the bid.  Officials at those institutions declined to comment.  Gavin Gemmell, a partner of Baillie Gifford & Co., an Edinburgh, Scotland-based holder, says B.A.T needs to demonstrate "a willingness to dispose of businesses which have not been earning a decent return."  Adds another senior fund manager: "The signal (B.A.T) will be getting from most big shareholders is you need to do something" to increase shareholder value.  "Most shareholders don't want to see Hoylake successful, but if B.A.T doesn't do anything" it will be vulnerable to a breakup either through an improved Hoylake offer or another counterbidder, he adds.  One plan is for B.A.T to recapitalize by offering shares in four major operating divisions.  At least one British merchant bank, Baring Brothers & Co., is said to be discussing such a plan.  People close to B.A.T say the company wants to "leave the door open" to such proposals, without yet showing what it may have in mind.  Some investors also expect the group to move forward its first-half earnings announcement, now due Sept. 6.  Scottish Amicable's Mr. Gilchrist suspects B.A.T "will have something up its sleeve" along the lines of earnings projections and dividend forecasts that would underpin B.A.T's share price at the 650 pence ($10.28) to 700 pence ($11.07) level even if the Hoylake offer is defeated.  B.A.T shares were trading below 600 pence as recently as four months ago.  Sir James says his bid currently values B.A.T at about 878 pence a share.  In London trading yesterday, B.A.T shares fell six pence, to 817 pence.  Bryce J. Christensen, editor, in the August issue of The Family in America, a Rockford Institute monthly:  In a study commissioned just this year, researchers at Stanford University established that third-generation Asian Americans do worse in school than first-generation Asian Americans, because they apply themselves less assiduously to their studies.  Since third-generation Asian Americans surely speak English better than first-generation Asian Americans, this is a particularly disturbing finding.  The Stanford study suggests that as "Asian Americans adopt more American styles of parenting, their children may be less successful."  Barbara Schneider, a professor of education at Northwestern University, likewise finds the highest level of academic achievement in the first and second generations.  "By the third generation, the Asian Americans were more interested in courtship and cars than in school."  Like senior executives in Detroit and Pittsburgh, the natives of Matabeleland and the Masai Mara resist environmental programs unless they bring immediate economic advantage.  Equally, they resent what they perceive as elitist promoters of onerous conservation policies.  For a man responsible for quarterly profits or tomorrow's meal, it can be hard to take the long view.  Environmental and conservation programs generally cannot function without local support, or at least tolerance.  The best way to secure that support is with economic incentives, whether in the form of jobs or tax benefits.  In Africa, it has been a long struggle.  The first game conservation laws were imposed by the Dutch at Cape Town in 1657, to prevent farmers from exterminating the hippopotamuses and elephants that damaged their crops.  The international wildlife conference held in London in 1900 was the first meeting to recognize the global nature of conservation.  It stimulated the colonial powers, particularly the hunting-mad and animal-loving British, to establish wildlife preserves and enforce game protection.  Most post-colonial governments inherited effective park and conservation programs.  Almost without exception, these decayed rapidly under the new administrations.  Africa has suffered a greater destruction of habitat and wildlife in the past 30 years than in all its previous modern history.  In the better colonial programs, such as Kenya's, indigenous support for a balanced policy of conservation and licensed hunting was obtained by paying a fraction of the hunting license revenues directly to the area's tribal population.  But generally the policies were suited to European sensibilities and recreations.  Although Africans were employed as gametrackers and safari servants, the protected animals, and the habitat, became forbidden fruit to blacks who watched rich white visitors shoot and feast on game that was denied to them.  To them, the old policies seemed to favor animals and whites over blacks.  Instead of adapting the old programs to embrace the needs of local populations, the newly independent governments of Africa permitted commercial poaching, corruption, incompetent administration, population pressure and poor land husbandry to ravage wildlife.  Thus today only 3,500 black rhinoceroses and 600,000 elephants survive in Africa, down from 100,000 and two million 30 years ago.  In the past eight years, the elephant population has been halved.  The white rhinoceros, wiped out almost everywhere in Africa, is now being re-introduced to other countries from South Africa.  Today, thinking conservationists -- including Tanzania's Marxist president, Kenya's old white hunters, and Washington's elephant lobbyists -- all agree that economic incentives are essential to wildlife preservation.  Unless the rural African supports the effort, it becomes a guerrilla war between poachers and rangers.  To be saved, the animals must pay their way.  Local villagers should benefit more from tourist and hunting revenues, both with jobs and with project grants derived from the money attracted by the animals.  Game rangers must be properly paid.  Abusing the wildlife -- whether the culprits are video-mad tourists, poachers, corrupt officials, or shopkeepers in Tokyo, New York and Dubai -- must be made prohibitively expensive.  The destruction of habitat, disruption of mating and eating habits and chasing of animals for photographs by the nearly one million tourists who visit East Africa each year are far harder on the game than were the few thousand licensed hunters in the old days.  Each should pay a conservation fee.  The Arab emirates, the U.S. and -- the worst offender of all -- Japan must close their markets for ivory and rhino horn, as the European Community did on Aug.11.  Properly controlled, licensed hunting can be an important element in conservation, as the Tanzanian example demonstrates.  There, hunting revenues pay game wardens and help subsidize rural development.  In Zimbabwe, where culled elephants are a source of meat, farmers may sell hunting rights on their land, and are thereby given an incentive to conserve the game.  In Kenya, by contrast, 80% of the elephants and 90% of the rhinos have been exterminated since the end of licensed hunting in 1977.  Here in the U.S., we correctly condemn foreign environmental atrocities.  But Africans, Latins and Asians will not respect our advice unless our own conduct is consistent with it.  If the rich abuse the environment, why should the poor sacrifice to save it?  As we recommend to other countries, so our own national policy should construct appropriate incentives for individual and corporate America.  Drastic fines and generous tax incentives, even awards, would make a difference, whether in increasing energy efficiency and so abating global warming, or in reducing wasteful packaging and chemical pollution.  An environmental aim is the establishment of a price on such limited resources as clean air and water, so that manufactures and consumers pay the complete cost of a product.  Today, one consuming American degrades the global environment more than a host of Sudanese.  Of course we should encourage Brazil to protect the greatest rain forest of the southern hemisphere.  But we ourselves are now destroying 500-year-old trees of the greatest rain forest in the northern hemisphere, the Tongas Forest of Alaska.  It should not be profitable for a barefoot poacher to machine-gun a rhino and chop open its face, or for an entrepreneur to burn the Amazon forest.  And it should not be rewarding in American business to poison the air and water.  Yet automotive executives still pay engineers to contrive presentations intended to persuade congressional committees that cleaner and more efficient automobiles are impractical.  It is all the same game.  ---  Mr. Bull, a lawyer and the former publisher of the Village Voice wrote "Safari" (Viking, 1988).  Jacobs Engineering Group Inc., an engineering, design and construction firm, said it received two contracts, with a combined value of $50 million over the next five years, to conduct hazardous-waste investigations at certain government and commercial facilities around the country.  One contract, awarded by Environmental Management Operations, a Richmond, Wash.-based unit of Battelle Memorial Institute, is for hazardous-waste investigations at certain installations of the U.S. Department of Energy, the Department of Defense, and other federal facilities.  Under the second contract, Jacobs will provide technical support, as a subcontractor to Metcalf & Eddy Inc., to the Environmental Protection Agency in 15 states.  Work for the EPA will include general technical support, and investigations and evaluations of groundwater monitoring systems, incinerators, land disposal facilities, and underground storage tanks.  Radiation Systems Inc. said its SatCom Technologies division received a $50 million contract from Philips Electronics Co. to design, manufacture, install and service communication equipment for schools that subscribe to privately held Whittle Communication Limited Partnership's Educational Network.  Philips Electronics, a U.S. unit of Netherlands-based Philips N.V., will make the television sets for Whittle's news service, which will also carry advertising when it debuts in March.  The 20-month contract calls for SatCom to provide and maintain 5,800 to 9,500 satellite antennas and receiving systems in schools subscribing to the network.  The equipment is being provided to the schools free of charge.  Radiation Systems, a specialty communications concern, said it will add more than 580 employees to fulfill the contract.  Robert Goldberg's July 31 Leisure & Arts article "Offended?  Don't Watch]" reflected the same weak mind-set so often heard from most journalists about the right to print and publish, broadcast and televise anything, no matter how vulgar and offensive it might be.  As always these First Amendment conveyers of enlightenment have the simple solution: "Turn the dial or flip the switch" or "You don't have to read it."  This solution sounds very much like the old saying, "If you ignore it, it will go away."  I wonder what would happen if we took the same attitude about some other forms of pollution:  WATER POLLUTION: "Just don't drink the water."  AIR POLLUTION: "Don't breathe the air."  TRASH ON STREETS: "Don't use the streets."  WHEN BLACKS ARE TOLD TO SIT IN THE BACK OF THE BUS: "Just don't ride the bus anymore."  WHEN JEWS ARE GASSED IN GERMANY: "Don't have anything else to do with the Germans."  Pollution comes in many forms, and every responsible citizen has the right and even the duty to keep our environment clean -- even the print and electronic -- media environment.  Jack Williams  Nashville, Tenn.  ---  I'm offended, so I won't buy the products of those who continue advertising on programs that belong in the trash.  Many consumers who watch television have tried input with the networks and are completely ignored in regard to good-quality or uplifting programming.  The advertisers are now listening to consumers.  Mr. Goldberg, you feel 100% American in watching what you choose; I feel it is un-American to suggest the removal of our right to boycott products.  J.M. Robertson  Oklahoma City  ---  Mr. Goldberg uses the old junkyard owner's ploy as a defense for a degenerating entertainment medium.  Junkyard owners, in response to community complaints, frequently will say, "If it offends you, don't look at it."  The problem, as we all know, is that once it has been put there the offense is complete.  Mr. Goldberg labels those who demand higher standards for television as "squeaky wheels, the outraged fringe citizens, the self-appointed guardians of public morality."  Name-calling long has been the refuge for those who either refuse to or are unable to recognize the real issue, which in this case is the broadcasting of programs into the American living room loaded with offensive language and off-color innuendos.  He implies that TV viewing takes place in the absence of children and is solely a matter for adults, who have the maturity to accommodate inappropriate language, extreme violence and snickering references to sex.  Can he actually not know better?  His reference to James Joyce's writing as a parallel to TV is vacuous at best.  Children don't read Joyce.  What was ostensibly a review about "Married . . .  With Children" was in fact an undisguised diatribe directed toward those who insist on higher moral standards from an industry that obtains its broadcasting license from the government of the American people.  For Mr. Goldberg and the rest of the world's libertarians, the bottom line is this: Foul-language programming laced with sleazy innuendos will continue to be fought with product boycott so that, as he says in his column, we viewers once again may be "looking cleaner, smelling better, feeling 100% American."  Jack Hawbaker  Hagerstown, Md.  ---  I'm in total agreement with Mr. Goldberg.  Whenever I hear that a TV show has let a very vocal minority control what is watched on TV by refusing to buy the show's sponsored products, I make a mental note not to watch a program that has no backbone to stand up to this kind of blackmail.  And another thing: Such protesting by members of an offended minority only makes the shows they dislike more appealing.  As my father used to say, "The dogooders will do the world in."  Diane Doguardi  Nashville, Tenn.  The Northwest Airlines unit of NWA Inc. confirmed an agreement to order as many as 30 Airbus Industrie A-330 and A-340 aircraft valued at about $2.7 billion.  The order stems from a 1987 agreement Northwest signed to purchase as many as 20 A-340s for delivery starting in 1992.  At the time, the airline also obtained an option to purchase as many as 10 A-330s.  Under the latest agreement, Northwest said it would buy 20 A-340 long-range airliners and six A-330 medium-range jets.  It obtained four options to purchase either A340s or A-330s-a modification of the earlier agreement.  The 1987 agreement expired in April but Northwest said Airbus held the terms open.  Northwest said it will begin taking delivery of the A-340 aircraft in 1992 for use on trans-Pacific routes.  The A-330s, scheduled to be delivered in 1995, are scheduled to be flown on domestic and trans-Atlantic routes.  The airline, whose parent company was taken over last month by investor Alfred Checchi, wouldn't release details about how it plans to finance the transaction.  In February, Northwest ordered 10 A-330s.  Money-market mutual funds added another $2.29 billion in assets in the week ended Wednesday and now stand at a record $340.51 billion.  "Individuals kept pouring money into general-purpose and broker-dealer money-market funds as the recent easing of yields offered by the funds last week came to a halt," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist of the Investment Company Institute.  "Also, the yield differential favoring money-market funds over alternative investment outlets available to individuals widened somewhat," he added.  The institute is a Washington-based organization of mutual funds that tracks 462 taxable funds.  On Wednesday, Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass., newsletter, reported the seven-day average yield for taxable funds was 8.68%.  The average yield was unchanged in the week, after having fallen since mid-May.  Specifically, the institute said 140 institutional funds it tracks decreased in assets by $1.05 billion to $85.48 billion.  Mr. Dreyer said, "Institutional investors, on the other hand, took advantage of a steep run-up in yields on direct money-market instruments -- mostly large-denomination certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and commercial paper -- and shifted some of their assets out of money-market funds into these instruments."  The 95 broker-dealer funds tracked by the institute added $1.61 billion to $146.26 billion.  The 227 general-purpose funds increased $1.74 billion to $108.76 billion.  A survey of a somewhat smaller group of funds released by Donoghue's also showed assets at a record.  Assets of the 387 money-market funds it follows rose by $1.1 billion in the week ended Tuesday, to $332.3 billion.  Gerber Products Co. said it voluntarily recalled recently produced Toasted Oat Rings toddler snackfood.  The move came after the baby-food manufacturer began receiving reports that some youngsters had "swallowing difficulties" with the recently modified form of the product.  Gerber said the recall covers all 162,000 boxes of the product bearing "better if used by" codes 30MAY90 through 15AUG90, which were manufactured from late May until a few days ago.  A company spokesman said no children had been killed or injured by the product.  A late-spring change in the manufacturing process for the small doughnut-shaped biscuits "rendered the product crispier," he said, and some smaller children who weren't able to chew ran into problems swallowing them.  The new form of Toasted Oat Rings only recently showed up on grocery store shelves, Gerber said, and when a handful of callers to its toll-free hotline mentioned the problem in recent days, the company moved to withdraw the product "in keeping with Gerber high quality standards."  Gerber said it doesn't anticipate the recall will have a significant impact on earnings.  Vestron Inc. said it sued Security Pacific Corp.'s main bank unit, claiming its business was seriously damaged as a result of the bank's withdrawal of a credit line.  The movie and videocassette company charged Security Pacific National Bank with breach of contract, business defamation, interference with prospective advantage and fraud.  The suit, filed in federal court in Los Angeles, seeks unspecified damages and asks the court to require Security Pacific to provide Vestron with a $100 million credit line on terms agreed to last August.  Last October, the bank terminated the credit line, causing serious financial problems for Vestron.  In Los Angeles, Dick Warner, executive vice president of Security Pacific National Bank, said the suit is "absolutely without merit and we will defend against it vigorously and successfully."  The complaint asserts that the injury to Vestron was compounded by the bank's "false claim" that Vestron had sustained a material adverse change in its financial condition between August and October 1988.  Austin O. Furst Jr., Vestron's chairman and chief executive officer, said: "We relied on the bank's contractual commitment . . . when the bank reneged, Vestron's long-term financing collapsed.  Vestron tried to replace the line of credit, but was unable to do so.  This has forced us to abandon significant elements of our business plan and has triggered massive financial losses."  Vestron, which produces and distributes movies and distributes videocassettes, announced last month that its financial adviser, Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, would begin exploring various alternatives, including the sale of all or part of the company.  A spokesman said Merrill Lynch continues to work with Vestron, and "there is some interest" on the part of unidentified potential buyers in Vestron's 83-store videocassette chain.  For the first quarter, Vestron reported a loss of $2.6 million, including a loss of $3.7 million from the video-store business, which Vestron is counting as a discontinued operation.  Sales were $65.8 million.  In the year-earlier quarter, Vestron reported net income of $13 million, or 35 cents a share.  U.S. food companies, struggling to jump on the gourmet-food wagon, are renewing their efforts to cook up fancy chilled fare.  Despite previous flops within this niche, Campbell Soup Co., Kraft General Foods and Nestle Enterprises Inc. all are test-marketing prepackaged, refrigerated fresh foods that need only be toted home and heated or lightly cooked.  And Nestle S.A.'s Carnation Co. already sells a limited line of chilled fare nationwide and says it may expand.  Theirs is a risky bid to win over young, affluent tastebuds, inspired partly by the success of London-based Marks & Spencer PLC and the challenge that the company poses as it expands in the U.S.  Britain's second-largest retailer, Marks & Spencer sells food under its St. Michael private label.  Last year, the company said it hoped to introduce American shoppers to its chilled fare through Kings Supermarkets Inc., a small chain of upscale New Jersey grocers that it had just acquired.  Except to say that a coming launch of new food lines would be "significant," a spokeswoman last week wouldn't elaborate on the company's plans.  Marks & Spencer officials also declined to comment.  American competitors, meanwhile, are working on their own recipes for chilled food, not to be confused with frozen food.  "Almost every major food processor is either in development or test market," says Richard Cristol, executive director of the Chilled Foods Association, an Atlanta-based industry lobby.  And "everyone has been waiting with bated breath to see what {Marks & Spencer} is going to do.  They certainly have the wherewithal and the expertise and the experience to do a fine job if they want to."  Perhaps.  But anyone trying to sell chilled food in the U.S. faces a big batch of problems.  Manufacturers haven't yet hit upon a formula for delivering a wide range of refrigerated fare to sprawling American markets.  Even if the logistical problems are solved, U.S. shoppers, bombarded with an ever-expanding choice of deli sections and precooked carryout meals, might not go for chilled food, which has the disadvantage of being fairly pricey.  Marks & Spencer, in particular, may find it needs to tailor its selections to suit jazzier American tastes and nutritional obsessions.  Marks & Spencer is a pioneer in prepackaged, refrigerated food.  Its St. Michael fare has become a badge of British yuppiedom, with such fresh offerings as Salmon en Croute with cream sauce, Spaghetti Carbonara and Crepes Suzettes.  Those dishes range in price from #3.39 ($5.34) for two servings of salmon, to #1.35 for the carbonara.  The robust food business helped boost overall sales at Marks & Spencer, which also stocks clothes and housewares, to #5.12 billion in the year ended March 31.  Food accounted for #1.91 billion, or 37% of total sales.  In Britain, Marks & Spencer is renowned for its close relationship with farms and factories, and for its rigid demands for quality.  The company even deploys its own specially designed trucks, called the Cold Chain, across Britain to its 264 stores daily.  Such a complex system is difficult to match in the U.S., where distribution chains are long.  Indeed, James H. Moran, public-relations director for Campbell, cites distribution problems as one reason why the company withdrew its Fresh Chef line of refrigerated sauces, soups and salads two years ago.  Now, Campbell is trying again.  In Philadelphia, it is test-marketing Fresh Kitchen, a new line of refrigerated sauces, entrees and desserts.  "We think refrigerated {food} has a high potential," Mr. Moran says.  "When we withdrew Fresh Chef, we said we would be back because this is a segment we are very much interested in."  He declines to discuss Fresh Kitchen's test results or to say how Campbell might distribute the products nationally.  Culinova fresh entrees, launched in 1986 by Philip Morris Cos.'s General Foods Corp., hit similar distribution problems.  Last December, shortly after Philip Morris bought Kraft Inc., the struggling line was scrapped.  But Kraft General Foods, the offspring of Philip Morris's acquisition, is pressing ahead with the Chillery line of entrees, salads, pasta and desserts originally developed by Kraft.  It is test-marketing Chillery in Kansas City, with such offerings as beef teriyaki at $3.49, seafood salad at $2.89, and cheesecake for $1.39.  Like Campbell, Kraft General Foods declines to discuss specific future plans for its chilled food.  But Mary Kay Haben, a Kraft General Foods vice president, confesses to getting "a real charge out of going into the {Marks & Spencer} store in London and seeing the cases and cases of chilled food.  It's an energizer to see how the chilled-foods category has developed in the U.K. and to think about what it could be here."  Nestle, the Swiss giant, has jumped into the U.S. chilled-food market on two fronts.  Its Nestle Enterprises subsidiary, based in Solon, Ohio, is test-marketing a line of upscale entrees and salads called FreshNes.  Currently sold in Cleveland and Columbus, Ohio, FreshNes will move to more test markets this fall, says Milton C. Miles, president of Nestle's FreshNes unit, though he declines to name them.  Nestle's Carnation division already has nationwide distribution of chilled food.  But so far, the Los Angeles-based unit sells only refrigerated pastas and sauces, packaged separately under the Contadina Fresh label.  Food-industry experts say that those types of products are less temperature-sensitive than fancy entrees.  Carnation is looking at broadening its refrigerated-food line, says Richard Curd, a company spokesman, although he too declines to elaborate.  Mr. Cristol, the industry lobbyist, hopes that within a year technological breakthroughs will permit wider distribution of chilled food.  He admits that the obstacles are formidable.  "You've got to make the transporters aware of what they're carrying; food retailers have to understand how to rotate stock and watch shelf-life dates," he says.  And supermarket refrigeration cases must be checked to ensure they maintain a constant temperature.  Chilled food spoils quickly if mishandled.  To allay consumer fears about freshness, Campbell's Fresh Kitchen packages include a temperature-sensitive patch that turns blue if the food hasn't been refrigerated properly.  But the very concept of fresh refrigerated food still could prove tough to sell in the U.S. Like most Europeans, Britons are accustomed to shopping every day in stores where perishables dwindle by evening.  Not so in the U.S. "Being in business in an American supermarket is defined as having all your shelves full," says Mona Doyle, president of the Consumer Network, a Philadelphia market-research and consulting firm.  As a British company, Marks & Spencer may face some handicaps in translating its recipes.  Americans, for instance, follow food fads.  A spicy St. Michael chicken dish might appeal initially, but "the American taste changes every day.  What's hot today is gone tomorrow," says Philip Lempert, president of Lempert Co., a Washington, D.C., consulting firm for food marketing and advertising.  The dishes also have to be healthful, especially to lure the young, affluent crowd.  Mr. Lempert says Americans will want to know if St. Michael food is low in fat and high in fiber or oat bran, a concept incomprehensible to most British shoppers.  "The question is whether Marks & Spencer can meet American needs," he says.  "I'm not sure they understand the American palate."  Chilled-food's biggest challenge, however, may prove to be the growing array of premium, easy-to-prepare food in big U.S. supermarket chains.  Safeway Stores Inc., for example, is experimenting with carryout Chinese food in 16 stores.  Delis, salad bars and in-store bakeries have been staples at major supermarkets for years.  "There's a tremendous proliferation of take-home food," Ms. Doyle says.  "That makes the competition for this kind of {refrigerated} product that much greater."  Price could also turn into a big consideration for a majority of shoppers.  Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co., for one, believes most consumers want "gourmet quality but not at a gourmet price," says Richard de Santa, the company's communications director.  So A&P sells refrigerated main courses at its 30 fancier Food Emporium stores in Manhattan and tony New York suburbs -- not at its mainstream A&P supermarkets.  Mr. Lempert, the consultant, agrees that the market is limited.  Americans "are willing to raise themselves one or two notches" up the scale of gourmet taste, Mr. Lempert says.  But Marks & Spencer, in particular, "wants them to go from level one to level nine in one jump, and that might not work."  The Federal Aviation Administration proposed fining a Texas company $240,000, alleging that it improperly shipped hazardous materials that caused an in-flight fire on a passenger jet last year.  The fine, which would be the largest ever for violations of the FAA's hazardous materials regulations, would be imposed on Textile Treatments International of Austin, Texas.  A shipment by the company of hydrogen peroxide solution caused a cargo-hold fire on board an American Airlines passenger flight Feb. 3, 1988, federal regulators said.  "Passengers and flight attendants began smelling fumes in the cabin area and noticed that the floor was hot" as the plane approached Nashville, Tenn., at an altitude of 5,000 feet, the FAA said.  Firefighters promptly extinguished the flames from the middle baggage compartment after the plane landed, but an emergency evacuation resulted in several injuries among the passengers and crew.  Federal regulations forbid shipping hydrogen peroxide aboard passenger or cargo flights.  The FAA said the company violated 26 FAA rules, including several governing the "labelling and packaging" of hazardous materials.  Textile Treatments International Vice President Charles Busby, to whom the FAA's notice was sent, didn't return phone calls.  FAA officials said the company could seek adjudication by an administrative law judge if it disagrees with the proposed penalty.  COLUMBIA FIRST FEDERAL SAVINGS & LOAN Association (Arlington, Va.) -- Thomas J. Schaefer, formerly president and chief executive officer of Signet Bank in Washington, was named president and chief executive of this thrift.  Mr. Schaefer, 51 years old, succeeds Dewitt T. Hartwell, who retired.  Mr. Schaefer and Marvin Lenkin were elected directors, increasing the board's membership to 12.  Olza M. "Tony" Nicely, formerly executive vice president, was named president of this automobile insurer's Government Employees Insurance Co. subsidiary.  Mr. Nicely, 46 years old, succeeds Eugene J. Meyung, who retired.  Also, Delano E. Lewis was elected a director, increasing the board's size to 11.  Douglas R. Cummings, J.M. Graves and Bert H. Mackie were elected to the board of this natural-gas distribution concern.  Mr. Cummings is president of Cummings Oil Co. of Oklahoma City.  Mr. Graves is president of J.M. Graves Oil Co. of Tulsa, and Mr. Mackie is executive vice president of Security National Bank in Enid, Okla.  The appointments bring the board's total membership to 16.  Kenneth D. Roberts, a financial consultant and formerly vice president and chief financial officer of Massachusetts Computer Corp., was named a director of this laser maker, succeeding William McInnes.  Navcom Defense Electronics Inc. received a $67.1 million Air Force contract for a radar altimeter system.  General Electric Co. won a $17.5 million Navy contract for engines for aircraft being sold to Kuwait.  Charles Stark Draper Laboratory Inc. received a $10 million Air Force contract for guidance and control work.  Carl J. Schlemmer, formerly general manager of General Electric Co.'s transportation systems business operations, was named a director of this engineered products concern, filling a vacancy created by the retirements of Martha Gasche and Doug Jones, as Autoclave reduced its board membership to 10 from 11.  Navistar International Corp. said continuing production problems led to a 41% plunge in fiscal third-quarter earnings.  And with truck orders on the downswing, it braced for an even more dismal fourth quarter.  The company said tumbling industry orders for medium and heavy-duty trucks will lead to production cuts, layoffs and possibly a fourth-quarter loss.  Navistar also temporarily suspended production at two plants, while Ford Motor Co. did the same for a week at its Louisville, Ky., plant that makes medium and heavy-duty trucks.  "The {truck} buyers are playing wait and see" with their orders, said Mary Anne Sudol, an analyst at Fitch Investors Service Inc., a credit rating company in New York.  Navistar's latest results show it had trouble making money even when its truck sales were growing.  In the third quarter ended July 31, Navistar said profit fell to $27.6 million, or eight cents a share, from $46.8 million, or 15 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 5% to $1.03 billion from $975.8 million a year earlier.  The production problems, which earlier in the year hurt second-quarter earnings, were caused in part by an ambitious program to introduce 26 new truck models.  The company said yesterday that "excess production costs and production inefficiencies" continued in the third quarter, and have yet to be resolved.  Now, the company is preparing for the effects of an industry downturn in orders after more than two years of strong growth.  Navistar said the industry's heavy-duty truck orders tumbled one-third during the company's third quarter, as orders for medium trucks fell 18%.  Because of a lag between orders and actual sales, the downturn doesn't hit the company's books until the fourth quarter.  The fall-off in truck orders reflects a hesitance on the part of customers to make big capital commitments without knowing whether the economy will be strong enough in future months to make the expenditures worthwhile.  Heavy-duty trucks, which weigh more than 33,000 pounds and pull big trailers, can easily cost more than $60,000.  "I haven't seen a real consensus on where the economy is going," said a Navistar spokesman.  "In that climate, many customers delay major purchases."  The order fall-off could help ease some of the production problems, which were aggravated earlier in the year when plants operated at near capacity.  The spokesman said production at the company's main assembly plant in Springfield, Ohio, already cut to 350 trucks a day from 368, will be further cut to 298 trucks Sept. 18.  But that won't help earnings, because Navistar said the lower production levels and the costs associated with the schedule reductions will put fourth-quarter net below that of the third quarter and could even result in a "small loss" for the fourth quarter.  In last year's final quarter, Navistar earned $82 million, or 29 cents a share, on sales of $1.13 billion.  Navistar shares, which traded as high as $6.75 earlier this year, eased 25 cents to $4.875 yesterday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The spokesman said the company doesn't know how many workers will be laid off, but said the number could be in the hundreds.  The Springfield plant now has about 6,200 employees.  Navistar has already cut production of heavy trucks at its Chatham, Ontario, plant to 49 a day from 54, and on Monday suspended assembly operations for five days at Springfield and 10 days at Chatham.  Separately, a Ford Motor spokesman said the last time the No. 2 auto maker closed its Louisville truck plant because of poor market conditions was in 1987.  The plant has about 2,500 workers.  For the nine months ended July 31, Navistar said earnings fell to $100.4 million, or 31 cents a share, from $161.7 million, or 55 cents a share, a year earlier.  The year-earlier period included a gain of $24 million from the settlement of Canadian pension obligations and a charge of $15 million to settle a lawsuit.  Sales rose 4% to $3.07 billion from $2.95 billion.  ---  Neal Templin in Detroit contributed to this story.  Nigel Tully is a 45-year-old Londoner.  See if you can guess what he does for a living.  Mr. Tully is a businessman who works with computers and electric guitars.  Sometimes he wears a pin-stripe suit to work, but often he dresses casually, in an open-collar shirt.  He travels all over Britain, with occasional forays to the Continent, the Middle East and White Plains, N.Y.  He frequently works nights, usually starting at about 10 p.m.  But he works days, too.  Hint: a rock 'n' roll band is involved.  He manages the band, right?  Yes, but there's more.  He plays in the band?  Right again, but keep going.  He works for IBM?  You're getting warmer.  All of the above?  Bingo.  With his Jiminy Cricket spectacles, Nigel Tully looks a bit like Clark Kent, which is appropriate since he leads a double life.  By day he's an account executive in marketing for IBM (he's handled the British Telecom account for 12 years).  And at night he grabs his electric guitar, saxophone and harmonica and jives with his five-man rock 'n' roll dance band, the Dark Blues.  You probably haven't heard of the Dark Blues, but that just means you haven't attended the right parties.  The band, formed in 1962 when Mr. Tully was a physics student at Oxford, has played at countless society weddings, debutante parties, bar mitzvahs and hunt balls all over Britain.  Harpers and Queen, the English society magazine, calls them "Britain's most popular party musicians."  They played at Windsor Castle when Princess Anne made her debut in society.  They played at Buckingham Palace when the Queen and Prince Philip celebrated their 25th wedding anniversary.  And they were back at the palace last November for Prince Charles's 40th birthday party, playing hits by Stevie Wonder, Simon & Garfunkel and Michael Jackson. (Mr.  Tully's drawing room is graced by a framed note from the future king, thanking him for "playing so energetically.")  Britain's royals aren't the only bluebloods who boogey to the Dark Blues.  King Hussein of Jordan flew the band out twice in the late 1970s.  It played for guests that included the Shah of Iran at the king's private beach in Aqaba near the Israeli border.  "Israeli radar kept coming through our amplifiers," Mr. Tully recalls.  They also played for parties thrown by Mr. and Mrs. Charles Price during his recent stint as U.S. ambassador to Britain.  Princess Diana attended one and requested the Glenn Miller hit, "In the Mood."  "The important thing always is to make people dance," says Mr. Tully, seated in his London home after watching his nine-year-old son play cricket on a non-gig night.  "What I love is when the crowd wave their arms in the air and shout for more at two o'clock in the morning."  The Dark Blues, who perform 120 times a year, usually play "Land of a Thousand Dances," the old James Brown hit, to get people jumping, but with a repertoire of more than 2,000 songs, there's plenty of choice.  They play everything from Glenn Miller to Madonna, the Supremes to Strauss (the Blue Danube gets dusted off when they need a waltz).  "We make Bruce Springsteen's sets look short," says Mr. Tully.  Among the songs they played at Prince Charles's birthday party were "Rock Around the Clock," "American Pie," "Billie Jean," the old Elton John hit "Your Song" (the singer was at the party), and "God Save the Queen."  "We didn't do anything very way out because it was a gentle sort of ball," says Mr. Tully.  Indeed, the band had learned all the songs on Michael Jackson's "Bad" album, a special favorite of the Princess of Wales, but decided hits like "Dirty Diana" weren't quite right for the occasion.  "There are two types of live party bands," says Mr. Tully, turning philosophical.  "One kind goes on stage and knows exactly what they'll play that night.  But we never know what we'll play."  As band leader, Mr. Tully sizes up the crowd, the moment and the mood, then chooses a song that seems appropriate.  The songs have changed, but the approach dates from the days when Mr. Tully, a native of Birmingham, formed his first band, The Fourbeats, while a student at Oxford University.  Like most British rock buffs back then, his idols were American -- James Brown, Roy Orbison, Bo Didley, Otis Redding and Elvis.  But Mr. Tully didn't care about writing his own songs or developing his own sound.  "All I wanted was to reproduce their music as well as I could, note for note," he says.  And that's what his band has always done. (The name Dark Blues is a pun on Oxford's colors and "the blues.") "I was very, very commercial," says Mr. Tully, who sported bell-bottom trousers and flower-power shirts in the '60s.  "I wanted applause, I wanted a successful band, and I wanted people to enjoy it."  He also wanted to continue playing after Oxford, which was one reason he went to work for IBM upon graduation in 1964.  Big Blue offered him a job in London, the center of the universe for British party bands, and he has never moved.  The bigwigs at IBM, in turn, have never complained about his musical moonlighting or his hair, which was fashionably long in the '70s, at least by rock-music standards.  The band, which currently gets $2,400 per gig, has played at a number of IBM parties, including a five-day gathering in Morocco for top sales people this summer.  Mr. Tully, who is married and has two children, plans to press on with his music, like Mick Jagger, Eric Clapton and other aging rockers of his generation.  The band already has many confirmed bookings for 1991, including a hunt ball organized by Mr. Tully's wife, Prue. (The couple met in 1975 when Prue hired the Dark Blues to play.)  And there's always the chance of another royal engagement, though Mr. Tully insists the last fulfilled the wish of a lifetime.  Pop singer Phil Collins also performed at Prince Charles's party, and on a souvenir map of Buckingham Palace given to party guests, the Dark Blues received top billing over the famous Mr. Collins.  Nigel Tully grins.  "It's my most prized possession."  ---  Ms. Trucco is a free-lance journalist based in London.  Anthony Dilweg's grandfather, Lavvie, starred at end on the championship Green Bay Packer teams of 1929, '30 and '31, and his dad, Robert, played for Marquette University in nearby Milwaukee.  So one might think that the young man grew to 6-foot-3 tossing footballs in Bethesda, Md., and later at Duke University, pulsating for a chance to perform in the ancestral homeland.  Not quite.  "I was always a Washington Redskins fan, but Green Bay was my No. 2 team," says the candid rookie quarterback candidate at the summer camp of the National Football League entry.  "I was glad to be drafted by the Packers, though.  There was the family connection, of course, and I'd read the newspapers and knew I'd get a good shot at playing here."  The Pack is glad to have Dilweg, too, partly because being No. 2 in anyone's heart is better than the numbers that follow, and partly because the young man is smart enough to read the newspapers.  The offense installed by Lindy Infante, the team's second-year coach, requires players who can run and think at the same time, a capacity lacking in a number of the lads he found when he arrived.  Infante, a professorial-looking fellow, is fond of saying that some members of his '88 Pack were bit a square in skull or stern for the round holes he wanted them to fill, and that the lack of fit contributed to the team's 4-12 won-lost record.  But progress has been made, he avers, noting, "We whittled some edges, got some new people and got rid of some old ones."  He concludes: "We're ahead of where we were last year at this time, and we expect to stay that way.  I'm not smart enough to predict records, but I definitely think we'll improve."  That would be good news in places other than this lakeside burg of 88,000 souls, because the Pack probably is a lot of people's second-favorite football team.  Formed in 1919 and named for a local meat packer that supplied its jerseys, it joined the fledgling NFL in 1921, when the loop had franchises in cities instead of "markets" and included places like Canton, Ohio, Muncie, Ind., Rock Island, Ill., and Tonawanda, N.Y.  It alone survives to carry the banner of small-town America in the councils of big-time American sports.  For a while, the Pack not only belonged to the NFL, it ruled it.  Its 11 league crowns are a record, and its five in the 1960s under coach Vince Lombardi -- in '61, '62, '65, '66 and '67 -- caused zealots to rename the place "Titletown, U.S.A."  Alas, the gods reacted predictably to such hubris, and the Packers have had only four plus-.500 seasons since their last championship.  They last made the playoffs in the strike-shortened 1982 campaign.  That folks here take their football seriously has never been in doubt; someone dispatched the dog of Dan Devine, the second of St. Vince's five successors, after a disappointing loss.  They still turn out along the chain-link fence on Oneida Avenue, across from Lambeau Field, to watch the team huff through its summer labors, but expectations seem to have diminished.  "Most people would be happy with a .500 record this year," remarked retiree B.P. Habeck.  "We're not spoiled like we used to be."  Things would look a good deal brighter in Packerland if rookie offensive tackle Tony Mandarich were among the pre-season campers.  At 6-foot-5 and 315 muscle-packed pounds, he's big enough to fill several holes of any shape, which is why the team made him its top choice in the last college-player draft, and the No. 2 pick overall.  Trouble is, the massive Mandarich also can read the papers.  He read that the Dallas Cowboys are paying quarterback Troy Aikman, the only man drafted ahead of him, something like $2 million a year for six years, and says he regards the Pack's offer of less than half that amount annually an insult to himself, his loved ones and large and ferocious people everywhere.  He says that unless the team pays up, he'll pump iron until he explodes.  For things to smile about, Packer faithful look first to their defense, which ranked seventh statistically among the NFL's 28 teams last year.  The Green Bay leader there is Tim Harris, a fourth-year linebacker out of Memphis State and probably the best player not to make the last Pro Bowl team.  His 13 1/2 sacks were fifth in the league, and he tackled Minnesota quarterback Wade Wilson for safeties in each of the two Packer wins over the favored Vikings that highlighted Green Bay's 1988 season.  Harris lends vocal as well as physical support to the Packer D, incessantly woofing at foes or exhorting mates to greater effort.  "People ask if I ever shut up.  I tell 'em no," he says.  When you go 6-5 and 250, you can get away with that.  Infante made his coaching bones tutoring offenses in Cincinnati and Cleveland, and has installed here many of the techniques that were successful there.  They involve using many formations, spreading the field with pass receivers, and allowing the quarterback to pick targets of opportunity.  Trouble is (again), Pack QBs have not, to date, resembled Ken Anderson or Bernie Kosar, Infante's Ohio foils.  The Green Bay incumbent is Don Majkowski, a third-year man who is adjudged stronger of limb than of judgment.  He says he spent the off-season watching films, and liked "Batman" best.  That's a joke.  He watched films of himself playing football, and believes his performance will benefit therefrom.  If Majkowski falters, clever but weak-armed veteran Randy Wright will be in reserve, along, probably, with Dilweg.  The rookie completed seven of 11 passes for 102 yards in the Pack's heartening, 28-27 win over the New York Jets in last week's preseason opener.  Other spots need packing, including running back and the defensive line.  Infante acknowledges that his team lacks stars generally, and has called for volunteers among current hands.  Nonetheless, he remains upbeat about its prospects.  "I want to win because I love living here.  I have a three-minute commute to work, 2 1/2 minutes if I make the light," he says.  He adds that the only special precaution he has taken has been to lock up his dog after losses.  The thrift rescue law is supposed to begin a new chapter for the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp.  The biggest change, installing a new Freddie Mac board, will occur within six months.  That's the deadline under the new law for selecting members of an 18-member board similar to that of its corporate cousin, the Federal National Mortgage Association.  The new law also changes Freddie Mac's stock, its regulators and its lender base as thrifts become less of a force in mortgage lending.  And it calls for thorough studies of both Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae to evaluate the risks these government-chartered but privately run companies could pose to taxpayers.  Like Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac is a federally chartered corporation that operates a secondary market for home loans, buying loans from lenders and packaging them into mortgage-backed securities for sale to investors.  Each company buys about one out of every eight mortgages issued in the U.S. Unlike Fannie Mae, however, Freddie Mac's directors have been the three members of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, the federal regulatory body for the thrift industry.  The Bank Board is being dissolved under the thrift bailout bill signed recently by President Bush.  Forming an independent board is intended to reduce Freddie Mac's sensitivity to politics and increase its sensitivity to shareholders, who will elect 13 members.  The other five will be presidential appointees, with representatives from real estate, home building and mortgage lending.  Leland Brendsel, Freddie Mac's chief executive officer and a member of the company's interim board, said selecting a slate is the interim board's top priority.  "We are looking to bring up a slate of strong, successful business people" from a variety of disciplines, he said in a recent interview.  For instance, Freddie Mac, with its big demand for data processing and instant financial information, would benefit from board members seasoned in large systems operations.  Eric Hemel, an analyst with First Boston Corp., called the change an "enormous positive development" that largely removes Freddie Mac from the political process, "eliminating a major threat to the stock performance and the company's long-term prospects."  The old board, Mr. Hemel said, "didn't always favor profit maximization."  The new board is expected to be more responsive to market conditions and innovations in Freddie Mac programs, he said.  The new Freddie Mac board will likely include Mr. Brendsel and perhaps another Freddie Mac executive.  Over the short run, the changes aren't expected to have significant effects on Freddie Mac operations, though Mr. Brendsel said the company probably will need a chief operating officer to handle day-to-day business as he becomes more involved with external affairs and with the board.  Some changes are more apparent.  Last week, Freddie Mac's preferred stock began trading as common on the New York Stock Exchange, and it is widely expected that a shareholder-elected board will move to redeem the restricted common shares held by the Federal Home Loan Banks.  For the second quarter, Freddie Mac's earnings rose to $106 million from $94 million the year before.  Both Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae may get an extra boost from the thrift bailout law as savings and loans work to meet the new capital standards required under the rescue plan.  Over the next two or three years, many are expected to sell off their portfolios of mortgage loans and Government National Mortgage Association securities.  The legislation also established a $2.25 billion line of credit for Freddie Mac directly with the Treasury and gives the Department of Housing and Urban Development regulatory responsibility for Freddie Mac.  The Treasury Department has a role too in overseeing certain securities matters.  The Treasury will also be examining the soundness of all government-sponsored enterprises and assessing their impact on federal borrowing.  In addition, the General Accounting Office, the auditing arm of Congress, will study operating risks and capital standards for the government-sponsored enterprises.  Separately, Freddie Mac said it is forming a fraud investigation unit to detect and investigate mortgage fraud and prepare cases for legal action.  "While Freddie Mac purchases high-quality mortgage loans, the instance of fraud-related cases in the marketplace is increasing industrywide," said James Croft, executive vice president, risk and property management.  He said more incidents of fraud are being perpetrated by lenders and servicers, especially in areas where the housing market is booming.  Fannie Mae said it has a fraud detection system set up through its five regional offices.  A spokesman said investigators soon will have access to a data base on all foreclosures that can be used to spot common buyers, real estate agents, appraisers and lenders.  Amoco Corp. said it will begin offering next week the gasoline retailing industry's first guarantee against fuel system problems in vehicles that use one of its products.  But the marketing gimmick aimed at getting consumers to buy more of Amoco's most expensive gasoline -- Ultimate Premium unleaded -- comes with several caveats: Only cars and light-duty trucks less than four months old with fewer than 4,000 miles are eligible to register.  Consumers must prove they used Ultimate Premium at least 75% of the time in the three months before the problem developed.  And the guarantee covers only what vehicle manufacturer warranties don't cover for up to 75,000 miles.  In addition, the plan is likely to have little effect during the first year a car or truck is on the road because virtually all manufacturers have at least a 12-month or 12,000-mile warranty on fuel system and other parts.  The guarantee also provides coverage only for the original buyer or lessee of the vehicle.  For years auto and oil companies have blamed each other for problems that cause vehicle engines to sputter.  These problems include clogged fuel injectors and intake valves.  West German luxury auto maker BMW AG, for example, said it had to resort to blasting its engine valves with ground-up walnut shells to remove carbon deposits.  Oil companies responded by adding detergents and other additives to gasolines, particularly their most expensive varieties, such as Ultimate Premium.  Amoco's new guarantee seems to be the next step in convincing consumers they need to use the premium fuels, which are highly profitable for oil companies.  The parts Amoco said it will cover include fuel injectors, carburetors, intake valves and ports, intake manifolds, fuel pumps, fuel lines and fuel tanks.  In most cases, the fuel parts covered by Amoco's guarantee already fall under a variety of warranties, some of which extend for as much as seven years or 70,000 miles and some of which require deductibles.  The Amoco plan will cover these deductibles, such as the $100 payment required after the first year or 12,000 miles under General Motors Corp.'s three-year or 50,000 warranty.  Amoco says it also will pay for fuel-system repairs when auto maker warranties or extended warranties expire.  But the protection Amoco is offering won't come cheaply.  In Chicago, for example, the average price of Amoco Ultimate Premium is $1.351 a gallon compared to an average price of $1.176 a gallon for Amoco's regular unleaded.  In a new 1989-model Mercury Sable that gets 21 miles a gallon in the city, the additional 17.5 cents a gallon comes to $62.50 a year if the owner drives 10,000 miles a year and uses Ultimate Premium at least 75% of the time.  To qualify for the guarantee, participants will have to prove they used Ultimate Premium at least that much by saving receipts from their purchases of the gasoline -- an unaccustomed task for many drivers.  Amoco officials also said they reserve the right to seek a repair estimate from a "third party" when claims are made.  But Amoco isn't expecting to receive many claims.  "We're so confident about our product that we don't anticipate this offer will cause any problems" or result in huge warranty costs, said Robert McKeehan, general manager of marketing for Amoco.  Serious questions about secrecy in the name of democracy are raised by Peter Coleman in "The Liberal Conspiracy" (Free Press, 333 pages, $22.95), a spirited and openly partisan account of the activities, successful and unsuccessful, of the Congress of Cultural Freedom.  The Congress was set up in the 1950s by intellectuals, mainly of the left, to do battle with Stalinism.  Mr. Coleman, who was an early supporter of the organization, edited the Australian literary and political review the Quadrant, a sister to Preuves, Tempo Presente, Encounter and the other reviews created by the Congress.  Just how the Congress was formed, why it was valued and how it was funded are matters directly addressed and forthrightly discussed in Mr. Coleman's always interesting book.  Operating on an international scale, the Congress's forums and publications attracted a wide array of intellectuals, among them Arthur Koestler, Ignazio Silone, Sidney Hook, Dwight MacDonald, Raymond Aron and Irving Kristol, who edited Encounter with Stephen Spender.  Many of them did not know that the Congress had been secretly financed from the start by the CIA. When these ties were revealed in the mid-1960s, the Congress was kicked about by left and right until it was finally dissolved in 1967.  "Cockroaches in a slum sink" -- Norman Mailer's view of the Congress's intellectuals -- suggests the level of the discourse.  It is Mr. Coleman's belief that the publications sponsored by the Congress were most useful in the struggle against communist totalitarianism, which seemed irresistible after the Soviet victory in World War II.  Is this judgment valid?  Did the reviews put out by the Congress contribute in any serious way to the victory of the democracies over the Soviet Union in the cold war? (Since Mr. Gorbachev's indictment of his country's Stalinist past, this victory has now been conceded by leftists of almost every shade of red.) And this second question has to be put: Was it necessary to deceive people like Messrs.  MacDonald and Spender, or Nicola Chiaromonte, to make use of their literary skills in the struggle against Stalinism?  Let me answer this second question first.  I do not think it would have been possible to set up literary-political reviews under capable and, in point of fact, superior editors -- Encounter was for a period the best English literary review since T.S. Eliot's Criterion -- while fully informing the editors chosen that the CIA was footing the bill.  So most of those chosen to undeceive their readers about Stalinism had to be deceived themselves.  And now to the first question: Was the deception justified in view of its political results?  I think I have to answer: It was not.  I do not believe Preuves, the French review set up by the Congress, had the slightest effect on the intellectual community of Paris, which until the middle '70s remained solidly behind Sartre's pro-communist Les Temps Modernes.  I was in Rome in 1965, and it was clear to me then that Nicola Chiaromonte's Tempo Presente, a first-rate review intellectually, had failed to influence Italian intellectual life to any important degree.  I can suggest one possible justification for the Congress's publications.  If they did not win new adherents to democratic values, perhaps they helped keep those already committed to such values from giving up.  But there is more to "The Liberal Conspiracy" than just the story of Congress and its funding.  Much interesting gossip can be found in these pages.  Now, is gossip valuable?  In most instances I would say it is not, but what is gossiped about here is intellectual opinion, and the intellectual opinions of yester-year may help us against crediting too readily those of the moment.  It is always useful to note that the views of political theorists change with the passing of time.  For instance, Mr. Coleman reports that in 1951, Mr. Aron observed in a piece of his that for intellectuals "anti-capitalism is an article of faith."  Mr. Aron then went on to say that for them to even debate the merits of the free enterprise system would be an emotional and philosophical surrender.  Let me contrast this view of how intellectuals judged capitalism then, with the recent judgment of it by the late and respected Michael Harrington (a Trotskyist communist during the '50s).  In his recent book, "Socialism Past and Future," Mr. Harrington wrote: "Capitalism was the greatest achievement of humankind in history, a culture and a civilization as well as an economy."  To be sure, I have gone outside Mr. Coleman's text to contrast a right-wing intellectual's view of the left during the '50s with a left-wing intellectual's view of the direction of the right today.  But within Mr. Coleman's text, the readers will find many similar asymmetries of statement.  For example, we read of Daniel Bell, lately leaning leftward, defending Western civilization against a leftist critique of William Phillips, now accused of political respectability.  And there are statements by Mr. MacDonald, Mary McCarthy and Norman Birnbaum that are just as entertainingly odd.  ---  Mr. Abel is a writer who lives in New York.  Yesterday Poland's main opposition group, the Solidarity trade union, and two political semi-entities agreed to try to form the first non-Communist government in Eastern Europe since World War II. Given the historical weight of the moment, the participants' comments were notably subdued.  Solidarity's leader, Lech Walesa, mobbed by reporters after the meeting, blandly said that the country was "closer than farther" to forming the coalition government.  This apparently is not what either the rulers or the opposition had in mind when in April they agreed to half-free parliamentary elections.  The deal at those round-table negotiations was to put at risk only enough seats in the June elections so that Mieczyslaw Rakowski's Communist Party could cling comfortably to power for a while and Lech Walesa's Solidarity could move into a respectable opposition from its formerly illegal status.  But neither the party nor Solidarity could stick by the agreement for long, after voters gave a virtually uniform endorsement to opposition candidates and struck communist candidates from the ballots.  So yesterday the current premier, Czeslaw Kiszczak, abandoned his two-week effort to form a communist-led grand coalition and tendered his resignation at a meeting between Poland's president, Wojciech Jaruzelski, and the opposition.  If Gen. Jaruzelski has indeed bought the idea (a statement from him is expected today) of a coalition rule by Solidarity, the United Peasant Party and the Democratic Party, he will have to sell it to the ruling communists.  They have hastily scheduled a Central Committee meeting on the issue for Saturday.  The party's diehard members consider Solidarity's move "a political coup," to use Mr. Rakowski's phrase.  They obviously don't feel that the last word has been uttered on the issue.  As if to emphasize the Mao dictum that political power flows from the barrel of a gun, the general, the party chief and the premier were on TV screens yesterday attending military events.  Indeed, Mr. Walesa already has conceded the defense and interior ministries to the communists and has reassured the Soviets that the coalition would not harm the Warsaw Pact.  The Soviets, apparently satisfied with that for the moment, yesterday called formation of a government a country's "internal business."  But defense policy is only part of the reason for Solidarity's tepidity about such a quick transfer of power.  The other, more immediate, reason is the economic wreckage it is being asked to take charge of.  The recent ending of subsidies to farmers has led to doubling and in some instances quadrupling the cost of food (ham, for one, in this land of ham eaters).  Critical shortages nevertheless persist.  Industrial productivity is so low that staples such as wool, cotton and cardboard are becoming scarce.  The nation's meager exports are inadequate to service its crushing foreign debt of $39 billion.  And the state currency, the zloty, meanwhile has collapsed.  Solidarity will not be able to perform the miracles that a quick solution to these problems would require.  In a position paper published last month it called for a $10 billion infusion of cash over three years from Western governments and banks, the IMF and the World Bank.  It would plow all that into the private sector while the country privatizes its industries, reforms its banking system, establishes securities markets and makes the zloty convertible.  Many Western bankers don't think $10 billion would be enough.  But of course the whole point of reforms is to establish the basis for a country to finance itself, which is why Solidarity, if it is to succeed, will not be able to afford stalling around with such things as "austerity" measures and the like.  Poles have had more than enough austerity.  They are demanding radical change, not a continuation of statist economic controls.  And that means putting private economic incentives and market competition to work as quickly as possible.  These are not the easiest things for a labor movement to do, but clearly Solidarity has an intellectual leadership that understands what kinds of reforms are needed.  The new coalition, if it is actually formed, will need outside help.  Finding itself in the midst of economic chaos, it will be vulnerable to political fire.  The orthodox communists undoubtedly will want to use strong-arm responses to manifestations of public discontent, while groups like Fighting Solidarity, a faction in the trade union, will continue their radical criticism of whoever is in charge.  Western policy makers have become reluctant, and rightly so, to commit more funds to a wasteful communist regime such as the one in Warsaw.  The prospects of a non-communist government -- even though it remains a member of the Soviet military bloc -- inevitably will require a new approach.  One thing is certain.  Communism as a political philosophy is dead in Poland.  That is the main significance of yesterday's events.  Sweden's June current-account balance swung to a 200 million krona ($30.4 million) deficit from a 500 million krona surplus a year earlier, the Riksbank, Sweden's central bank, said.  The deficit on the current account, which includes merchandise trade items, services and transfers, also represented a narrowing from the 2.5 billion krona deficit recorded in May.  The Riksbank attributed the deficit in June chiefly to slipping trade and service balances.  The first six months of this year showed a current-account deficit of 7.8 billion kronor, compared with a 3.2 billion krona deficit a year earlier.  Sweden's foreign trade surplus in July fell to 1.7 billion kronor ($258.1 million) from 2.9 billion kronor a year earlier and decreased from 4.7 billion kronor in June, Statistics Sweden, the national statistics agency, said.  Preliminary July figures showed exports totaled 20.5 billion kronor, up 5% from a year earlier, and imports amounted to 18.8 billion kronor, up 12%.  In the first seven months of this year, Sweden's foreign trade surplus fell to 17.2 billion kronor from a 17.9 billion-krona surplus a year earlier.  Exports rose 11% to 190.9 billion kronor, and imports rose 12% to 173.7 billion kronor.  Guy F. Atkinson Co. said one of its divisions received a $26.2 million contract for construction of a cogeneration plant in Watsonville, Calif.  Construction of the plant has begun and is expected to be completed by August 1990.  The company is engaged in heavy construction and oil and gas production.  General Electric Co. said it received an order for jet engines valued at about $200 million from Air Inter, a French domestic airline.  The engines, built by CFM International, a company jointly owned by Snecma of France and GE, will be used to power jetliners made by Airbus Industrie, a European aircraft manufacturing consortium.  GE said Air Inter placed seven firm orders and eight optional orders.  Nynex Corp. expects its computer-store business to become profitable in the 1990 second half and remain there after that, said Douglas J. Mello, president of the company's Nynex Business Information Systems Co. unit.  Since entering the computer-retailing industry five years ago, the regional Bell company has struggled to halt the losses; Nynex officials initially were hoping to make the turnaround this year.  However, Mr. Mello said the company fell short of expectations primarily because of a misguided business plan, fierce competition and tight margins in the industry.  Nynex believes the computer-store chain -- called Nynex Business Centers -- is now positioned for success, barring an downturn in the economy or the computer industry.  The company last year revamped its sales system, reflecting a more outgoing, direct-sales approach.  And this year, the company began focusing on such large and medium-sized corporations as Scott Paper Co. and USF&G Corp.  "We're trying to focus on high-volume users," explained Mr. Mello.  "We're not ignoring the small guys, but we realized we can't be all things to all people."  Before, the company market strategy targeted companies all over the board.  "One year later, we found we weren't doing very well in any one market," Mr. Mello said.  "Our conclusion was to cover one market very well."  Nynex is also placing greater emphasis on the sale of higher-margin, value-added services, such as training, maintenance and technical support.  Mr. Mello predicted the Nynex Business Centers unit will double its sales on value-added services this year to about $40 million.  If the strategy works, the unit expects to report 1989 revenue of about $500 million, as the loss shrinks.  Nynex doesn't disclose bottom-line results for its unit.  Nynex is betting its telecommunications expertise will help its computer-store business vault ahead of the competition.  Mr. Mello said that telephone knowledge has given the company an edge because it can also provide businesses with local area networks, a private data communications network that links computers.  "We're able to hook up their personal computers," Mr. Mello says.  "We think connectivity is the future."  Ivan G. Siedenberg, vice president of external affairs, says the computer centers last year sold more local area networks than Nynex's telephone companies.  Nynex Business Centers expects to sell 1,500 local area networks in 1989 and 3,000 in 1990.  Mr. Mello said this year's network sales should generate revenue of about $50 million.  In the future, Nynex hopes the computer outlets will become effective stations for cross-selling other telecommunications services and equipment.  The computer-store business also has benefited from reductions in rental overhead.  When Nynex acquired International Business Machines Corp.'s 81 computer retail stores in 1986, most of them were situated in expensive shopping mall outlets and downtown centers, such as Rodeo Drive in Beverly Hills, Calif.  Nynex has since consolidated several centers and negotiated leases on about 30 branches.  Mr. Mello said that effort has resulted in a 20% savings in rent and leasing expenses.  Other regional Bell companies, Bell Atlantic Corp. and Pacific Telesis Group, dabbled in the computer-store business and got out when profits couldn't be made.  "I'm determined to make this thing profitable," Mr. Mello says.  Unitel Video Inc. said it agreed in principle to be acquired by a new affiliate of Kenmare Capital Corp. for $15 a share, or about $33.6 million.  The agreement is subject to financing and the approval of Unitel's board.  Unitel previously had announced a definitive agreement to be acquired for $14 a share, or $31.3 million, by an affiliate of U.E.I. PLC, a British manufacturer of video and audio equipment.  Unitel said that U.E.I., which owns a stake in it, has participated in the talks with Kenmare and approved the agreement in principle.  The merger accord between Unitel and U.E.I. will be dropped if the Kenmare transaction is completed, Unitel said.  Unitel provides studio and mobile production facilities for television.  Kenmare Capital, a closely held investment firm based in New York, controls Compact Video Group, which does post-production work for television and film.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Unitel shares closed up 37.5 cents at $14.  Mahoney Adams Milam Surface & Grimsley said Marshall M. Criser, a former president of the University of Florida, will join the law firm in October as a partner and board member.  The firm will change its name then to Mahoney Adams & Criser.  The cable-TV industry is relatively young but quickly has mastered the art of political self-defense.  Earlier this month the General Accounting Office reported monthly fees for cable television were rising much faster than inflation.  In some areas, cable fees were up 291% in 23 months.  The study barely had hit the table when the National Cable Television Association came out with its press release, brazenly headlined, "GAO Study Confirms Reasonable Cable Rate Increases Accompanied by More and Better Programming, NCTA Asserts."  What the cable industry wants to protect is its enjoyment of a happy mix of regulation and nonregulation.  In fact, it is pseudoregulated -- local governments grant cable franchises with virtual monopoly status, often to interests with good political connections, and often are not particularly rigorous in regulating them.  Monthly rates for consumers have indeed been rising, boosting the market value of cable companies impressively.  Cable systems now sell for well over $2,000 a subscriber, five times their value a decade ago.  Knee-jerk regulators are citing the GAO report as evidence that deregulation has failed.  Absurdly, there have been cries for rate reregulation, which would take us back to the bad old days when companies had no powerful incentive to increase program choices or improve service.  The answer to pseudoregulation is not re-regulation but true deregulation.  The Consumer Federation of America estimates that competition would halve monthly rates for most subscribers, saving $6 billion a year.  There are a number of effective ways to foster competition.  There is, in fact, no serious technical reason for exclusive franchises.  If a home can have one cable, it can have two; but given the huge capacity of fiber-optic cables, one such cable once installed could handle large amounts of TV and other traffic.  The question of what services local phone companies should be allowed to offer also raises competitive issues, but at the very least they could be allowed to become common carriers for vendors of TV programming, a move that would give the phone companies further incentives to lay fiber-optic cables.  A bill by Virginia Democrat Rep. Rick Boucher would let phone companies transmit competing cable systems over their fiber optics, for a fee.  That would mean more choice for consumers, and quite possibly would open up other technological frontiers.  In the relatively near future fiber-optic cable offers the possibility of interractive TV, enabling viewers to select programs by telephone or computer.  One stumbling block to increased competition is the vertical integration and cross ownership in the industry.  Cable systems often have demanded a stake in the channels they transmit.  An entrepreneur is reluctant to start an alternative cable system if he knows that he will find it difficult to gain access to programming.  Quite possibly some of the antitrust aspects of these arrangements deserve a look so it can be determined whether they act to further inhibit competition in the industry.  The larger point is that pseudoregulation is just as bad as overregulation.  The savings-and-loan fiasco, where effective regulation had been neutered by politics, offers another example.  If Congress wants to take the GAO report seriously -- and we suspect it will have little choice given the high public visibility involved -- it should see what it can do about opening up cable to more competition.  The solution is as simple as that.  ASK Computer Systems Inc. said it signed a definitive agreement to acquire Data 3 Systems Inc. for $18.7 million.  The closely held company is based in Santa Rosa, Calif., and makes manufacturing software.  On April 4, Mikhail Gorbachev stated flatly in Havana, "We are resolutely against any theories and doctrines justifying the export of revolution or counterrevolution and all forms of foreign interference in the affairs of sovereign nations."  The problem is, Soviet behavior in Latin America does not match Soviet rhetoric.  And until it does, Americans should be deeply skeptical of the new Soviet line.  The strategic value of Latin America to the U.S.S.R. is relatively low.  Real Soviet interests in the region are limited, and can be met by the sort of policy apparently being pursued now toward South America: an effort to expand diplomatic, cultural and economic ties, both to benefit the U.S.S.R. and to diminish Latin dependence on and ties to the U.S.  Continuing Soviet support for Fidel Castro's Cuba and the Sandinistas' Nicaragua now costs the Soviet Union between five billion and eight billion dollars a year.  Given the economic strains on Moscow, one can only assume that this investment is valued highly.  As long as the U.S.S.R. continues to support these regimes its rhetoric about new thinking will -- in the Americas -- remain only rhetoric.  The case of Nicaragua proves the point.  According to the most recent State Department reports, Soviet military aid to Nicaragua was as high in 1988 -- the year when the U.S. Congress stopped funding the Contras -- as it was in 1987 at the height of the war in Nicaragua.  Amazingly, it appears to be running at this same high rate in 1989.  Total East Bloc funding of the Sandinistas is more than three times as much per capita as U.S. funding of its ally, El Salvador.  And while Salvadorans have suffered as a result of a guerrilla war at least as intense as Nicaragua's, things have not deteriorated nearly as much as they have in Nicaragua, where the per-capita income has dropped to a level below that of Haiti.  Thus, massive Soviet funding has little to do with concern for the welfare of Nicaraguans and everything to do with keeping an undemocratic regime in power.  Recent agreements signed at the Tela meeting of Central American presidents notwithstanding, the Sandinistas continue to subvert the government of neighboring El Salvador and maintain close contacts with a large variety of international guerrilla and terrorist groups.  The economic aid that sustains the Sandinistas gives the Soviets great influence.  Why is it not used to pressure the Sandinistas to stop interfering in El Salvador, or to throw Salvadoran, Guatemalan and Colombian guerrillas out of Managua?  Moreover, since the signing of the Arias plan a year and a half ago, military shipments to the Salvadoran Communist guerrillas, judging by captured arms caches, have actually increased -- despite Soviet, Cuban and Sandinista claims that they all support the peace process.  The Soviet response to this, which I heard again on a July trip to Moscow, is that Soviet weapons shipments have ceased.  But it now appears that the weapons gap is simply being filled by Fidel's transshipments of Soviet aid.  Cuba, the Soviet's premier client state in Latin America, currently is engaged in a display of raw Stalinism unseen for decades.  A show trial has been held, replete with televised confessions, people begging to be punished for their counterrevolutionary sins, and "eliminations" so complete that the bodies of those executed are not even returned to their families.  Right now new arrests are under way, jailing the brave few still speaking out for human rights in Cuba.  Even Soviet publications have been banned because their contents are viewed as subversive.  In a speech to party officials reported in the Washington Post in January 1989, Mr. Castro said:  "Those inside the Communist Party of Cuba who show themselves in favor of "perestroika" and "glasnost" are of the same clique as those dissidents out there and of counterrevolutionaries.  We are not going to tolerate this deviationism within the ranks of our party."  So much for Mr. Gorbachev; were he a Cuban, he'd be expelled from the party.  As for economics, Cuba remains a basket case, and the U.S.S.R. is holding the basket.  As Carmelo Mesa-Lago and Fernando Gil of the University of Pittsburgh recently wrote:  "Soviet economic aid to Cuba is unparalleled by both Soviet aid standards with client states and U.S. aid to Latin America.  Obviously the Cuban Revolution would not have survived without the colossal Soviet assistance, but a more important issue is that the Cuban economy cannot function in the future without such vital support."  The question is, where does Cuba fit now in Soviet plans?  If glasnost is for real, why does Mr. Gorbachev continue to pay for all these vicious -- not to mention wasteful -- activities?  Does the Soviet Union value its naval facilities and intelligence base in Cuba so much that it is content to overlook Mr. Castro's transgressions?  One theory is that Moscow takes on the state-to-state relations, while Cuba handles the guerrilla groups and the arms shipments: The Moscow-line Communist Party in Chile backs the Christian Democratic candidate for president, while Fidel works with the armed guerrillas; Mr. Gorbachev gives speeches about glasnost and noninterference and backs Contadora, while Mr. Castro supplies arms to the guerrillas in El Salvador.  One should dismiss out of hand the argument that the U.S.S.R. lacks the power to force Cuba to stop its repression at home and support of subversive movements in the region.  Recall the Cuban-Soviet confrontation of 1968-69, where oil supplies and arms deliveries were slowed down and Mr. Castro came to heel; the Soviets decided to muscle him, and it worked.  One measure of their success was Cuba's endorsement of the invasion of Czechoslovakia in 1968.  Cuba is no less dependent today.  It defies logic to think that Mr. Gorbachev could not put the squeeze on Fidel.  Either Moscow and Havana are on a collision course, or glasnost is not real in the region closest to the U.S. and of enormous security interest to it -- the Caribbean basin.  Simply put, if Mr. Gorbachev's foreign policy does not require a Latin base for subversion, why is he paying for one, in the combined efforts of Cuba and Nicaragua?  If he opposes cross-border interference, why is he footing the bill for it?  It can be argued that Soviet intentions in this hemisphere have not changed and never will match the rhetoric of glasnost.  There is also a "political" theory that Mr. Gorbachev can do only so much at one time and, given his priorities and political constraints in Moscow, a public fight with Mr. Castro right now would be adverse to his long-term interests.  Then there is the "squeaky wheel" analysis: Mr. Gorbachev hasn't changed Soviet policy in the Caribbean basin yet because there hasn't been enough pressure to force or lead him to do so.  I find the combination of this and the political theory most persuasive.  I would conclude that Soviet policy in the region is capable of change, but as yet the inducements to change have not outweighed the pressures to maintain the status quo.  How long that will be true depends on events in the region, in Moscow and in Washington.  ---  Mr. Abrams was assistant secretary of state for Inter-American Affairs from 1985 until January 1989.  Selma, Ala., 1965: Blacks trying to register to vote are stopped at the courthouse steps by police using billy clubs and cattle prods to beat the non-violent demonstrators into submission and retreat.  The brutality of the confrontation reaches its climax with the first attempt to march from Selma to Montgomery, a march that is aborted when state troopers charge the marchers, swinging billy clubs and firing canisters of tear gas into the fleeing crowd.  Soon mounted police armed with bullwhips, ropes and barbed wire wrapped in rubber join in the unprovoked attack.  Hosea Williams is among the first knocked down by excessive police force.  Martin Luther King Jr. begins sending telegrams from his office in Atlanta before the day is through.  He calls the event a "vicious maltreatment of defenseless citizens of Selma, where old women and young children were gassed and clubbed at random."  The news media quickly convey the images to a horrified American people.  The Department of Justice is pressed to investigate, and to send federal marshals to Alabama to protect the marchers.  Within two weeks, President Lyndon Johnson introduces legislation later known as the Voting Rights Act.  Within a month, a full-scale march to Montgomery, under the protection of federal officers and a nationalized Alabama national guard, is conducted peacefully, and the tactic of peaceful demonstration is firmly secured in the American conscience.  ---  Washington, D.C., 1984: Scores of people -- including several high-ranking government officials -- protesting the apartheid policies of the South African government block the doors of the South African Embassy.  The protestors are gingerly arrested, released on their own recognizance.  The national media cover the protests extensively, and for more than two years similar demonstrations occur throughout the country, with hardly a single act of excessive force on the part of the police.  ---  Pittsburgh, Pa., 1989: 121 members of the group Operation Rescue are arrested while peacefully protesting outside an abortion clinic.  The group is trained in the same type of passive resistance techniques employed by the civil rights protests a generation ago.  Police, who had removed their badges and name plates, respond with "pain compliance" techniques -- twisting the protesters' ears, bending the hands backwards to the wrist, and carrying the protesters off by inserting billy clubs between their handcuffed hands and the small of the back -- are employed to force the protestors into submission.  Women -- from college age to grandmothers -- are dragged by the bottoms of their blouses, their breasts exposed to hooting male prisoners.  One affidavit reads: "He grabbed me between my breasts and dragged me up the stairs by my wire-rimmed bra.  My breasts were fully exposed as I was being dragged up the stairs."  Complaints are filed with an assistant district attorney, who does not process them, allegedly on orders from her superiors.  Several of the protestors report that other attempts to file complaints with city, county and federal officials are similarly unsuccessful.  ---  West Hartford, Conn., 1989: Nonviolent Operation Rescue protestors and several reporters are arrested outside an abortion clinic.  The film and notes of reporters are confiscated by police.  "Pain compliance" techniques are once again used, and again by police who do not wear identifying name plates or badges.  ---  Los Angeles, Calif., 1989: This time, the police use "nunchakus," as well as "pain compliance" techniques, upon the nonviolent Operation Rescue protestors.  The nunchakus, a weapon consisting of two night sticks connected by a chain, is wrapped around the protestor's wrist and arms.  The great pain that follows when pressure is applied forces the protestor to walk.  One man's arm is grotesquely snapped in two by a police hold.  ---  These are but a few, and not the most ghastly, of the stories from the nearly 50-cities throughout the country where allegations of police brutality have been made by members of Operation Rescue.  Hosea Williams, one of the civil rights leaders who witnessed firsthand the brutalities in Selma, participated in a news conference in Pittsburgh to decry the brutality of the police there.  To date, no national news organization has deemed the allegations worthy of coverage.  The U.S. Department of Justice found that the Pittsburgh allegations I transmitted to them "lack the indicia of prosecutive merit necessary to warrant further investigation," though it did agree to investigate some of the charges and did acknowledge that the use of excessive force by police would violate federal civil rights laws.  The head of the section in charge of the investigations stated that the group was violating a court injunction, as if such a violation made perfectly reasonable the kind of treatment to which the anti-abortion protesters have been subject.  In July, I placed on the agenda of the U.S. Commission on Civil Rights a resolution to recommend to the president that he direct the Department of Justice to undertake an investigation of these allegations at the earliest possible moment.  My resolution did not condone the illegality of Operation Rescue's actions.  Nor did I associate myself with their cause.  Rather, I sought to affirm the continued support of the government and the people of the U.S. for the rights of all protesters.  After lengthy and sometimes hostile scrutiny, my resolution was dropped from the agenda.  My colleagues argued that the resolution was a "back door" way to discuss abortion, as if the subject matter of the protest determined the legitimate police response.  Rep. Don Edwards (D., Cal.), chairman of the commission's oversight committee in the House of Representatives, joined in -- not coincidentally during the middle of the debate over reauthorization of the commission -- with a direct threat: "Consideration of this issue," which "appears to violate the Commission's authorizing statue" prohibiting "the Commission from studying issues relating to abortion," would "seriously erode Congressional confidence in the Commission."  Neither has any committee in Congress decided to take up the matter.  No hearings have been held, or scheduled, and the likelihood of any hearings being scheduled in future is slim.  The same zealous advocates for civil rights who criticized the officers stationed outside the Naval Weapons Station for their treatment of anti-nuke protesters, or who themselves participated in the South African Embassy protests without so much as an unkind word from police, have not uttered a syllable about these allegations.  Meanwhile, the courageous few congressmen -- Bob Walker (R., Pa.), Clyde Holloway (R., La.), Chris Smith (R., N.J.), Guy Molinari (R., N.Y.), Bob Dornan (R., Cal.) and Bob Traxler (D., Mich.) -- who have spoken out have gone largely unnoticed by the press.  In the aftermath of the Supreme Court's Webster decision -- which substantially returns the abortion debate to the states -- we can expect more anti-abortion demonstrations.  We ought to guarantee that we will not also see more police violence in the handling of them.  It is imperative that we as a nation assert our commitment to equal treatment before the law.  Nonviolent protestors should all be accorded the same treatment no matter what the subject of protest.  To do less is to destroy the most prized achievement of the civil rights movement -- the recognition of the rights of everyone.  And we will have destroyed that achievement, not just for Operation Rescue, but for all.  ---  Mr. Allen is chairman of the U.S. Commission on Civil Rights.  MagneTek Inc. said it completed a capital restructuring that will "substantially" reduce interest payments by the company, which makes electrical products, including ballasts, transformers, motors and controls.  MagneTek said it repaid $258 million in revolving credit and term loans, and redeemed about $55 million in 16.75% notes, 15.25% preferred stock and 15.50% preferred stock.  The repayment was financed by a new $150 million issue of 11.20% senior notes due June 30, 1997, part of a new $150 million credit line, and proceeds from the initial public offering in June, which raised about $60 million.  MagneTek said it has total debt of $386 million.  It said it will save about $8 million a year in interest payments and a further $3 million a year in preferred dividend payments.  Poland's breathtaking move toward forming a non-Communist government shows that liberalization in the East bloc is accelerating and soon could spill over to other parts of the Soviet empire, U.S. analysts say.  Polish President Wojciech Jaruzelski, who crushed the Solidarity trade movement eight years ago, tentatively approved Solidarity's plan to form a non-Communist coalition government, according to reports from Warsaw.  The decision, which could be announced formally today, would produce the first non-Communist government in Eastern Europe in more than four decades.  Of course, Poland's march toward political openness could be halted by a violent crackdown, as various other attempts at reform in the Communist world have been in the past.  But if democracy is permitted to take root in Poland, U.S. analysts believe that the forces of liberalization, which also are at work in Hungary, could next spread to nearby Czechoslovakia and feed the drive toward autonomy from Moscow that already is under way in the Baltic states.  "We think that Czechoslovakia might be next in line in terms of reform," says a Bush administration official.  "Poland also will have an effect on the Baltics.  In a world of instant communications, word gets around."  While the velocity of change in Poland is likely to reinforce reform movements elsewhere in the Soviet empire, analysts predict it also will help conservative forces unite against what they see as the turmoil unleashed by Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev's reform program.  For now, Mr. Gorbachev appears to be firmly in control, but as Poland heads into uncharted waters, it is impossible to predict what the ultimate outcome will be.  The Soviets ruthlessly crushed Czechoslovakia's last attempt at political liberalization, the so-called "Prague Spring" of 1968.  This coming Monday marks the twenty-first anniversary of the Soviet invasion.  Now, however, "If Moscow allows 'Prague Spring' to go forward in Poland, how can you prevent it in Czechoslovakia?" asks Jiri Valenta, director of the University of Miami's Institute of Soviet and East European Studies.  Still, underscoring the uncertainty surrounding recent reform developments in the East bloc, Mr. Valenta adds, "I'm sure that the commanders of the Warsaw Pact forces are horrified."  The Bush administration, recognizing the conflicting pressures, is reacting cautiously to the developments in Poland.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said the U.S. supports the "process of pluralism" under way in Poland, but he emphasized that the U.S. wouldn't interfere in that process.  The spokesman said that President Bush hadn't placed any telephone calls to leaders in Poland and understands the pressure on Lech Walesa, Solidarity's leader.  Moscow appears willing to permit non-Communists to attempt to revive Warsaw's faltering economy so long as the Soviet Union's security interests are protected.  Mr. Walesa understands that there are lines drawn by the Soviets that his movement can't cross.  For instance, even in a non-Communist Polish government, key security posts -- such as the ministries of interior and defense -- still would be controlled by pro-Soviet officials.  And yesterday, the Solidarity leader said Poland would remain in the Soviet-led Warsaw Pact.  "No matter who rules here must recognize this reality and we {Solidarity} will do so," he told a West German reporter.  Mr. Walesa would form a coalition government with two smaller parties, the United Peasant Party and the Democratic Party.  Together with the two smaller parties, which had been in the Communists' ruling coalition, Solidarity and its allies would control 264 votes in the 460-member Sejm, or legislative assembly.  Mr. Walesa, who has said he doesn't want to be prime minister, has noted that it is President Jaruzelski's responsibility under Poland's constitution to fill the post.  U.S. analysts say Mr. Walesa is reluctant to take the job partly because he knows what a massive task lies ahead.  Reforming Poland's economy will require austerity measures that will hurt Mr. Walesa's trade-union constituency.  Moreover, a non-Communist prime minister would be confronted by a hostile bureaucracy that might try to sabotage his efforts.  The events in Poland are being viewed nervously in Prague, where government officials expect demonstrations Monday to commemorate the Soviet invasion in 1968.  The Czech government said it would crack down on protesters.  Czechoslovakia's Communist Party leader, Milos Jakes, is one of seven leaders who sanctioned the 1968 Soviet invasion and he could face recriminations during another "Prague Spring."  Just yesterday, Poland's Parliament condemned the 1968 invasion, saying it "breached the inalienable right of every nation to self-determination. . . ."  Meanwhile, after spending nearly 20 years in obscurity, Alexander Dubcek, the leader of the 1968 Czech reform movement, in recent months has begun participating in dissident activities.  Mr. Valenta believes that couldn't take place without Moscow's tacit approval.  "Dubcek believes, if Gorbachev's reforms prevail in the Soviet Union and in Poland and Hungary, that either he or his ideas may have a future in Czechoslovakia," the analyst says.  Decisions in Poland also are being closely watched in the Baltic states.  Polish television is widely viewed in Lithuania, which for 200 years was part of Poland.  The Associated Press reported that Moscow accepted the demand of the three Baltic republics to rewrite the agreement that formed the Soviet Union, a move that could loosen Moscow's grip on them even as Poland appears to be slipping away.  Grow Group Inc. will report fiscal fourth-quarter profit of about $1.2 million, or 10 cents a share, on revenue of about $120 million, Russell Banks, president and chief executive officer, said.  In the year-earlier quarter, the maker of chemical coatings, paints and household products had profit of $2.8 million, or 23 cents a share, on revenue of $112.8 million.  However, in that quarter the company had a loss of $695,000 from continuing operations; profit of $3.5 million from discontinued operations brought the quarter into the black.  By contrast, Mr. Banks said, the latest quarter, ended June 30, represented the first time in eight quarters that Grow had a quarterly profit from continuing operations.  He said he believes this performance, though still not up to the company's goals, could mark the beginning of a turnaround.  Mr. Banks said Grow expects to post an operating profit in fiscal 1990.  And, he said, net will be boosted by a gain of about $10 million in the fiscal 1990 first quarter on the $25 million sale of the company's U.S. Paint division to Nippon Oil & Fats Ltd., of Tokyo.  The sale was completed Tuesday.  "I think we're coming out of" fiscal 1989 "much stronger as a result of the Nippon sale," Mr. Banks said.  For all of fiscal 1989, Grow will report a loss of about $2.9 million on revenue of about $410 million, he said.  In the previous year, the company earned $35,000 on revenue of $383.3 million.  That year included a loss from continuing operations of $6.8 million and profit from discontinued operations of $6.3 million.  It also included a gain of $568,000 from an accounting change.  Grow plans to announce its fourth-quarter and full-year results next week.  In addition to losses over the past year, Grow has been buffeted by, first, the disclosure that an investor group that might seek control of the company had acquired a stake in it; and then by a fire at a chemicals warehouse, which has led to a criminal complaint against the company.  Following these two setbacks was the collapse of a friendly deal whereby Grow was to be sold to PPG Industries Inc., of Pittsburgh.  Grow hasn't paid a quarterly dividend since the fiscal 1988 third quarter.  Once, Mr. Banks reflected, "I felt that I was a .400 hitter.  Then over the past two years, I felt I was in a slump, hitting .100."  But, he said, the latest quarter provided signs of strength in certain businesses, especially in marine and heavy-maintenance coatings.  Although he didn't provide figures, he said this segment saw a "strong upsurge" in sales, and that profit was "considerably ahead" of the year earlier.  He attributed the gains partly to new construction of tankers and freighters outside the U.S., adding that Grow is beginning to penetrate markets in the Soviet Union and Yugoslavia.  But those gains were offset by difficulties in the automotive business, where the quarter's profit was "substantially less" than a year ago, he said.  He said research and development spending has produced new Grow sealants now in use at a General Motors Corp. plant, but the auto maker hasn't yet begun to use the sealants at additional plants.  He added that Grow, which also provides thinners and adhesives to the auto industry, has found it difficult to pass on higher materials costs to customers.  For all of fiscal 1989, Banks said, Grow's coatings and chemicals unit, which includes the marine and automotive businesses, had pretax operating profit about the same as the $18.5 million of fiscal 1988.  In the company's other main unit, consumer and professional products, the operating loss for the latest year was about $3 million, versus an operating loss of $4.6 million a year earlier, he said.  The loss in the latest quarter also was "substantially less" than a year ago, he said.  The unit sells swimming-pool chemicals and household cleaning products, among other things.  In July 1988, Grow became the subject of some takeover speculation when a group including Edward S. Buchanan, a Massachusetts banker, bought a 6.7% stake in the company and later raised its stake to 7.7%, stating that it was considering a tender offer.  The group hasn't made a bid, though, and Mr. Banks said, "We have not had what I would call friendly talks."  He said he never did get an explanation from PPG as to why last September it canceled its agreement to acquire Grow for $233 million and assume about $67 million of Grow's debt.  But despite PPG's statements to the contrary, he said, he believes the deal was hurt by a chemical fire at a Grow warehouse in the Los Angeles area, which forced the evacuation of nearby residents.  Recalling the heavy publicity surrounding the fire, he said, "I knew that was the end of the deal."  PPG's cancellation came within days of the fire.  The district attorney's office of Los Angeles County has since issued a criminal complaint against Grow, alleging violations of the state health and safety code.  The company denies the charges.  Mr. Banks said Grow hopes to restore dividend payments "as soon as we have the necessary profits."  When Ayatollah Khomeini forced the Shah of Iran from power a decade ago, Islamic revolutionaries sought to wipe out most pro-American vestiges of the ousted regime.  But one American-style institution created by the shah was left intact: a nonprofit foundation set up here and endowed with a 36-story Fifth Avenue office building.  Individuals sympathetic to the new revolutionary regime seized control of the foundation, and critics say they have quietly been funneling millions of dollars to supporters of the late ayatollah in the U.S.  The supporters, the critics say, include Iranian students at U.S. universities and a religious group in the Washington, D.C., area whose followers distribute literature extolling the Iranian regime and joined the late ayatollah in attacking author Salman Rushdie's book "Satanic Verses."  Although renamed the Mostazafan (Arabic for oppressed) Foundation when control shifted to the friends of Iran's fundamentalist regime, there has been another side to the organization's activities.  As the owner of the $100 million office building at the corner of East 52nd Street, it's involved in plenty of American-style capitalism and marketing.  It belongs to the Fifth Avenue Association, which includes such pillars of the local retailing establishment as Bergdorf Goodman, Saks Fifth Avenue and Tiffany.  The Mostazafan Foundation often acts like one of Manhattan's snobbish landlords.  Earlier this year, it refused to rent retail space to a men's clothing chain on the ground the would-be tenant was nothing but a "bargain-basement mass retailer."  The foundation said retail space is reserved for "sophisticated tenants."  Now, the group is battling with Electronique, a ground-floor electronics shop, which has had the audacity to use price tags in a window display.  The foundation, in a lawsuit, says price tags cheapen the building, and got a judge to ban them.  One former tenant with Wall Street connections is convicted stock manipulator Ivan Boesky.  Other current tenants are far more respectable, including the securities firms of PaineWebber and Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Wherever it got its investment advice, the foundation was luckier than some in the pre-crash U.S. market.  Its financial reports show it unloaded all of its stock holdings in the months before the 1987 crash.  The portfolio -- including 300 Walt Disney shares and 200 CBS Inc. shares -- was sold off for a total of $676,323, or a 2.6% net loss.  The 28 tenants in the building paid a total of $14 million in rent during 1988, according to the latest available reports filed by the Mostazafan Foundation.  The organization doled out all of the $2.8 million it had left after paying the building's expenses.  Since the foundation has a mortgage on the building ($45 million from Iran's Bank Melli), the group, which is chartered as a nonprofit corporation in New York state, says it has to pay U.S. taxes on its rental income.  The organization also says it complies with other U.S. regulations, which bar foundations from promoting political causes.  "We have no political attitude toward Iran," says Mohammad Badr-Taleh, the foundation's $48,000-a-year president.  "We don't propagate or distribute literature for or against the Iran government."  "The foundation has a close abiding connection with the Iran government," says a U.S. government official.  "Everything I've seen shows that."  Opponents of the current Iranian regime press this point.  A spokesman for Peoples Mojahedin of Iran, a Washington-based organization, says, "To get money from the foundation, students have to be staunch supporters of the Iran regime.  If you're critical, no money."  The foundation says such charges are baseless, and that scholarship funds are awarded only to top-flight students.  "They must be B-plus or better," a foundation official says.  "If they do badly, no more funds."  One of the chief beneficiaries of the foundation is the Islamic Education Center, which is located in Potomac, Md., outside Washington, D.C.  The facility is a gathering place for Muslim supporters of Iran who appear to have both religious and political objectives.  Since 1981, the foundation has spent more than $4 million for buildings, land and improvements for the center.  A militant Muslim group -- at no cost -- uses the foundation-supported facility as a mosque, or place of worship.  In fiscal 1988 the foundation gave the mosque $230,000 to help cover operating expenses, including the salary of Mohammad Asi, the mosque's controversial leader.  Earlier this year, the Asi group celebrated at the center the regime's rise to power in 1979, and honored Ayatollah Khomeini in a memorial service.  Literature praising the Iranian regime is offered at the mosque's bookstore, according to a representative of the rival Islamic Center.  The Islamic Center representative shows a reporter a booklet that he says was distributed nearby by the Asi group, shortly after Ayatollah Khomeini decreed that Mr. Rushdie, the author, should be killed because his novel assertedly blasphemes Muslims.  The booklet says in part: "The whole affair goes beyond Rushdie's foul and filthy language, it is looming as an international plot premeditatedly patronized by world Zionism and imperialism to smear the Prophet's image."  Mr. Asi says, "I don't know if such an incident {distribution of the booklet} took place.  If it did, we were clarifying the issue of blasphemy."  Recent launch-test failures of the Trident II point up a basic design flaw, Navy officials said, raising questions about its ability to begin deploying the missiles early next year as the next generation of submarine-based nuclear missile.  The Lockheed Corp.-built missile, successful in 16 of 19 launches from land in a testing program that started January 1987, failed catastrophically in a sea launch Tuesday for the second time in three tries since March.  An Aug. 2 test was successful.  Yesterday, the Navy confirmed a New York Times report saying that the service believes engineers miscalculated the amount of pressure the missile encounters during an undersea launch and didn't account for certain effects of the missile's movement through the water.  The errors, the Navy said, occurred even though numerous computer simulations were used during the missile's development.  Despite the two recent failures, Navy officials maintained that the Trident's design problems could be corrected so that the missile can begin to take its place in the fleet on schedule in 1990.  A Navy spokesman said senior admirals retain "full confidence" in the missile, adding that "no impact is presently foreseen" on long-range plans to make the missiles the centerpiece of the U.S. submarine fleet's nuclear armaments.  Navy officials went out of their way to emphasize that Lockheed probably wouldn't be held responsible for the Trident's technical problems.  In Sunnyvale, Calif., a spokesman for the aerospace and electronics giant's Lockheed Missiles & Space Co. unit wouldn't comment on the Navy's remarks about the Trident II, saying the prime contractor was "awaiting analysis of test data."  The spokesman for the unit of Lockheed, based in Calabasas, Calif., said that Lockheed has been prime contractor on previous Polaris and Trident submarine-launched missiles and said "obviously it has been an excellent long-term program."  Over the past two years, the Navy has earmarked about $4 billion to buy some 132 Trident II missiles, and the Bush administration has strongly resisted congressional efforts to trim that spending.  Trident II is the sixth generation of submarine-based missile systems that Lockheed has developed with the Navy in programs dating back to the Polaris of the 1950s and later the Poseidon and Trident I.  And the long history had seemed to help give the latest missile a special place among weapons programs.  Last year the House Armed Services Committee rated the Trident II program as best-managed among all strategic programs.  At the Pentagon, Trident II development long has been touted as an example of a program that has been able to cut through bureaucratic red tape and the development has given lower-level managers greater authority to make decisions.  Before the test firings, Navy officials also boasted that the Trident program has saved untold millions of dollars by streamlining cumbersome design and acquisition rules.  By contrast, some industry and congressional critics contend that the Lockheed program was in serious trouble long before the unsuccessful launches.  Former Pentagon acquisition officials and Senate Armed Services Committee aides, for example, previously estimated that the Trident program was at least six months behind schedule and faced cost overruns of 15% or more through the mid-1990s.  The three-stage missile, which has a range of about 4,600 miles, is designed to take advantage of the newest advances in missile engines and in ways to reduce drag during flight.  Before the test failures, Defense Secretary Dick Cheney's aides praised the Trident II program as the portion of the Pentagon's nuclear modernization program that didn't require major adjustments or prolonged negotiations with lawmakers.  While independent directors of Cineplex Odeon Corp. continue to solicit bids for the movie theater chain, Cineplex disclosed that bankers could require a loan repayment of $522 million if Chairman Garth Drabinsky or Vice Chairman Myron Gottlieb leaves the company.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Cineplex said a departure by Mr. Drabinsky or Mr. Gottlieb would result in "the equivalent of an act of default" under an agreement with one of the company's bankers.  The principal amount owing on that loan is $39 million, but Cineplex said such a default "could result in the acceleration of all bank loans presently included in long-term indebtedness" as a result of cross default clauses in other banking agreements.  Cineplex also disclosed other clauses in recent agreements that would be triggered if Messrs.  Drabinsky and Gottlieb "cease to be officers and directors of the corporation."  The company said it could be required to repurchase 57 theater properties sold to Carena Developments Ltd. affiliates last year.  It said it would have to pay the higher of fair market value or Carena's capital cost of 55.3 million Canadian dollars (US$46.8 million) plus interest.  Cineplex said it also could lose some lease rights and may have to acquire the 45% minority stake in its British Gallery Cinemas Ltd. subsidiary.  However, Jack Richer, spokesman for the independent directors' committee, played down the effect of these agreements on the quest for a buyer for the company.  "Anyone who's involved in the due diligence process was already aware of these agreements," Mr. Richer said.  "To my knowledge, no one has said they're concerned, and I don't expect the public disclosure to have any effect on the process now under way."  Mr. Richer added that any buyer would refinance the whole company in any event, making the provisions of the banking agreement "largely irrelevant."  Cineplex also said it has violated the terms of the $39 million loan, but that it obtained a waiver from the lender to carry it over until the end of next month when Mr. Richer hopes to announce "something definitive" about the company's future.  Mr. Richer said the violation was due to the number of operations Cineplex has discontinued in the last six months, and that the company has "more than enough" cash available through its open lines of credit with the Bank of Nova Scotia to refinance the loan.  Pierre Panet-Raymond, a broker and analyst with Toronto investment dealer McDermid St. Lawrence Ltd., said he is more concerned about the company's ability to continue its expansion program than any "poison pill" provisions that appear to reinforce Mr. Drabinsky's position in the company.  "Frankly, I don't think it's likely the banks will call those loans," he said.  "I think they'll be glad to deal with someone other than {Mr.  Drabinsky}, especially with {major Cineplex holders} MCA Inc. and the Bronfmans gone."  In the SEC filing, Cineplex said its ability to complete its 1989 expansion program will hinge on improved cash flow and the expansion of its bank facilities.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, Cineplex closed at C$14.125 a share, off 50 Canadian cents.  In the latest insider-trading case involving advance copies of Business Week, a former salesman at the magazine's Torrance, Calif., printing plant settled charges with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Shayne A. Walters, formerly a salesman for R.R. Donnelley & Sons Co., the magazine's printer, agreed to return $31,033 in profit that he made by trading on the inside information.  In addition, he will pay a penalty of that same amount to settle a civil suit filed in federal court in Manhattan.  Mr. Walters, 32 years old, of Laguna Hills, Calif., obtained the information from Business Week's "Inside Wall Street" column before it was made public.  Mr. Walters's attorney, Theodore A. Cohen, said his client's case is unrelated to previous insider-trading cases involving Business Week.  Mr. Cohen said Mr. Walters also plans to plead guilty to a criminal count of conspiring to commit fraud and one count of perjury, which were filed in federal court by the U.S. Attorney's Office.  Mr. Cohen said the perjury count stems from false statements Mr. Walters made to SEC investigators.  The U.S. Attorney's Office said each of those counts carries a maximum sentence of five years in prison and a fine of $250,000.  Mr. Walters personally traded on the securities of 13 companies from October 1986 to May 1987 using the inside information, the SEC said.  The agency said Mr. Walters passed the information on to his broker, who traded on the stocks of more than 40 companies from about September 1986 to July 1988.  The broker in turn gave the information to other investors, who purchased securities of more than 60 companies while in possession of the inside information.  Andrew J. Geist, a staff attorney for the SEC, declined to say whether the broker or the other investors will be charged.  Mr. Geist said the investigation is continuing.  The SEC said Mr. Walters received substantial payments from the broker in exchange for the inside information.  Mr. Geist declined to say how much Mr. Walters received.  Business Week, owned by McGraw-Hill Inc., is printed at Donnelley's plants in Torrance and in Old Saybrook, Conn., as well as at two plants owned by other companies.  In June, the SEC filed a civil suit charging five investors with trading on misappropriated nonpublic information from Business Week before the magazine reached the newsstands.  They are accused of buying the advance information from employees at the Old Saybrook plant.  Last December, S.G. "Rudy" Ruderman, a former Business Week radio broadcaster, pleaded guilty to mail fraud for trading on inside information from the "Inside Wall Street" column.  For years, Ohio's Cleveland Clinic has ranked with the top world-class providers of medical care.  It pioneered coronary bypass surgery and developed the first kidney dialysis machine.  King Hussein of Jordan uses the clinic, so too the royal family of Saudi Arabia.  But to Diran M. Seropian, chief of the medical staff of the largest hospital in Broward, County, Fla., the clinic is the Carl Icahn of medicine -- "a hostile corporation with a hostile corporation mentality."  Its unforgivable mistake, in Dr. Seropian's view: It opened an outpatient facility here 18 months ago as part of a plan to expand into this market.  Local politicians and businesses cheered the idea.  But many local physicians were outraged, and an extraordinary campaign to keep the clinic out was begun.  The battle between the Cleveland Clinic and the South Florida physicians is part of a larger war sweeping the health care industry and can ultimately be boiled down to one issue: competition.  Big-name health-care institutions are after new markets for their state-of-the-art medicine, and are posing a new threat to local physicians.  The expansions are also disrupting traditional relationships between physicians and their patients, physicians and their hospitals and physicians and their fellow physicians.  In the Cleveland Clinic's case, Carl C. Gill, the chief executive of the Clinic's Florida enterprise, and a surgeon who has done 4,000 open-heart operations, was denied local hospital privileges.  The credentials committee of Broward General Medical Center said he lacked enough experience in the emergency room, among other things.  In fact, for 15 months, the clinic was blocked from conducting heart surgery in Florida.  When one hospital finally opened its doors, some local physicians, apparently in protest, began snubbing the facility and referring their patients elsewhere.  And when some patients told their local physicians that they wanted to consult physicians at the clinic, they were handed their medical charts and told not to come back.  In a recent full-page advertisement in the Miami Herald, Dr. Seropian, who has led the charge, pulled out the stops.  He likened the clinic to Dingos -- wild Australian dogs -- "that roam the bush eating every kind of prey."  In May, the clinic filed suit in federal district court in Fort Lauderdale, charging, among other things, that some physicians had conspired to "hamper" its entry into Broward County.  In a countersuit, Amjad Munim, a pulmonologist and one of two individual defendants named in the complaint, maintained the clinic had tried to recruit him to spy on his fellow physicians so it could build a legal case against them.  Meanwhile, the Federal Trade Commission is investigating whether the battle has involved violations of antitrust laws.  The Cleveland Clinic, which had revenue of $672 million in 1988, isn't alone in its desire to expand.  The Mayo Clinic, based in Rochester, Minn., has recently set up satellite operations in Jacksonville, Fla., and Scottsdale, Ariz.  The M.D. Anderson Cancer Center in Houston is negotiating to open a branch in Orlando, Fla.  Several other, smaller institutions and academic centers have also established regional branches, intended to feed patients to their main facilities.  In part, these institutions are victims of their own success.  Many once-exotic procedures that they invented are now routinely available across the country, reducing the need for patients to travel to the medical meccas.  For instance, the Cleveland Clinic might once have had a hold on coronary bypass surgery, but no more: Last year more than 250,000 patients had the operation at hospitals throughout the U.S.  "These clinics used to be the court of last resort for complex medical cases," says Jeff Goldsmith, national health-care adviser to Ernst & Whinney, the accounting firm.  "Now, the flooding of the country with medical specialties and high-technology equipment has forced them to adopt a different strategy."  Their expertise and reputation spell formidable competition for the local medical community.  On one level, says Jay Wolfson, a health-policy expert at the University of South Florida in Tampa, "it's like bringing in a McDonald's.  If you're a mom-and-pop sandwich shop on the corner, you could get wiped out."  In Fort Lauderdale, physicians insist they aren't threatened by the Cleveland Clinic.  Instead, they say they resent what they see as special favors the institution was given to invade their turf.  They also maintain the clinic will lure fully insured patients from local hospitals, leaving behind the burden for indigent care.  And they bristle at the suggestion that the clinic dispenses a better brand of medicine.  "They've implied the doctors here are dummies, that they're bringing enlightened medicine to the hinterlands," Dr. Seropian says.  Since its founding in 1921, the not-for-profit Cleveland Clinic has built its business taking on complex, high-risk cases, and leaving more routine primary care to family physicians.  In addition to treating patients, its salaried physicians do research and train new physicians, tasks the clinic says set it apart from everyday medical practice.  "Basic fee-for-service practice doesn't advance medicine," says Dr. Gill.  Clinic physicians claim they aren't interested in stealing patients.  But they make no apology for provoking a battle with their fee-for-service brethren that is both cultural and economic.  Says Dr. Gill: "Let's let the marketplace sort out what the best way to deliver health care is."  The conflict began early in 1986 over modest ambitions: a proposed joint venture between the clinic and the North Broward Hospital District, a tax-supported agency that operates Broward General and three other county hospitals.  Under the plan, the clinic would build an outpatient facility adjacent to Broward General Medical Center.  The medical center would provide surgical and other major services.  But word of the idea leaked prematurely and a hastily-arranged meeting to explain it to the district's physicians erupted into a verbal pummeling of William Kiser, chairman of the Cleveland Clinic Foundation board of governors.  Soon after, hospital officials halted the negotiations.  "The {physicians} really had a problem with a bunch of carpetbaggers from the North," Dr. Kiser said.  The clinic, however, moved ahead with its expansion plans.  Like any business, it keeps close tabs on its core market, and the outlook wasn't all that bright.  Seven states provide 90% of the clinic's business and population growth in that region is expected to be flat through the year 2000.  But not so southeastern Florida, where the population is still growing and, in many areas, is highly affluent.  On the surface, the region -- Dade, Broward, and Palm Beach Counties -- is a dream market.  Yachts lining the canals of the Intracoastal Waterway and a ubiquitous building boom reflect wealth and growth so palpable that clinic officials have come to call it "immaculate consumption."  Moreover, about 20% of the 3.7 million residents in Dade, Broward and Palm Beach counties are over 65 years old.  By the year 2000, about 50% of the population will be over 45 -- a potential motherlode of patients.  "We felt there was room for us," Dr. Kiser said.  "We decided to go on our own rather than wait to be invited."  Others have been drawn by the same flame.  Throughout the 1970s, for-profit hospital chains rushed here to cash in on the growing elderly population, whose medical tab was paid in full by Medicare.  But in 1983, when the U.S. instituted new medicare payment guidelines called DRGs, or diagnosis related groups, to control surging medical costs, hospital occupancy rates began to plummet.  Now, the region is glutted with health care: There are 240 physicians for every 100,000 residents in southeastern Florida -- the national average is 189 -- and a surplus of 3,500 hospital beds.  Glut or not, the clinic drew up big plans: a $200 million complex, anchored by a state-of-the-art, 400-bed hospital.  Health planners blanched, but the business community was enthralled.  "We looked at this as a world-class health facility that we would use to build business around," said James Garver, president of the Broward Economic Development Board.  In May 1987, with help from a politically connected law firm and after some of its physicians had made about $2,000 in campaign contributions to local legislators, the clinic won passage of crucial legislation: a law granting it tax-exempt status and waiving the state medical exam for 25 senior physicians who would move from Cleveland to launch the new facility.  Local physicians were enraged.  "Twenty-five thousand physicians have taken that exam to practice in this state," fumes Dr. Seropian.  The Cleveland physicians shouldn't have been exempted, he says.  The clinic says it received the same consideration previously afforded the Mayo Clinic and academic institutions hiring out-of-state faculty. (Ultimately, 13 of its physicians accepted exemptions before the waiver expired.)  With the bill's passage, the clinic pressed forward to build its outpatient facility, which opened in February 1988.  But more battles loomed.  For one, to build its proposed hospital, which it hoped to open in the early 1990s, the clinic had to get a "certificate of need" from the state, proving that the community actually needed the services.  The local hospital association and health planners allied with local physicians to oppose it.  The clinic's physicians meanwhile had no place to operate, and started hunting for a hospital that would open its doors.  The clinic found two allies, one of which was North Beach Hospital, a 153-bed facility that was filling only 28 of its beds.  There was just one problem: North Beach lacked a certificate of need for cardiac service.  Enter Richard Stull, the chief executive of the North Broward Hospital District.  Mr. Stull had played a key role in the early joint-venture discussions between the clinic and the District, and he held steadfast to his hope of an affiliation with the clinic.  "In this county there are 20 acute-care hospitals that are known for nothing," Mr. Stull says.  "All I was looking for was adding something so that we'd stand out."  He was also worried about offsetting competition from a new source: Some of his own physicians were setting up clinics that siphoned off outpatient business from the hospital.  When a cardiac team left Broward General at the beginning of 1988, Mr. Stull thought the clinic's heart specialists could fill the void.  But once again, the hospital's medical staff was opposed.  In the resulting battle:  -- The hospital's credentials committee denied practice privileges to the clinic's five-person cardiac team, including Dr. Gill, because the clinic is "an acknowledged potential competitor" of the hospital, the committee said. -- The district's board, in the face of political pressure, overruled the committee and last January signed a five-year contract with the clinic to provide cardiac services at Broward General.  In protest, some physicians apparently diverted their patients to other hospitals, helping to depress February revenues at Broward General $3.5 million below projections.  -- When the clinic asked for privileges for its other specialists to consult on cardiac cases, the local credentials committee refused to act.  Mr. Stull had to fly in a panel of physicians from outside the area to approve their qualifications.  On May 15, more than 14 months after the clinic's outpatient facility opened, Dr. Gill performed the first open heart operation at Broward General for the Cleveland Clinic Florida.  But that victory was tempered by a serious setback.  In January, state health officials denied the clinic a certificate of need for its hospital.  They said there were already too many surplus hospital beds in the area, and rejected the clinic's claim that it offered unique services.  For now, the clinic's hospital plans are on hold.  But, in the meantime, it says its Florida practice is thriving.  More than 12,000 patients have sought treatment since it opened; some wait as long as three months for an appointment with one of its 48 physicians.  Specialty-care and exotic procedures remain its stock-in-trade.  In one recent operation, three clinic surgeons replaced a Fort Lauderdale resident's cancerous throat with a piece of his small intestine.  In another, a physician used two ribs to make a new forehead for a man whose own had been removed to relieve pressure in his brain.  Then there is Beth Acker.  Told by a local neurosurgeon that she had an inoperable spinal cord tumor and four months to live, the 29-year-old mother went to the clinic where she had successful surgery.  "They handled it like an everyday thing," she said.  Gradually, local physicians are sending patients its way, the clinic says, but the vast majority come in on their own.  That is prompting the clinic to expand its services, and add a general medical practice to its group of specialists.  Analysts' estimates that Pioneer Hi-Bred International Inc. will report net income of about $2.90 a share for the year ending Aug. 31 are about right, Thomas N. Urban, chairman and president, said.  In fiscal 1988, the agricultural seed concern had operating income of $61.8 million, or $1.94 a share, on sales of $877.1 million.  A $3.4 million credit from accounting adjustments made net $65.1 million, or $2.05 a share.  Most of Pioneer's business is generated in the spring when farmers buy seed.  The company expects fiscal 1990 seed sales to rise, partly because it expects U.S. corn farmers to plant about 74 million acres next spring, compared with 72.1 million acres it estimates were planted in the spring of 1989.  Despite a rebound in the U.S. farm economy, Mr. Urban said Pioneer is projecting only a small increase because it expects the federal government to seek to prevent any surge in planting that could rebuild the grain stockpiles that helped depress crop prices earlier in the 1980s.  Among other things, Pioneer expects the Agriculture Department to continue to require farmers next year to hold 10% of their land idle to qualify for corn price supports.  Pioneer makes its U.S. planting projection to calculate how much seed it needs to produce.  Mr. Urban said he doesn't expect seed prices to rise as rapidly as last spring, when industrywide prices rose 10% to 12% for what remained of the drought-stunted crop of seed corn.  Mr. Urban said Pioneer won't decide how to price seed for planting next spring until September or October.  Because of new hybrid seed products, Mr. Urban said, Pioneer probably increased its market share slightly this year, and he said the company expects another gain next year.  Any gain would be the first in four years, over which time Pioneer's market share has slipped about two percentage points to about 35% of U.S. sales.  According to Mr. Urban, one trend in the seed industry is that new hybrid seed products are generating a greater percentage of sales.  At Pioneer, for example, new hybrids are generating about 27% of sales, compared with 5% to 7% a decade ago.  Mr. Urban said he expects about 15% to 20% of Pioneer's sales to come from new hybrids in the future.  All this means the competition for new hybrids is growing more intense as the pace of product introductions quickens and seed companies try to persuade farmers to buy new seed lines sight unseen.  One of the hottest products that seed companies are racing to develop is a herbicide-resistant line.  Such a corn plant would be able to resist the herbicides that are sprayed to protect soybean crops from weeds.  Because many farmers rotate soybean and corn in their fields each year, corn plants are often stunted by the lingering effects of herbicides sprayed earlier on soybeans.  Mr. Urban said Pioneer plans to introduce a herbicide-resistant corn line in the spring of 1991.  New seed lines created through biotechnology, or the laboratory insertion of genetic traits into cells, won't be ready for marketing for five to seven years, Mr. Urban said.  The first corn seed lines from biotechnology will probably be made resistant to certain insects, he said.  Mr. Urban said a recent move by Pioneer to adopt a shareholder rights plan, which is a move to make any hostile takeover attempt more expensive, wasn't spurred by any takeover interest in the company of which he is aware.  Mr. Urban said the move was unique because it was put to a vote of the holders, who approved it Aug. 3.  Generally, companies adopt so-called poison pill plans at the instruction of their directors.  The National Wildlife Federation sued Exxon Corp. and Alyeska Pipeline Co., seeking the creation of a multibillion-dollar fund to oversee the cleanup of Prince William Sound.  The lawsuit potentially signals a new direction in the legal battle over Exxon's liability for last March's disastrous oil spill.  Kenneth Adams, an attorney representing Alaskan fishermen and others with claims against Exxon, said that if "it becomes clear that Exxon isn't doing its job in restoring the environment, the plaintiffs' attorneys would expect to join" the federation's motion.  The suit is asking the court to require Exxon to establish an independent fund -- to be run by a panel of experts and supervised by the court -- that would pay for studies of the environmental effects of the spill and for restoring the region.  In areas that can't be restored, the fund would buy equivalent resources elsewhere.  Officials of the federation, which is also seeking punitive damages, estimated that Exxon's payments would total at least $2 billion, though they said they couldn't give a precise amount until damage-assessment studies are complete.  Exxon said it hadn't seen the suit, which was filed yesterday in state court in Anchorage, and couldn't comment.  None of the payment would go to the federation or the Natural Resources Defense Council, another environmental group, which joined in the suit.  Federation officials said, however, that the groups have standing to sue because the spill deprived members of the groups and their families of being able to use and enjoy Prince William Sound.  The suit alleges that the oil companies were negligent in failing to prevent a spill and that they fraudulently misrepresented their ability to clean up the damage.  At a news conference, Sharon Newsome, the federation's vice president for resources conservation, said the group's suit is the first to be filed on behalf of "the otters, eagles, salmon, parks and wildlife refuges."  Although unusual, the creation of a panel and a fund such as the federation is seeking wouldn't be unprecedented, according to Mark Yudoff, a professor and legal expert with the University of Texas in Austin.  It could be as simple as a single trustee or made up of several individuals representing special interests, he said.  George Friesen, analyst for Dean Witter & Co., said, "It would be a major setback for Exxon if it had to set up a multibillion-dollar fund prior to a trial."  He said fears of complex litigation that could involve the creation of such funds have "temporarily depressed" the price of Exxon shares.  Small investors, who hold two-thirds of Exxon's stock, are the most heavily influenced by reports of growing litigation against the oil giant.  But, said Mr. Friesen, concern over the numerous lawsuits against Exxon, which has a $10.5 billion annual cash flow at its disposal, could evaporate over the long term.  Noting that environmental deterioration around the sound is continuing, Ms. Newsome said the group will be urging the court to move quickly.  Outside legal experts, however, predicted that the federation won't be able to have a fund set up before there is a trial or settlement.  They noted, however, that the group could seek swifter action by asking for injunctive relief.  An attorney for the federation said the group currently isn't planning to seek an injunction, but said the plans could change, depending on how the cleanup is going.  Any amounts awarded would be in addition to the $1.25 billion Exxon has already indicated it will pay in cleanup costs.  About $400 million of that is covered by insurance.  Alyeska is owned by subsidiaries of Exxon, Amerada Hess Corp., Atlantic Richfield Co., British Petroleum Co., Mobil Corp., Phillips Petroleum Co. and Unocal Corp. Exxon and Alyeska have already been sued by the state of Alaska and more than 150 individuals and busineses.  TRANS MOUNTAIN PIPE LINE Co., Vancouver, British Columbia, said it plans to issue one million new shares at 16 Canadian dollars (US$13.58) each to help finance an C$80 million expansion and improvement of its oil-pipeline system.  The pipeline company said BC Gas Inc. and Transland Investments Ltd. plan to buy 47.1% and 20% of the issue, respectively, to maintain their proportionate stakes in the company.  It said the rest will be sold through a private placement.  Trans Mountain said the issue, which is subject to regulatory approval, would raise its shares outstanding by 13.2% to 8.6 million.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, Trans Mountain closed at C$16 a share, down 12.5 Canadian cents.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Albany International Corp., a public offering of three million shares of Class A common stock, of which about 53% is expected to be sold by the company and about 47% by selling shareholders.  The company said that the net proceeds would be used to repay bank borrowings and to offer to repurchase up to 800,000 restricted shares of Class B common stock held by certain employees of the company. 2,250,000 shares are via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, and 750,000 are to be simultaneously offered outside of the U.S. via a syndicate led by Shearson Lehman Hutton International and Merrill Lynch International Ltd.  Berkshire Hathaway Inc., shelf offering of up to $400 million principal amount of debt securities on terms to be determined at the time of sale, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  Chicago & North Western Acquisition Corp., offering of $475 million principal amount of senior subordinated debentures due 2001, via Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. Chicago and North Western Acquisition was formed by Blackstone Capital Partners L.P. and certain members of CNW Corp. senior management in order to acquire CNW.  Corning Inc., up to $50 million of new convertible preferred stock to employees under its employee-investment plan.  The amount to be issued will be no lower than $20 million and will not exceed $50 million, depending upon employee selection of investment options, the company said.  Proceeds will be used for common stock purchases, debt retirement and other general corporate purposes.  Enron Corp., shelf offering of $200 million of debt securities.  Virginia Electric and Power Co., a unit of Dominion Resources Inc., shelf offering of up to $400 million principal amount of medium-term notes, series D, on terms to be set at the time of sale, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  TELEMUNDO GROUP Inc. said it sold three million shares of newly issued common for $5 a share, or $15 million, to Liberty Service Corp., a subsidiary of Columbia Savings & Loan Association, Beverly Hills, Calif.  As a result, it said, Liberty Service will increase its ownership of Telemundo to about 17.3% of shares outstanding.  In addition, Reliance Insurance Co., an affiliate of Reliance Capital Group Limited Partnership, Telemundo's controlling shareholder, agreed to purchase three million shares for the same price, subject to certain regulatory filings.  Reliance Insurance and Reliance Capital would together control about 65% of Telemundo after the transaction.  Telemundo is a New York-based Spanish language television network.  Its shares closed yesterday at $4.625, down 50 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  Federal thrift regulators delayed the enforcement of a rule requiring thrifts to recognize losses in investment portfolios as they occur because it conflicts with the savings and loan law enacted last week.  The rule, which was to take effect on Aug. 30, was delayed until Jan. 1 by Danny Wall, director of the Office of Thrift Supervision, because the new S&L law requires that banks and thrifts operate under the same standard, or generally accepted accounting principles.  Mr. Wall said he delayed the rule because he wanted to confer with regulators of banks and credit unions about how all financial institutions would account for securities investments.  One focus of the sweeping S&L law, which will spend $50 billion to close sick thrifts, was to make accounting standards better reflect the current financial status of thrifts.  In the past, S&L regulators have permitted accounting methods which hid losses, or delayed their recognition.  The new thrift accounting rule, which was promulgated separately from the S&L law, requires S&Ls to distinguish whether they are holding securities for investment or for trading.  For example, if mortgage-backed securities are held for investment, the gains or losses aren't recognized until the instrument is mature.  If the security is held for trading, based on swings in interest rates, it must be accounted for at market value.  Patrick Forte, president of the Association of Thrift Holding Companies, said he was pleased regulators delayed enacting the rule.  He said the rule "would appear to clash with standards that have been set under generally accepted accounting principles."  Doskocil Cos. said that WFC Acquisition Corp. received a commitment for financing, allowing WFC to purchase a Doskocil unit's retail and fresh meats business.  WFC, owned by investor George N. Gillett Jr., has agreed to purchase the Doskocil's Wilson Foods Corp. fresh and retail meats division for $150 million, including $110 million in cash, a $35 million senior subordinated debenture, a $5 million promissory note due June 30, 1990, and some equity in WFC. Previously, WFC had agreed to buy the unit for $140 million in cash.  Doskocil said it expects to complete the sale next month.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration said it has selected Lockheed Engineering & Sciences Co. of Houston for a $178 million research contract.  NASA said the company, a unit of Lockheed Corp., will provide research and technology support in several fields: flight systems research, structures and materials research, space science, aeronautics research and flight projects engineering.  It said the company also will work on project planning, scheduling, cost estimating, research computer software and hardware development and safety.  Most of the work will take place at NASA's Langley Research Center.  W.R. GRACE & Co.'s Grace Energy Corp. subsidiary announced an initial public offering of 3.7 million common shares at $22 each, valued at about $81 million.  As many as 370,000 additional shares may be issued to cover over-allotments.  The new offering represents about 15.3% of the diversified energy holding company's common stock.  The proceeds will be used to reduce debt owed to W.R. Grace, New York, said a spokesman for the parent company.  The underwriters are led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets and Salomon Brothers Inc.  Columbia Savings & Loan Association said its president and chief operating officer, Lawrence K. Fish, 44 years old, resigned to "pursue new business opportunities."  Mr. Fish described his resignation as "very amiable."  He said he hasn't yet lined up another executive position, but that after he leaves Columbia Sept. 30, he will spend time with his family and then move on to "a new (business) challenge here on the West Coast," not necessarily limited to the financial services industry.  When Mr. Fish, a former Bank of Boston executive, was named to the Columbia posts in March 1988, the company said he would be helping to improve the organizational structure and refine operating policies and procedures.  He may have done his job too well.  In announcing the resignation, Columbia noted that a recent "decentralized strategic plan and management structure, developed under Fish's guidance, has effectively eliminated the function of an overall corporate chief operating officer."  Mr. Fish said he decided to resign because "I felt that the function was increasingly being absorbed by the right place to have it go, which is the chief executive's office."  The resignation effectively consolidates the power of Columbia Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Thomas Spiegel, 43, who assumed the chairmanship from his father, Abraham Spiegel, 82, earlier this year.  The Spiegel family owns about 67% of Columbia's stock, and it has been rumored for some time that the company might consider going private, although management has maintained that it isn't "actively considering" that option.  Although the chief operating officer post is being eliminated, Columbia is looking for an executive to head its thrift operations.  "Columbia remains committed to make its thrift banking operations as successful and profitable as its investment management activities have been in the past," Thomas Spiegel said.  A report of a purge of senior Chinese military officers took this quiet capital by surprise Thursday night, but there was no immediate evidence to support the story.  The Associated Press reported from Hong Kong that Defense Minister Qin Jiwei and other high-ranking army officers had been arrested by soldiers loyal to China's president, Yang Shangkun.  But Western diplomats said they hadn't even heard rumors of arrests.  Since Wednesday night, when the arrests were supposed to have taken place, there has been no unusual activity in the streets of Beijing.  Tiananmen Square, the roads around the Chinese leadership's residential compound and the Western Hills, where Mr. Qin lives, all were quiet on both Wednesday and Thursday nights.  There were no more soldiers than usual at key intersections in the city, and they displayed no extra vigilance.  While Western diplomats acknowledge they wouldn't necessarily hear about the arrests, they said all recent signs have been of a lessening of military activity around the capital.  Although martial law, which was imposed May 20, remains in effect, diplomats agree the number of soldiers stationed in Beijing has been dropping steadily in recent weeks.  But at the same time, few analysts would be startled if it turns out the defense minister has been arrested.  Mr. Qin, who is in his late 70s, is regarded as a man with ties to the deposed party general-secretary, Zhao Ziyang.  The defense minister disappeared from public view for several days in May and June, giving rise to rumors then that he'd lost his post.  "Early on it was suggested the defense minister's heart wasn't in martial law," said a Western diplomat.  "But there wasn't any hard information at the time, and it doesn't explain why any action might have been taken now."  Rumors of leadership struggles have swirled around Beijing since Mr. Zhao was removed from office at the time of the Tiananmen crackdown in early June.  But what actually is going on is masked from view.  A crucial issue in recent policy debates, another Western diplomat said, "is whether it is necessary for the army to stay in Beijing and the continuance of martial law."  Mr. Yang and Prime Minister Li Peng are believed among those hard-line leaders arguing in favor of maintaining the military presence in the capital.  The AP, quoting two Chinese sources whom it said contacted the news agency separately, said soldiers loyal to President Yang went to the defense minister's residence about 6:40 p.m. Wednesday and took him away.  Others detained the heads of the Beijing, Canton and Nanjing military districts, who supported Mr. Qin and were in the capital for an important meeting, the sources told AP.  Mr. Qin and Mr. Yang had been competing to become first vice chairman of the all-important Central Military Commission, headed by supreme leader Deng Xiaoping.  Integra Financial Corp. said it filed a lawsuit against Huntington Bancshares Inc., seeking a declaratory judgment to block the proposed acquisition of First Banc Securities Inc. by Huntington.  Integra claims that a letter of intent between First Banc, Morgantown, W.Va., and Huntington, Columbus, Ohio, doesn't require First Banc to agree to a merger with Huntington at a lower price than Integra is willing to offer.  Integra has offered to acquire First Banc in an exchange of $94 million in Integra common stock.  That offer topped First Banc's agreement to be acquired in an exchange of $85 million in Huntington stock.  Integra said it filed its suit in the U.S. District Court for the Western District of Pennsylvania.  Officials at Huntington, a bank holding company, couldn't be reached for comment.  William F. Roemer, president and chief executive officer of Integra, said in a statement: "Huntington claims to have a binding letter of intent to buy First Banc Securities at $28 a share, and that the directors of First Banc cannot consider our higher bid of $31 a share.  Huntington has refused to show us this purported contract.  We do not believe in secret contracts that are concealed from shareholders or in 'contracts' that are designed to keep shareholders from getting a better offer for their shares."  Integra said it furnished a draft of a definitive contract to the directors of First Banc, and has offered a copy of its contract to Huntington.  On Jan. 8, 1986, in the midst of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.'s $6.2 billion bid for Beatrice Cos., the stress in the arbitrage department of Goldman, Sachs & Co. was intense.  As the day began, Robert Freeman, Goldman Sachs's powerful head of arbitrage, had bet about $66 million of its capital on the success of the proposed leveraged buy-out -- way over the firm's pre-established limit of $50 million.  He had even bet millions of his own family's money on the deal -- a whopping 40% of the assets he traded in those accounts.  As one of the country's most powerful arbitragers, Mr. Freeman's risks in buying so much Beatrice stock and options were not what they would have been for anyone else.  With his Rolodex, reassurance was usually just a phone call away.  The day before, when heavy trading in Beatrice stock triggered a twinge of anxiety about the deal, Mr. Freeman had called Henry Kravis of KKR.  But Mr. Kravis "was very abrupt and appeared anxious to end the conversation quickly," Mr. Freeman recalls -- a worrisome sign.  Then, by virtue of his position at a firm such as Goldman Sachs, Mr. Freeman learned that another in the small circle of top arbitragers, Richard Nye, was bailing out of Beatrice; Mr. Nye sold his position through Goldman Sachs.  So, Mr. Freeman called Mr. Nye.  "He didn't convince me that a problem didn't exist," Mr. Freeman says.  Next, Mr. Freeman received a call from Bernard "Bunny" Lasker, a widely known trader on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange, tipping him to a problem in Beatrice.  With mounting anxiety, Mr. Freeman drew on his circle of contacts one more time, placing what would prove to be the most fateful call of his career.  He called Martin Siegel, the Kidder, Peabody & Co. takeover strategist representing KKR in its ultimately successful bid for Beatrice.  "I told Mr. Siegel that I had heard there was a problem with the Beatrice LBO," Mr. Freeman says in an account of the day's events he released yesterday.  "He asked from whom I had heard that.  When I answered Bunny Lasker, Martin Siegel said, 'Your bunny has a good nose.' " Mr. Freeman, who had already begun liquidating his family holdings in Beatrice and reducing Goldman's exposure, promptly capitalized on Mr. Siegel's inside information, plunging into an array of options trades that saved Goldman, an unidentified Goldman client and Mr. Freeman himself a total of about $930,000.  Yesterday, more than three years after the Beatrice trading and more than two years after his arrest on insider-trading charges, Mr. Freeman admitted that his actions with Mr. Siegel amounted to insider trading, agreed to plead guilty to a felony and resigned from Goldman Sachs, the firm that he says has been an "integral part of my life" for 19 years.  Mr. Freeman appeared in federal district court in Manhattan yesterday morning and agreed to plead guilty to one count of mail fraud on Sept. 5 before Judge Pierre Leval.  Outside the courtroom, Mr. Freeman appeared calm and showed no emotion as he stood with family members behind his attorneys, who answered questions from the press.  Now, Mr. Freeman faces a possible sentence of as much as five years in prison and a fine of as much as $1.86 million.  He also may have to make restitution to anyone harmed by his illegal trading.  In addition, he still hasn't settled the civil case against him with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  In a letter to John L. Weinberg, senior partner of Goldman Sachs, Mr. Freeman admitted his guilt in the Beatrice transaction but didn't apologize.  He insisted that he wasn't guilty of any other wrongdoing and called the 2 1/2 years since his arrest "a nightmare for me and for my family."  For Goldman Sachs, the prestigious investment bank that put its reputation on the line with its vigorous defense of Mr. Freeman, the arbitrager's decision to plead guilty is more than an embarrassment and a blot on its reputation for integrity.  One of Wall Street's oldest partnerships, it faces possible sanctions or fines by the SEC as well as private civil suits.  The plea agreement was surprising largely because both Mr. Freeman and Goldman Sachs had insisted so long and so vociferously that he was innocent of any wrongdoing.  But it confirms what many had long suspected about Wall Street: that a few arbitragers such as Mr. Freeman had extraordinary access to people and information.  For example, Mr. Freeman was one of the few arbitragers whose calls Mr. Kravis would take, a lawyer for Mr. Kravis says, because Mr. Kravis learned important market information from him.  In many ways, what is most striking about the events of Jan. 8, 1986, is how ordinary they seem in the context of the world of top arbitragers that existed at least until the fall of Ivan Boesky.  Were it not for Mr. Boesky's confessions of insider trading, which implicated Mr. Siegel, who, in turn, implicated Mr. Freeman, investigators probably would never have learned of Mr. Freeman's activities.  Even then, if another Goldman Sachs arbitrager, Frank Brosens, hadn't been able to confirm much of what Mr. Siegel said about the Beatrice incident, Mr. Freeman might well have risked a trial in the hope that his word would be believed over Mr. Siegel's.  According to people familiar with the negotiations between lawyers for Mr. Freeman and the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office, it was only several months ago, when prosecutors confronted Mr. Freeman's lawyers with the fact that another Goldman Sachs official was prepared to testify against Mr. Freeman, that serious settlement talks began.  Given that Mr. Freeman's public posture had made him a symbol of Wall Street's determination to stonewall in the face of the government's continuing investigation, his capitulation yesterday was a major victory for prosecutors, especially Rudolph Giuliani, the New York mayoral candidate who was the U.S. attorney at the time of Mr. Freeman's arrest; Bruce Baird, the head of the office's securities unit, and Benito Romano, the acting U.S. attorney who concluded the settlement.  But the plea is likely to be viewed as a favorable move for Mr. Freeman; by contrast, Mr. Siegel was required to plead guilty to two felonies.  Nor does Mr. Freeman's agreement explicitly require continued cooperation in the investigation, although any lack of cooperation could become significant when he is sentenced.  In announcing yesterday's plea agreement, Mr. Romano also dropped the government's related investigation into alleged insider trading by two of Mr. Siegel's former colleagues at Kidder Peabody, Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor.  That decision, more than anything related directly to Mr. Freeman, is likely to exacerbate criticism of the prosecution.  Mr. Wigton was handcuffed in full view of his colleagues and led in tears from Kidder Peabody at the time of his arrest.  Mr. Tabor was arrested and held in jail overnight.  When the subsequent indictment against them was dropped in May 1987, prosecutors promised another, broader one and said the initial indictment was just the "tip of an iceberg."  Stanley Arkin, Mr. Wigton's lawyer, says Mr. Wigton "was publicly humiliated and unjustly accused.  He's entitled to a sincere and profuse apology, especially from Mr. Giuliani, who presided over this."  Andrew Lawler, Mr. Tabor's lawyer, complains that the arrest of Mr. Tabor caused him "incalculable personal and professional damage."  Mr. Giuliani didn't return phone calls from this newspaper yesterday.  Mr. Romano acknowledged that the arrest of the men in February 1987 was "hasty."  People familiar with the situation say talks between Goldman Sachs and the SEC haven't begun yet, nor have talks between Mr. Freeman and the SEC.  And an attorney for the firm, Lawrence Pedowitz, maintains that Goldman itself was blameless in Mr. Freeman's wrongdoing.  "The firm had state-of-the-art compliance policies and procedures in effect" at the time of the incident, Mr. Pedowitz says.  "I don't believe they were in any respect inadequate.  There are obviously some things no compliance department can pick up."  Goldman Sachs also faces the prospect of civil lawsuits, including possible class actions, by investors and corporations expected to allege that they were damaged by Mr. Freeman's activities.  Investors may sue the firm not only for insider trading with respect to the Beatrice buy-out, but also in other deals previously alleged by the government to have entailed wrongdoing by Mr. Freeman, such as Storer Communications Inc. and Unocal Corp.  The burden of proof in such civil suits is lower than that required of the government in a criminal case.  Though acknowledging the likelihood of such suits, people close to the firm say they are confident its liability can be kept to no more than $10 million, about what Goldman Sachs might lose in a bad trading month.  The firm earned more than $500 million, before taxes on partners' incomes, last year and has more than $2 billion in equity capital.  The people close to Goldman Sachs say that many of its employees seemed astounded when they learned of Mr. Freeman's decision to plead guilty, even as they expressed relief that the firm would now be spared a lengthy and potentially embarrassing trial.  They also say some Goldman Sachs partners were concerned about Mr. Freeman's admission yesterday that he had acted to protect his family accounts from a decline in Beatrice shares before doing so in Goldman Sachs's own accounts.  Even so, they note wide respect at the firm for his abilities and tremendous sympathy for his plight.  In a statement distributed to everyone at the firm yesterday, Goldman Sachs said that "we do not condone even a single act of wrongdoing."  But it otherwise attempted to minimize Mr. Freeman's crime and said that "over the past 30 months, Bob has been subjected to an arrest that the prosecutors have since characterized as a mistake, a withdrawn indictment, the promise of new charges in record time followed by a grueling two-year investigation, and a series of highly publicized formal allegations and innuendoes that far exceed anything he actually did."  At least in respect to the Beatrice transaction, Mr. Freeman's plea corroborates in significant respects testimony provided prosecutors by Mr. Siegel.  Both Mr. Freeman and Goldman Sachs have attacked Mr. Siegel's credibility and continue to deny that any conspiracy existed between the two men and that any insider trading occurred other than in Beatrice stock.  They emphasize that Mr. Freeman passed a lie-detector test on these matters.  However, Mr. Romano says, "We are quite satisfied with the cooperation we've obtained from Marty Siegel."  An SEC spokeswoman wouldn't say whether the agency will delve into any allegations beyond the one involving Beatrice stock as it pursues civil charges against Mr. Freeman.  Jed Rakoff, Mr. Siegel's lawyer, says: "Mr.  Siegel is pleased that matters have now come to a sufficient resolution that he can try to get on with his life.  He does feel vindicated.  For several years now, he has been in a lonely position of not being able to respond to the massive attacks that have been made on him, simply because he told the truth.  But his desire now is simply to move forward to sentencing and, hopefully, to a well-justified resumption of normal activity."  Mr. Siegel, now living in Florida, has been waiting to be sentenced until the Freeman case was resolved.  According to people familiar with the case, prosecutors had nearly despaired of obtaining a guilty plea from Mr. Freeman, especially after his close friend and former classmate, Jay Regan, the head of Princeton/Newport Partners, refused to cooperate with prosecutors after being charged with numerous securities-law violations.  However, in investigating the Princeton/Newport case, prosecutors developed leads into other alleged wrongdoing by Mr. Freeman unrelated to Mr. Siegel.  Then, several months ago, prosecutors confronted lawyers for Mr. Freeman with the fact that testimony by another member of Goldman Sachs's arbitrage department, Mr. Brosens, corroborated key aspects of Mr. Siegel's account of the Beatrice dealings, people familiar with the case say.  They say that only then did serious settlement talks begin, talks that accelerated after the Princeton/Newport defendants were convicted of 26 felonies.  Mr. Pedowitz, the lawyer for Goldman Sachs, declines comment on behalf of Mr. Brosens.  People close to Mr. Freeman say that numerous Goldman Sachs officials besides Mr. Brosens testified before the grand jury and that they don't consider Mr. Brosens's testimony to be a turning point in Mr. Freeman's defense.  They also say they never viewed the evidence related to Princeton/Newport as particularly significant.  But they concede that the Princeton/Newport verdict was a blow to the Freeman camp, suggesting the willingness of a jury to convict defendants in a complicated financial case where the defendants are rich.  "The fight just went out of him," says one lawyer of Mr. Freeman after he received news that Mr. Regan, his good friend, had been found guilty.  ---  Wade Lambert contributed to this story.  ---  @ The Freeman Case  February 1987 -- Three top Wall Street figures, Robert Freeman, Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor, are arrested -- Mr. Wigton in handcuffs.  They are charged with an information-swapping conspiracy that allegedly made Kidder millions of dollars in illegal profits.  Goldman Sachs's Mr. Freeman is also charged with trading for his own account on the information.  The three are implicated by Martin Siegel, a former takeover specialist at Kidder.  Mr. Siegel pleads guilty to two felony counts for his role in the insider-trading case.  April 1987 -- Freeman, Tabor and Wigton are indicted on federal charges of conspiracy to violate securities laws, securities fraud, mail fraud and wire fraud.  May 1987 -- U.S. District Judge Louis L. Stanton dismisses insider-trading charges against Freeman, Tabor and Wigton, after the government says it isn't ready to proceed.  August 1988 -- James Sutton Regan, managing general partner of Princeton/Newport and a close friend of Mr. Freeman; Bruce Lee Newberg, a former Drexel junk-bond trader; a Princeton/Newport comptroller and three general partners are charged with conspiring to create illegitimate tax losses through a series of prearranged securities transactions.  July 1989 -- The five Princeton/Newport officials and Mr. Newberg are convicted of 63 of 64 counts against them, including racketeering and securities, wire and mail fraud.  August 1989 -- Mr. Freeman agrees to plead guilty to one count of mail fraud.  Small-business owners are playing a bigger role in U.S. export activity.  Just add up the people like Bob Knosp.  When Mr. Knosp started producing computerized sign-making systems in his garage three years ago, he never expected that his products would soon be selling well overseas, even though he advertised in a few international trade journals.  In fact, within the past year, more than half of his $500,000 business has come from abroad.  He's been surprised by the number of customers from England, Australia and Switzerland seeking out his Bellevue, Wash., company.  In some ways, he even prefers doing business with his new European dealers: Unlike their American counterparts, they promote and advertise his product themselves, rather than relying on him to do so.  Untold numbers of small exporters like Mr. Knosp are now a critical, albeit quiet, component of American exports, foreign trade experts say.  Because specific statistics on small exporters aren't kept, it's impossible to know exactly how much they contributed to the unexpected jump in U.S. exports, which hit a record $30.91 billion in June, and in the narrowing of the trade deficit, reported yesterday by the U.S. Commerce Dept.  Even so, export specialists say there's both indirect and anecdotal evidence to suggest that small exporters constitute a larger part of the export trade than is often supposed, and their portion is growing.  Indeed, small businesses far outnumber large companies in the export arena.  A recent Commerce Department study shows that 80% of the 100,000 American exporters in 1987 had shipments totaling less than $25,000 that year.  Most of the firms making such limited shipments are probably small companies, surmises Tony Radspieler, an economist with the Commerce Department's foreign-trade division.  What's more, in the manufacturing sector, there's evidence that small companies may account for a larger share of the nation's manufactured exports than once thought.  A recent study by the Small Business Administration estimates that manufacturers with fewer than 500 employees accounted for half of the value of U.S.-made goods exported by manufacturers in 1985.  Foreign trade experts say small-business owners are showing increased interest in opportunities overseas.  Lawrence Harper, a consultant in Price Waterhouse's international trade group, detects a "heightened awareness" among small-business owners that they should be developing internationally.  He says that much of the small-business interest focuses on the prospects for expanding in Western Europe, anticipating the removal of nearly all trade barriers there in 1992.  "That's doing as much for the small exporter as anything else right now," he says.  In addition, he says, small businesses are seeing prospective clients from Japan, Taiwan and China.  He says that wood products are particularly in demand in the Pacific Rim.  Korean-born Jaechul Ahn, a Minneapolis-based exporter of timber products, says he's running rings around his larger American competitors in sales to Korea, Taiwan and Japan.  Basswood is particularly hot in Korea right now.  He says he's been racking up basswood sales while his larger U.S. competitors have been holding on to their stocks, in hopes prices will rise.  Though he started his company only two years ago, he says he expects to have sales of between $2 million and $3.5 million this year.  Small companies, hankering for their first bits of export business, are calling up trade consultants for advice.  Noor Doja, executive director of Minnesota's export finance authority, says the increase in such inquiries has been "dramatic" this year.  He estimates that over the past 12 months or so, 200 to 300 businesses with sales of less than $10 million have dipped their toe in international waters for the first time.  Those small concerns have accounted for "virtually all" of the companies that have joined the ranks of Minnesota's 1,000 exporters since last year, he adds.  What's driving this interest?  Two factors, says Mr. Doja.  First, there are the export benefits of the dollar's modest value in comparison to the early Reagan years.  Secondly, entrepreneurs view exporting as a way to build profits that will carry them through the seasonal swings in their domestic markets.  Most of the Minnesota activity is coming from the state's major food and packaging industries, computer and software businesses, and medical equipment companies.  But, Mr. Doja says, there's also growing interest from more off-beat enterprises, such as a fresh crayfish company in Duluth that ships to Sweden.  "A few years ago, we would have laughed" if a crayfish seller had asked the state for advice on marketing overseas, he says.  Still, there's a possibility that first-time exporters are feeling less adventurous now, than, say, a year ago.  Hank Selby, who heads the Richmond, Va., branch of Schenkers International Forwarders Inc., says he had a lot more requests last year to put on trade seminars for small businesses.  Export fervor ran high last year after the dollar reached its lowest level against the yen since the late 1940s.  He says the slacker interest he sees from would-be, first-time exports these days probably reflects the 20% gain the dollar has shown against the yen since that low point in January 1988.  Jacobo Finkielstain, the Argentine real estate investor, banker and a producer of the Oscar-winning political film, "The Official Story," pleaded guilty to bank fraud and conspiracy in one of the biggest bank-fraud cases ever prosecuted in New York.  At a hearing yesterday, only four days before his trial was scheduled to begin, Mr. Finkielstain admitted his role in two schemes to defraud the now-defunct Central National Bank of New York of $38 million.  Mr. Finkielstain, 51 years old, was indicted earlier this year on charges that he falsified repurchase agreements in 1986 and 1987 to divert $31.5 million from about 21 customer accounts to his own accounts in banks in Uruguay, Switzerland, Panama and Argentina.  The repurchase agreements were said to be secured by Argentine dollar-denominated bonds, but prosecutors say no such bonds were ever deposited.  Prosecutors further allege that the 21 customers had no knowledge of the repurchase agreements.  Mr. Finkielstain was also charged with arranging for his bank to lend more than $6 million to several Uruguayan companies and one U.S. company in which he owned a considerable, "hidden" financial interest.  He pleaded guilty yesterday before U.S. District Judge Michael Mukasey to five of 29 charges in the indictment.  Mr. Finkielstain now faces a maximum sentence of 25 years in prison, down from the 145-year maximum sentence he faced before the guilty plea.  The financial penalty he faces remains unchanged, however.  Judge Mukasey could impose fines as high as $76 million and restitution of as much as $38 million.  Under federal law, a defendant can be fined twice the amount that others allegedly lost as a result of the crimes.  Mr. Finkielstain had flown to New York from his home in Buenos Aires yesterday morning.  After the hearing, neither the investor, nor his attorney, Barry T. Kingham of the New York law firm of Curtis, MalletProvost, Colt & Mosle, would comment on the guilty plea.  In an earlier interview, Mr. Kingham described Mr. Finkielstain as a well-respected Argentine entrepreneur, better known for his real estate ventures than as a banker.  Mr. Finkielstain is the principal owner of a 26-story office tower in midtown Manhattan, which was once the home of Central National.  Now, its principal tenants are the big New York law firms of Schulte Roth & Zabel and Willkie, Farr & Gallagher.  Mr. Finkielstain posted his interest in the building for the $30 million bail set in his criminal case.  Mr. Finkielstain is also known as the major backer of "The Official Story," a film about an Argentine woman who adopts the child of a leftist activist murdered by the Argentine military.  The film won an Oscar award in 1986.  Mr. Finkielstain first acquired an interest in the Central National bank in January 1981.  By October 1985, according to court records, he owned a 99% interest.  Two years later, the bank was declared insolvent.  At the time of the collapse, the bank had $170 million in deposits in 13,400 accounts.  Most of its customers were South Americans.  Also charged in the indictment was Salomon Kaplan, who worked for Mr. Finkielstain in Buenos Aires.  Mr. Kaplan, who was indicted on the same 29 counts as his boss, entered a guilty plea earlier this year and agreed to cooperate with the government.  "In the last few weeks, Finkielstain learned that Kaplan would testify against him at the trial," said Elliot Peters, another Assistant U.S. Attorney working on the case.  "And he soon became aware that the government was able to show a flow of millions of dollars in illicit funds into his account."  Montclair Bancorp reported higher net income for the fiscal third quarter and nine months, although the year-earlier periods were affected by a nonrecurring cost.  Net for the quarter ended July 31 rose 14% to $961,000, or 39 cents a share, from $841,000, or 34 cents a share, a year ago.  Net for the nine months rose 21% to $3.3 million, or $1.34 a share, from $2.7 million, or $1.11 a share, a year ago.  Year-earlier figures included $249,000 in nonrecurring costs related to a terminated agreement to affiliate with First Fidelity Bancorp. of New Jersey.  The company posted net interest income of $3.9 million for the quarter, up 6%, and $12 million for the nine months, up 14%.  Total interest expense was $8.9 million for the quarter, up 44%, and $24.3 million for the nine months, up 41%.  Montclair Bancorp had assets of $541.4 million as of Oct. 31, 1988.  If Oscars were given for campy titles, outrageous dismemberments and the world's dumbest scripts, Lloyd Kaufman and Michael Herz would have coffee tables full of them.  But movies like "The Class of Nuke 'Em High," "The Toxic Avenger" and "Surf Nazis Must Die" don't win prizes.  That's all right with movie moguls Kaufman and Herz.  Their small-time studio, Troma Inc., doesn't exist to please members of the Motion Picture Academy.  It exists to make money, and it does, with production methods that owe more to home movies than to MGM.  While other independent studios like DeLaurentiis, Cannon, Vestron and Weintraub started out small, they succumbed to grandiosity and are struggling to survive or have already sunk.  Troma, however, is entering its 15th year, cranking out movie after low-budget movie in a grubby building in Hell's Kitchen, west of Time's Square.  "We're the smallest, cheapest movie studio in America," says Mr. Kaufman, sitting behind an oak desk piled high with scripts in his unkempt office.  "But we do everything Paramount does" -- make movies, promote them, distribute them, sell foreign, videocassette and television rights.  Mr. Kaufman recently returned from the Cannes Film Festival screening of "Toxic Avenger: Part II" and "Rabid Grannies."  "Toxic Avenger: Part III" is now being edited; the script is being written for "Class of Nuke 'Em High: Part II"; and actors are trying out for "Kabuki Man," the story of a New York City detective who is transformed into a flying superhero in Oriental garb.  Over at Troma's temporary production offices for "Kabuki Man," boot camp for young film makers is in session.  The movie's production manager is Andrew Wolk, a cherubic-faced 25-year-old who traded stocks on Wall Street for a year before arriving at Troma, having heard the company took beginners.  "The only thing I knew about movies was how to watch them," he says.  For "Toxic Avenger: II," his first movie, he rounded up cars for chase scenes, hired most of the extras and wrote some of the script.  He also shaved his head to play the part of a bad guy, who machine guns an old lady in a wheelchair.  Pericles Lewnes, age 28, is in charge of special effects.  This is Mr. Lewnes's fourth Troma film.  In a movie called "War," he appeared in 39 different scenes and died on screen three times.  In "Toxic Avenger: III," he was the devil's stunt double, which required him to spit maggots.  He is now quite pleased with a special effect he designed for "Kabuki Man."  "The hero throws these Japanese noodles in a guy's face," he explains.  "They work their way into his mouth, nose and ears, then his stomach inflates and explodes.  I did it for $10]"  When it comes to making salable movies cheap, there are few more seasoned instructors than Messrs.  Kaufman and Herz.  Hollywood movies cost about $20 million -- excluding advertising -- and the majority don't earn what they cost.  Troma claims to spend $1 million to $2 million and make money most of the time.  Troma movies are non-union, and except for a few key specialists like the cameraman, they're made by a small army of virtually unpaid, inexperienced wannabes.  The star of "Toxic Avenger: II" was muscular Ron Fazio, an ex-football player turned nightclub bouncer who was hired without so much as a grade-school acting credit.  "I was the size they wanted," he says humbly.  Production values are notoriously low.  Rick Collins, a Long Island lawyer with acting aspirations, says his costume as the devil in "Toxic III" was painted green because Troma didn't have red paint and wouldn't buy any.  "Pre-production" on "Toxic II" last summer included a daily dawn cruise by the props department of curbside garbage in Manhattan. "{The producers} try to get free props, food, costumes, as much as possible, for the promise of a screen credit," says Mark Torgl, who has acted in several Troma movies.  "At the end of a Troma movie," he says, "the 'special thanks' credits roll for five minutes."  Since its actors are raw and film is expensive, Troma scripts are rehearsed repeatedly off-camera, but scenes rarely get more than one take.  If an actor isn't around, he is likely to be written out of the scene.  Should a sunny day turn rainy, filming continues.  Mr. Collins, the lawyer, remembers a scene in "War" where "it's raining on one person but not the other."  He adds, "you can't say the 'C' word around Troma.  That's continuity."  The Troma boys say they lack the talent and money to make good movies so they try to make bad movies funny.  In "Toxic II," the hero windsurfs to Japan and battles villains in a big Tokyo fish market: One man, transfixed by the fight, doesn't notice that a bad guy has landed belly-up on his carving table and that he's hacking the man's limbs instead of a shark carcass.  If you're not laughing, you're probably over 18, the prime age of Troma fans.  Troma movies are shot in three to six weeks, and sometimes they don't last much longer in theaters.  But a commercial release, however brief, makes them more attractive to video stores, cable movie networks and foreign buyers.  The cable channel USA Network, for example, has a new late-night weekend movie program called "Up All Night" for which Troma movies are steady fodder.  Some Troma movies are bigger hits overseas than here.  It was Japanese and German distributors who urged Troma to make a sequel of "Toxic Avenger."  Tromatically speaking, "Toxic Avenger" is "our 'Gone With the Wind,'" says Mr. Kaufman, who claims it cost less than $1 million to make and has grossed more than $15 million.  The hero -- who develops a chemical reaction to evil after falling into a vat of toxic waste -- has a modest cult following.  Avon Books has bought paperback fiction rights, merchandisers are negotiating to make Toxic dolls and a Saturday morning cartoon is in the works.  Messrs.  Kaufman and Herz started Troma in 1974.  The two met at Yale, where Mr. Kaufman made student films.  After college, Mr. Kaufman hooked up with director John Avildson and learned the low-budget ropes on such movies as "Rocky," where his tasks included playing a drunk carried into a bar by Sylvester Stallone.  Mr. Kaufman also made a string of hard-core porn movies, under a pseudonym, including a musical featuring porn star Harry Reems.  Mr. Herz went to law school before joining up with his old school chum and taking on the business side of the operation.  Their earliest successes were goofy adolescent sex fantasies like "Squeeze Play" in which a gang of well-endowed young women form a softball team and challenge their boyfriends to a game.  But when Hollywood moved into their territory, with quality teen-sex comedies like "Risky Business," Troma turned to horror.  "Horror fans go even when the horror doesn't work," says Mr. Kaufman.  Now that Troma is doing so well that the Toxic Avenger is mutating into its own industry, some people are urging the principals to upgrade their product.  "I've watched Troma go from raunch to sleaze and I'm a little disappointed they don't try to broaden their audience," says Mr. Avildson, the director.  But Troma won't try.  "Our destiny is a small one," says Mr. Kaufman.  "But at least we're in control of it."  AMERICAN PIONEER Inc., Orlando, Fla., said its board suspended preferred stock dividends and adopted a restructuring plan to convert preferred to common shares.  The thrift holding company said it was taking the action to meet tightened capital requirements in the new savings-and-loan bailout law.  The dividend suspension and conversion of preferred to common stock will apply to both the holding company and its American Pioneer Savings Bank, the holding company said.  The restructuring plan, the company said, will be submitted for shareholder approval at a special meeting to be held as soon as the Securities and Exchange Commission has cleared proxy materials.  The company also said negotiations are under way to shed company assets, in addition to the 13 branches in the Orlando area already covered in a definitive sale agreement.  For nearly two hours, F.W. de Klerk, South Africa's acting president, tries to sell himself as a reformer.  He avoids using the word apartheid.  He talks fondly of a new South Africa free of white domination.  He pledges to use "every ounce of energy" to begin negotiations with black leaders for a new constitution.  But much of his audience, in one of this country's few bastions of white liberalism, isn't convinced.  Hecklers say his new South Africa sounds a lot like the old, or present, one.  Finally, Mr. de Klerk makes a final, impassioned pitch.  "Stop making racists out of us," he says.  "We aren't racists."  South Africa's campaign trail has always been a rough-and-tumble place, where the intense emotions of this deeply polarized country are stripped bare.  But this year's trail, leading to the Sept. 6 parliamentary election, is particularly treacherous for Mr. de Klerk's National Party, which is facing its sternest test from parties to both the left and the right since it assumed power in 1948.  It is also turning into a tough proving ground for Mr. de Klerk, who is enduring the scrutiny not only of South African voters but also of a curious international community as he tries to retool his reputation from conservative segregationist to enlightened reformer.  Even the voteless black majority is testing Mr. de Klerk's reformist intentions.  The Mass Democratic Movement, a coalition of anti-apartheid groups, says organizations that have been restricted under the government's three-year-old state of emergency will defy their restrictions this weekend by holding previously forbidden political gatherings.  In recent days, police have begun arresting and detaining participants in the movement's "defiance campaign," and Mr. de Klerk warns that he won't hesitate to clamp down on protesters if violence erupts.  But the movement, in a press statement, says any government action against this weekend's meetings will "belie Mr. de Klerk's assertion that he is moving away from apartheid toward a South Africa free from racial oppression."  On the campaign stump, Mr. de Klerk is trying to erase the two most vivid images of South Africa: the scowling and vengeful countenance of P.W. Botha, who resigned from the presidency earlier this week after a power struggle with Mr. de Klerk, and the oppressive and unjust face of apartheid, the National Party's policy of racial segregation that has made South Africa an international pariah.  In contrast, Mr. de Klerk projects a smiling and jocular presence; instead of belittling campaign hecklers, as Mr. Botha would have, Mr. de Klerk jousts good-naturedly with them.  And, in those rare moments when he mentions apartheid, it sounds as if it is a concept from another time and another place -- and another party.  "I have been in Parliament for 17 years and have never used the word apartheid positively," Mr. de Klerk tells a campaign rally held at a primary school in a wealthy, liberal suburb of Johannesburg.  "Apartheid is the policy of the Conservative Party.  Stop hanging it around the National Party's head."  But whether the National Party is indeed ready, and willing, to shed the yoke of apartheid is a key question of this election.  For while the Nationalists are trying to lure support away from the anti-apartheid Democratic Party with reformist talk, they also are careful not to give away too much ground to the pro-apartheid Conservative Party, which is enticing voters with its claims that the National Party is selling out white interests.  This makes for confusing rhetoric and leaves few hints as to how far Mr. de Klerk will actually travel down the road of reform to accommodate the political aspirations of the disfranchised black majority, should he win the election, as is expected.  Leaning on a podium festooned with a National Party poster proclaiming "fairness, firmness, peace," Mr. de Klerk says, "White domination must come to an end, but we're not prepared to exchange it for black domination."  Asks a heckler: "What then?"  "Two wrongs don't make a right," says Mr. de Klerk.  Fairness, he later adds, "also means fairness for us," meaning whites.  He promises justice for all, but not at the expense of security for whites.  "We're not prepared to make other people free to allow this country to fall into chaos," he says.  Shouts another heckler, "It's in chaos already."  He pledges to negotiate with everyone, but not with the banned African National Congress, which includes guerrilla activity in its campaign to topple the government.  "We're not afraid to talk to people who differ with us.  But we say we aren't prepared to compromise with violence and terrorism," he says.  "We want to engage recognized leaders in discussion."  Someone calls out the name of Nelson Mandela, the leader of the ANC and the world's most famous political prisoner.  "I think much too much credence is given to the ANC," Mr. de Klerk says.  He vows to rebuild a vibrant economy, without which, he says, a political solution isn't possible.  "Your party wrecked the economy," says a heckler.  Mr. de Klerk admits that mistakes have been made, but adds that much of the damage has been done by international sanctions, such as "a total cutoff of foreign capital."  An angry voice shouts, "Why?  Tell us why?"  Mr. de Klerk responds: "Mainly because we refused to accept an ANC government."  He says all South Africans, regardless of color, should participate equally on all levels of government, but not necessarily together.  A common voters roll would lead to black majority rule and infringe on the rights of minority groups, such as whites, he warns.  Group protection has been at the heart of National Party policy for the past 40 years, and will remain so, he says.  "Safety, prosperity and dignity as an individual and within his or her own group," promises Mr. de Klerk.  "This reflects the reality of South Africa."  A voice from the back cries, "Sounds like apartheid."  Mr. de Klerk, the reformer, is encouraged, for he senses at least one consensus here.  "The status quo must be changed," he says, "and be changed drastically."  Mumbles a heckler: "I'll say."  Teco Energy Inc., Tampa, Fla., said it is seeking a buyer for its interest in Teco Technologies Inc., its computer consulting unit.  The energy-related holding company said the move is part of a strategy to focus on its core electric-power generation and other energy businesses.  Timothy L. Guzzle, Teco's president and chief executive officer, said the unit, which helps companies solve computer problems, isn't "the best fit for us in the long term."  Omnicare Inc., a Cincinnati-based medical and dental supplies concern, said it completed the previously announced sale of its hospital pharmacy management business to Diagnostek Inc., Albuquerque, N.M., for $27 million in cash and stock.  With the sale of Los Angeles-based HPI Health Care Services Inc., Omnicare said it would have a one-time gain of about $1 million in the third quarter.  In the 1988 third quarter, the company earned $769,000, or eight cents a share, on revenue of $37 million.  In the 1989 first half, it earned $1.9 million, or 21 cents a share, on revenue of $82.5 million.  Omnicare said proceeds would be used to fund possible acquisitions and to buy back its shares.  The transaction included $20 million in cash and 250,000 Diagnostek shares valued at $2 million.  Omnicare said it would retain $5 million in assets, which would be converted to cash over time.  Diagnostek provides prescription drugs through mail service for funded medical plans, and operates medical diagnostic imaging centers for hospitals and health-care institutions.  HPI provides contractual pharmacy management services to about 110 hospitals and had 1988 revenue of $66 million.  Gerber Scientific Inc. reported fiscal first-quarter net income edged up on a 7.5% increase in sales.  The South Windsor, Conn., maker of factory automation systems said net income for the quarter ended July 31 was $7.7 million, or 32 cents a share, up from $7.6 million, or 30 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales were $74.7 million, compared with $69.5 million, Gerber said.  Gerber said new orders in the quarter and backlog as of July 31 were down from the year-earlier period.  "We encountered some order-entry softness in our markets in the first quarter, which we believe was related to slower capital spending and a higher U.S. dollar," said Gerber's chairman and president, H. Joseph Gerber.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Gerber shares closed at $19, down 25 cents.  American Physicians Service Group Inc., Austin, Texas, said its board approved a shareholder rights plan intended to deter a hostile takeover.  The company said the move wasn't in response to a specific effort to take over this provider of financial services to doctors and hospitals.  But a company spokesman said the plan was adopted, in part, because American Physicians is 23%-owned by Lincoln Savings & Loan.  Lincoln is operating under the conservatorship of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. and is likely to ultimately dispose of its stake in the company.  Terms of the plan allow shareholders to buy stock in the company, or a surviving company, at half price under certain conditions, such as if a group acquires 35% or more of the company, if a holder of at least 20% of the stock engages in a self-dealing transaction or if the company is merged.  One right will be issued for each share outstanding on Aug. 16, and the rights will expire Aug. 15, 1999.  International Business Machines Corp. and Siemens AG said they will form a marketing joint venture as part of Siemens's agreement to buy IBM's Rolm communications unit.  The companies said they will establish Rolm Co., based in Norwalk, Conn., to market and service Rolm and Siemens communication products in the U.S. Siemens will establish Rolm Systems, a subsidiary in Santa Clara, Calif., to develop and make phones and business-switchboard systems.  The companies agreed that IBM will market Siemens communications systems under the IBM logo in Europe and Australia.  IBM will also distribute Rolm products in Canada and Japan, they said.  Siemens, of West Germany, and IBM, of Armonk, N.Y., had reached an agreement last December, but details of that accord weren't worked out.  Industry analysts said negotiations were bogged down by disagreements over the joint venture and the purchase price for Rolm.  According to an unrelated document issued yesterday by Siemens, the German concern agreed in December to pay IBM $844 million, plus as much as an additional $305 million, depending on results of Rolm.  A Siemens spokesman said the final price for Rolm may be different from that agreed to last December.  Get set for Eastman Kodak Co.'s latest shot at cutting costs.  The photographic, pharmaceutical and chemical concern is expected to unveil next week its fourth restructuring plan since 1983.  Kodak, whose first-half earnings slid 60%, won't discuss details, but industry experts say they don't foresee the sale of a major business or steep job cuts.  Rather, the company is expected to continue along the lines of earlier restructuring efforts.  Industry experts and analysts expect the company to freeze wages of salaried employees, cut its work force by about 1,500 -- or about 1% -- and pare marginal businesses.  Among the likely targets: machines that read microfilm and other micrographic products, videocassette tapes and specialty films.  The expected moves, designed to produce savings of $150 million to $200 million, may not be enough to get Kodak back on its feet, some Wall Street analysts contend.  "It's going to be strategic trimming, not the slaughter some people are hoping for," says Alex Henderson, an analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. Kodak must produce savings of $400 million just to match last year's earnings of $4.31 a share, he maintains.  Adds John J. Larish, a former Kodak manager turned consultant: "Kodak has been going through constant restructuring for the past three years.  They've attempted to cut costs piecemeal, but it hasn't worked."  Kodak's president, Kay Whitmore, argues that previous restructurings have boosted productivity, but concedes that results this year have been disappointing.  Kodak's second-quarter net plunged 85% to $60 million, or 18 cents a share, reflecting a $227 million restructuring charge.  The earnings decline followed a 23% drop in the first quarter to $200 million, or 62 cents a share.  "We need to sharpen our focus.  We want to shed operations that aren't value-added," Mr. Whitmore says.  "We want to make changes now that will be permanent."  After languishing for six months, Kodak's stock price recently has rebounded on takeover rumors.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Kodak closed at $49.875, unchanged.  Takeover rumors have been fueled in part by those who believe the company's breakup value exceeds its current share price.  In addition, some feel that Kodak has failed to reap the profits it should out of many businesses and might benefit from new ownership.  But what might dissuade a potential acquirer is the huge debt Kodak assumed with its $5.1 billion takeover of Sterling Drug Co. last year.  The company doesn't expect its fledgling pharmaceutical business to generate big profits anytime soon.  Moreover, it still faces a potential multibillion-dollar liability from Polaroid Corp.'s successful patent-infringement suit regarding instant cameras.  In that case, the amount of damages against Kodak has yet to be determined.  Granted, Kodak hasn't been sitting on its hands.  When profits began sinking in the first quarter, in part because of unfavorable currency exchange rates, it immediately announced a $200 million cost-cutting program.  And Kodak has gradually been eliminating small businesses with poor returns.  But analysts and others say Kodak hasn't been able to control costs nearly as effectively as its competitors, especially in core businesses such as photographic products.  Some blame the company's cautious, conservative culture.  "What you want to change is the attitude from the top down," says Brenda Lee Landry, an analyst at Morgan Stanley & Co. who believes that "Kodak's management is fat."  Kodak's cash cows -- film and photographic paper -- also have been hurt by competition.  Unfavorable currency exchange rates have left it facing higher costs overseas, but unable to raise prices because of steep competition from companies like Fuji Photo Film Co. of Japan.  Playing hardball, Kodak has decided to cancel business with distributors that also sell Fuji products.  "It's a sign to dealers that Kodak is weakening," says Robert L. Fitzpatrick, a consultant to distributors and dealers.  It's easy to understand Kodak's concern.  Sales per employee last year totaled $140,000 for Kodak, compared with $380,000 at Fuji, according to Eugene Glazer, analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  And that's in spite of a series of restructurings, including a major overhaul in 1986 that slashed 10% of the company's work force and streamlined business units.  Profits rebounded in 1987 and hit a record $1.4 billion in 1988, but earnings so far this year have been hurt by rising costs and the strengthening dollar.  Some analysts have pressed for the sale of a major business such as chemicals.  But that operation is currently Kodak's best performer and is unlikely to go on the block.  Similarly, the household-products division, which Kodak had intended to spin off, is the only profitable business acquired in the Sterling takeover.  Kodak's information-systems division, which makes printers, copiers and computer software and was considered a bright spot a few years ago, could be the hardest hit in the latest restructuring.  Poor sales, especially of copiers, resulted in a 93% earnings drop for the division in the second quarter.  But few changes are expected in the imaging business, which accounts for close to 40% of Kodak's sales.  The division underwent a small reorganization in the second quarter, but that failed to boost profits.  While sales increased 9%, profits dropped 6%, hurt by "manufacturing inefficiencies," the company says.  Kodak also is unlikely to drop product lines that are performing poorly but that it believes have strong growth potential.  Among these: X-ray equipment, consumer batteries and electronic imaging.  "They've got a lot of businesses that are soaking up profits," says Mary G. Meeker, analyst with Salomon Bros.  "But they can't seem to get rid of them."  Cleveland-Cliffs Inc. said its previously announced settlement of $205 million from LTV Corp.'s LTV Steel Co. regarding bankruptcy claims was approved by the federal bankruptcy court.  Under terms of the settlement, Cleveland-Cliffs would assume from LTV by Jan. 1, 1990, an additional 10% interest in the Empire iron-ore mine in Michigan.  Each company would then have a 25% interest in the mine, which has annual capacity of eight million tons.  The $205 million payment stems from settlement of damages related to the Tilden iron-ore mine, also in Michigan.  LTV, based in Dallas, filed for bankruptcy protection in 1986.  Cleveland-Cliffs said it plans to distribute to shareholders net proceeds of recoveries from LTV and Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel Corp., which is also in bankruptcy court proceedings, totaling $305 million.  The Cleveland company said the timing and amount of recoveries depend on those steel companies' plans of reorganization being approved by bankruptcy courts.  Clorox Co., Oakland, Calif., posted a $21.9 million loss from its discontinued paint unit, forcing a nearly 50% plunge in its fourth-quarter net income to $18.8 million, or 34 cents a share, from $36.6 million, or 67 cents a share, a year ago.  The household products company posted an 11% increase in operating profit to $40.8 million, or 74 cents a share, for the quarter ended June 30.  The write-downs stem from the planned sale of its Olympic stain and Lucite paint business.  For the year, Clorox posted a 10% gain in operating profit to $145.6 million, or $2.63 a share, from $130.9 million, or $2.39 a share, in fiscal 1988.  A $21.4 million loss from the discontinued operations made net $124.1 million, or $2.24 a share.  For the previous year, a $1.6 million gain from discontinued operations made net $132.6 million, or $2.42 a share.  Results for the year-ago periods were restated to reflect both the discontinued paint operations, as well as the conversion of a note payable to Henkel Corp.  The skippers of several big junk-bond mutual funds have quietly jumped ship -- or been forced to walk the plank -- during the recent rough seas in the high-yield market.  The past few months have brought an unusual amount of turnover among junk-bond fund managers, putting new people in charge of funds that hold billions of dollars of investors' money.  Among the funds in flux: the $2.7 billion Prudential-Bache High Yield Fund, the $1.4 billion Kemper High Yield Fund, $450 million PaineWebber High Yield Bond Portfolio and the $57 million Seligman High Yield Fund.  Managerial changes are vital news for small investors, who rarely are told about them.  Federal regulators soon will address the problem by proposing rules that would force all mutual funds to disclose such changes to shareholders.  Portfolio managers are a big consideration in choosing most funds, of course.  But they are particularly significant now in junk portfolios.  That's because research on individual companies is becoming more crucial as junk defaults rise and the economy slows.  And junk managers can use a wide variety of strategies in choosing where to invest.  "They can bring a personal style that really changes the course of a fund," says Lori Lucas, an analyst at Morningstar Inc., a Chicago financial-publication company.  Fund managers have had a tricky time navigating the $200 billion junk market this year.  That's because the threat of recession has hammered many of the so-called junkiest issues -- smaller, less liquid and less healthy credits -- while the higher-quality junk credit has done well.  There have been other headaches.  Besides default risk, managers often have faced severe price weakness if they try to unload small junk-bond issues in a hurry.  Another potential mine field: a three-month-old Securities and Exchange Commission inquiry into the personal dealings of junk-fund managers.  No one is suggesting that the recent managerial shifts have anything to do with the SEC inquiry.  The SEC, according to people familiar with the probe, is focusing on whether junk-fund managers got sweet personal deals in return for buying certain junk credits.  The recent changes may in fact help some funds.  That's because some departed managers stretched for yield -- and in the process hurt returns, analysts say.  "In many cases it's a positive thing," Morningstar's Ms. Lucas says of the switches.  Consider the PaineWebber High Yield Fund.  Former manager King Bartholomew bought small, thinly traded junk bonds that penalized the fund when he tried to sell them, analysts say.  The fund posted a loss for 1987 and only managed an overall gain last year because of fat interest payments.  Investors, meantime, yanked out money in droves.  For his part, Mr. Bartholomew said that "performance was hampered by less liquid credits, particularly thrifts."  Currently an analyst in PaineWebber's high-yield research department, he said "philosophical differences" between himself and PaineWebber's Mitchell Hutchins asset-management unit led to his departure as fund manager.  Joyce Fensterstock, a Mitchell Hutchins managing director, said Mr. Bartholomew had managed the fund "with a heavy bias toward yield" that became inconsistent with the firm's investment philosophy emphasizing total return -- the yield plus any price changes in the securities.  Peter Avelar, the new manager, says he has a much more conservative bent.  He increased portfolio diversity; the fund, for instance, pared back several issues that made up more than 2% of total assets.  He sought to slash the fund's exposure to the economic cycle.  He dumped many housing issues, such as General Development and NV Ryan.  Also out the door: Airline issues, such as Trans World Airlines, Pan Am and Texas Air, that he deems too heavily indebted: "In a recession, that kind of paper can hurt you."  Instead, the fund gobbled up securities deemed recession resistant.  The portfolio currently is more than 80% invested in securities of supermarket, food and beverage, health-care, drug, cable and casino companies.  Other new managers also have cleaned house.  At the Prudential-Bache High Yield Fund, manager Al Klein has pared the portfolio to about 155 issues from the more than 400 overseen late last year by former manager Robert Angevine, who moved to Morgan Stanley Asset Management.  Jettisoned were many relatively small junk issues with less than $100 million outstanding -- including all the fund's savings-and-loan holdings.  The exit wasn't a cinch: getting out of CenTrust Savings Bank, for instance, caused some headaches.  "We finally sold it and took a big hit on it," Mr. Klein says, adding: "You've got to get out of some of this garbage."  In their place, he has added to some bigger holdings such as Harcourt Brace Jovanovich.  "It's easy to get out of," he says, "and is a company with something there -- not just a paper machine."  Some other transitions have been smoother.  At the big Kemper High Yield Fund, co-manager Kenneth Urbaszewski -- the mouthpiece of the fund's big publicity campaign last year -- has taken a leave of absence.  But the fund has continued to thrive with co-manager William Buecking running the portfolio.  At the smaller Seligman High Yield Fund, new managers Paul Wick and Dan Charleston are diversifying the portfolio a bit more than former manager Thomas Nugent.  The fund, which has outperformed many other junk portfolios this year, has a strong weighting in supermarket issues.  But Mr. Wick, who likes these company because they have stable cash flows and are easy to understand, recently sold Stop & Shop, Kroger and Safeway Stores after strong run-ups.  Meantime, he says he never would have bought some of the fund's older and more illiquid credits, such as its 3% position in bonds of Bally's Health & Tennis, a Bally Manufacturing unit.  "If we're going to own a small deal," he says, "we're not going to own a lot of it."  Airline Seats to Asia  Become a Precious Item  IF YOU'RE THINKING about flying to Asia soon, you may be out of luck.  Travel agents and airlines say that many flights to Tokyo, Hong Kong and other popular Asian destinations are virtually sold out for the next few weeks.  "Getting across the Pacific right now is a mess," says Stephen Taylor, chief operating officer for Lifeco Travel Services, a big Houston-based agency.  "The flights are just ungodly tight."  The crunch is the result of the boom in travel to Asia, where air traffic has risen more than 20% in each of the past two years.  "It's easily the fastest-growing region in the world," says James Carey, senior vice president at Airline Economics Inc., a Washington consulting firm.  Agents say travelers who will fly at off hours or take circuitous routes can probably get a flight relatively soon.  But if they want to go on a popular day or nonstop -- as most people do -- they may have to wait weeks.  Karen Torello, manager of Holiday Travel Service in Burlingame, Calif., says one of her clients had to wait three weeks before she could fly directly to Manila from Los Angeles.  "People are just shocked when you tell them how bad it is," she says.  Many are also shocked by the cost.  Although airlines say they haven't drastically raised fares to the Far East, some carriers concede that many discounts have dried up lately.  The problem is likely to last until mid-September, when travel usually slows, but winter is expected to be busy again.  More Airport Travelers  Fly Through Customs UNABLE TO EXPAND its staff sufficiently, the Customs Service has come up with a solution to dealing with the increase in international travel: Inspect fewer passengers.  At least that's what the agency is testing in Los Angeles, San Francisco and Detroit airports.  Instead of pushing harder to get more personnel, the agency has drafted a plan calling for fewer inspections.  "The concept is selectivity," the plan says.  Mighty selective, in fact.  Under one work-saving trick, the agency is getting complete passenger information from the airline on particular flights.  Even with just names and addresses the Customs Service can plug into a computer and search for criminal records or data that would send up a red flag.  If the profile of the travelers is favorable, the agency then whisks the whole plane load through customs on arrival in the U.S. with minimum examination.  The plan might be welcome news for tired, law-abiding travelers, but it might be even better news for drug traffickers and the like.  "Theoretically, I think that's correct," says a Customs official, "but until we've run this strategy awhile, we won't know" how effective it will be.  At least some in Congress are uneasy about this solution.  "Let's face it," says Rep. Charles Rangel (D., N.Y.), chairman of the House Select Committee on Narcotics Abuse and Control.  "The borders are a sieve. . . .  I do hope they revisit this and recognize the need for more manpower and resources."  It Costs More to Cool Off  In Canadian Rental Cars  WHEN YOU RENT a car in the U.S., you normally get air conditioning without paying extra.  That's not the case in Canada.  Budget Rent a Car, Avis and Tilden Car & Truck Rental all charge 6 Canadian dollars (US$5.08) a day extra for air conditioning.  Hertz says its charge for air varies with the location.  In most cases, those charges raise the total rental cost by more than 10%.  And it's essentially a hidden charge for anyone used to renting in the U.S.; when you ask for a price quote, the reservations clerk in Canada won't necessarily tell you the price doesn't include air conditioning.  A Hertz spokeswoman says the extra charge is justified because Canada imposes a one-time $100 user tax on cars with air conditioning.  And everyone in the business likes to point out that Canada isn't known for hot weather.  One problem with this argument: Like a lot of northern locations, Canada has its hot days, too.  In Toronto, for instance, the average high temperature last month was 81 degrees, including one day when the mercury hit 91.  Car rental companies "try to scrounge out whatever money they can," says Herbert J. Teison, editor of Travel Smart newsletter in Dobbs Ferry, N.Y.  "If they can make a few bucks charging extra for air conditioning, they will."  But the consumer who wants air conditioning without paying extra stands a good chance of getting his wish.  Budget, for example, says 75% of its Canadian fleet is equipped with air conditioning.  So the chances are three-in-four that you'll get a cool car, even if you ask don't ask for one.  Odds and Ends  THE THREE TOP U.S. airlines control more than half of the domestic passenger traffic for the first time ever.  American Airlines, United Airlines and Delta Air Lines carried 51.9% of the total traffic during the first six months of 1989.  In the year-earlier period, when Eastern Airlines wasn't hobbled by a strike, the top three controlled just 47.6%. . . .  First there were nonsmoker hotel rooms.  Now there are nonsmoker rental cars, though they're not going over as big.  In Reno, Nev., Avis offers cars that it says have never been smoked in.  "This is still being done on a test basis," a spokeswoman says.  Some locations have found it too unwieldy.  Hertz doesn't offer no-smokers, noting that "if a customer has a passenger who smokes, you've created a smoking car."  Noranda Inc. and Trelleborg AB launched a 2.13 billion Canadian dollar (US$1.81 billion) offer for the approximately 73% of Falconbridge Ltd. shares they don't already own.  As proposed earlier this week, the two companies offered C$37 (US$31.41) a share, topping a rival friendly bid for Toronto-based Falconbridge by Greenwich, Conn.-based Amax Inc.  That bid, which expires Sept. 1, is worth C$2.85 billion, or C$36.125 a share.  In an advertisement in today's edition of The Wall Street Journal, Noranda and Trelleborg said their bid is conditioned on acceptances being received from holders of at least 25 million Falconbridge shares.  The offer will expire Sept. 15 unless it is extended.  Noranda, a Toronto-based resource giant, and Trelleborg, a Swedish industrial group, together own 21.5 million Falconbridge shares, or about 27.2% of the fully diluted share capital.  Falconbridge shares have traded above the offer price since Noranda and Trelleborg announced the proposed bid earlier this week.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, Falconbridge shares ended at C$38.625, down 12.5 cents.  Amax officials couldn't be reached.  Qintex Entertainment Inc. said it expects to have between four and eight equity partners in its $600 million acquisition of MGM/UA Communications Co.'s United Artists movie studio, and added that it plans to complete the transaction by a Sept. 30 deadline even though financing is still being arranged.  Separately, Trevor Fetter, senior vice president of MGM/UA, said the company plans to build a new film unit after it completes the sale.  Hollywood has been rife with rumors that Christopher C. Skase, the Australian chairman of Qintex, has been unable to arrange the financing for the deal.  In an interview, David Evans, president and chief executive officer of Qintex Entertainment, said the "rumors are simply not true."  Mr. Evans said Qintex initially planned to finance the acquisition with $300 million in debt and $300 million in equity.  But he said the company now expects to finance the transaction with $500 million or more in equity from potential partners in the U.S., Japan, Europe and the U.K.  He expects the remainder to be raised in debt.  "We are going a different and unusual route in raising the financing," said Mr. Evans.  "We didn't go to an investment banker and because of that people are presuming the deal is in trouble.  There's no doubt the deal will close and we expect to have four to eight equity partners."  Mr. Fetter said that after the planned sale, the company's remaining operations will be the television group, which produces among other things the series "thirtysomething"; a library of 34 films; and an office building in Beverly Hills.  Financier Kirk Kerkorian holds an 82% stake in the company.  "We haven't done anything to get started on a new MGM because we don't want to compete with UA," said Mr. Fetter.  "Once we close that deal at the end of September, we will be building a film company."  Mr. Fetter said he expects the new MGM film company to produce about six films a year with an average budget of roughly $10 million.  In May, MGM/UA announced that its primary film executives would join United Artists, raising questions about its future in film production.  The company said Richard Berger, head of MGM/UA film, would continue as president of the United Artists Film Group.  Mr. Fetter said yesterday that the new MGM plans to hire a new head of its future film group.  And he said the MGM division of the company plans to release two films in September.  The films are "A Dry White Season," starring Marlon Brando and Susan Sarandon, and "Stanley and Iris," starring Jane Fonda.  Since May, United Artists has acquired seven film projects, including "Little Monsters," a film produced by John Davis.  The company also plans to release "Rocky V" and it recently released the "Wizard of Oz" and "Rain Man" on home video.  Under the terms of the May agreement, Qintex would keep the MGM/UA film production and marketing unit; a domestic film distribution unit; a one-third interest in a world-wide film distribution venture; an international television distribution unit; MGM/UA Home Video; and the United Artists film library, which has about 4,000 film titles.  Qintex Entertainment is 44%-owned by Qintex Australia Ltd., an Australian operator of resorts and commercial television network.  Mr. Evans said there will be a new company, called Qintex America, after the acquisition is completed, but he declined to comment on its structure.  He also declined to comment on whether the company might be taken private.  PaineWebber Group Inc. agreed to buy the New York Stock Exchange specialist firm in charge of trading International Business Machines Corp. and 33 other stocks.  PaineWebber's agreement to buy deCordova, Cooper & Co. is part of a trend that PaineWebber officials say they want to join.  Major brokerage firms have been acquiring Big Board specialists, especially since the October 1987 stock market crash.  Such acquisitions may give an edge to the brokerage firms by giving them access to more market information, brokerage-firm officials say.  Many industry officials assert that specialists -- the powerful firms assigned to make markets in specific stocks on the exchange floor -- are dinosaurs in the electronic age.  But PaineWebber officials say that even if exchange trading is radically changed in coming years, the specialists still will be important.  Terms of the deCordova deal, expected to be completed by September, weren't disclosed.  Industry officials estimated the sale price at about $15 million.  PaineWebber already has acquired five specialist firms since 1985, but the deCordova acquisition is its first Big Board specialist firm.  "While it's the first NYSE one, it's part of a program to expand our presence in this business," said Donald B. Marron, PaineWebber chairman and chief executive officer.  The fate of deCordova has been closely watched on Wall Street.  Several months ago, Bear Stearns Cos. tentatively agreed to buy the firm, but questions were raised at the exchange about Bear Stearns's joint-account arrangement in the past with a group including John Mulheren.  Mr. Mulheren was involved with stock speculator Ivan Boesky and later was arrested for allegedly threatening Mr. Boesky's life, after Mr. Boesky began cooperating with the government's insider-trading investigation.  PaineWebber already owns regional specialist firms in Los Angeles, San Francisco and Boston.  Besides IBM stock, the deCordova firm, founded in 1874, makes a market in Tandy Brands Inc., Zenith Electronics Corp., British Petroleum Co., Transco Energy Co. and Woolworth Corp.  The output of crude steel by non-communist nations edged up 1.9% in July to 39.6 million metric tons from 38.9 million tons a year earlier, the International Iron and Steel Institute said.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  The July output was down slightly from 40 million tons in June.  The small year-to-year rise in July reflected a 1.9% decline in U.S. output to 7.4 million tons from 7.5 million tons in July 1988.  Production of European Community steelmakers rose 6.1% in July to 11.6 million tons from 10.9 million tons a year earlier.  Among EC producers, output rose 5.1% in Britain, 6.7% in Spain and 4% in West Germany.  In Japan, steelmakers increased production 2.8% to 9.2 million tons from 8.9 million tons.  Brazil's steel output was unchanged in July from a year earlier at 2.1 million tons.  For the first seven months of 1989, non-communist nations raised their steel production 3.4% to 284.8 million tons from 275.5 million tons a year earlier.  The institute's survey covers 33 countries out of the 44 nations in which the institute has members.  They account for 61% of 1988 world steel production and for 97% of output, excluding the Soviet Union and other East bloc countries, China and North Korea.  It had to happen sometime: Hungary's first management buyout.  New York-based Citicorp said a Budapest-based financing affiliate yesterday completed a 700 million Hungarian forints ($12 million) management buyout of state-owned stationery supplier Apisz.  The buyers are an investor group led by senior and middle managers of the 730-employee company.  Most of the work force also are buying a stake, either directly or through an employee stock plan, Citicorp said.  Citicorp, which financed the transaction, will retain more than a one-third holding in the company, a retail-paper supplier based in Budapest with about $86 million in annual sales.  And the U.S. bank believes the transaction could eventually lead to more Western-style deals in the future.  Hungary has been in the vanguard of Eastern bloc nations in opening up its centrally planned economy to greater individual initiative and market forces.  The transaction "was made possible by recent changes in Hungarian legislation through which the government is actively encouraging the privatization of state-owned enterprises," Citicorp said.  In one of these recent changes, such companies have been allowed to recapitalize as joint-stock companies, in which outside investors are allowed to hold a stake.  The federal government ended its investigation of Richard B. Wigton and Timothy L. Tabor, former risk arbitragers at Kidder, Peabody & Co., following an agreement to plead guilty to mail fraud by Robert M. Freeman, a Goldman, Sachs & Co. partner.  The three men were arrested together in February 1987 on insider-trading charges, accused of conspiracy to violate securities laws, securities fraud and other charges.  Those arrests followed a series of plea agreements made by former investment banker Dennis Levine, takeover speculator Ivan Boesky and former Kidder investment banker Martin Siegel.  The same-day arrest of Messrs.  Wigton, Tabor and Freeman was one of the more talked-about Wall Street events at the time.  The impending case, called a "blockbuster" by other attorneys, was to be the case that would spread the insider-trading scandal to some of the most respected houses on Wall Street.  The incident was particularly humiliating for the now 54-year-old Mr. Wigton, who was placed against an office wall, frisked, led away in tears and handcuffed.  Three months later, charges against the three men were dropped when prosecutors, led by U.S. Attorney Rudolph W. Giuliani, asked a federal court to dismiss the indictments.  At the time, the government said it intended to seek new expanded indictments of the three.  But yesterday, Benito Romano, Mr. Giuliani's successor, announced that charges won't be filed against Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor.  At a news conference, Mr. Romano said the two men's arrests in February 1987 were premature.  "We would have been better off not to have proceeded with the arrests so early," Mr. Romano said.  Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor couldn't be reached for comment.  But their attorneys expressed anger over the two-year ordeal.  For Mr. Wigton, "it was frightening, terrorizing, humiliating," said Stanley Arkin, his attorney.  "He's entitled to a sincere and profuse apology, especially from Giuliani, who presided over this."  Mr. Wigton, the former head of risk arbitrage and over-the-counter trading at Kidder, has remained on Kidder's payroll, the firm said.  A spokeswoman said he is currently negotiating with Kidder about another trading job with the firm.  Mr. Arkin said his client wouldn't pursue charges against the government.  Andrew Lawler, Mr. Tabor's attorney, added that "a terrible misjudgment was initially made when Mr. Tabor was arrested more than 2 1/2 years ago without a full investigation having been conducted.  That decision has caused Mr. Tabor incalculable personal and professional damage."  Mr. Tabor, a Rhodes scholar who left Kidder in early 1986, was dismissed as Merrill Lynch & Co.'s head of arbitrage at the time of his arrest.  He was arrested at his Manhattan apartment and jailed overnight in the Metropolitan Correctional Center.  Since that time, he has struggled to find work, his attorney said, and was unemployed for "a significant period of time."  Last year, he managed to get consulting work "in the financial area," said Mr. Lawler, who said he couldn't be more specific.  The government's original indictment against the three men alleged unlawful trading in the stocks of Unocal Corp. and Storer Communications Inc.  The government later indicated it would seek an expanded indictment that would charge illegal trading in the stocks of at least nine companies involved in takeovers.  Criminal defense attorney Gerald Lefcourt, of New York, who was not involved in the case, said the prosecutor's handling of the case was unusual from beginning to end.  "It's very, very rare that you would arrest anyone, cuff them in public and take them from their offices as a show of power and then dismiss your own charges, announce that you're continuing the investigation, and finally concede that it was all a colossal screw-up," said Mr. Lefcourt.  He added that the case "tends to confirm the worst fears about the misuse of power in the U.S. attorney's office."  "It's appalling that these lives were so thoroughly and unconscionably ruined by conduct that was premature and unfounded," Mr. Lefcourt said.  He went on to say that although Mr. Giuliani has conceded that it was wrong to arrest Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor, now he needs to concede that it was also wrong to charge them.  "He owes them not only an apology, but also he needs to help them put their lives back together," Mr. Lefcourt said.  Mr. Giuliani, who is currently running for the Republican nomination for mayor of New York, couldn't be reached for comment.  The Securities and Exchange Commission will allow mutual-fund groups to set their own fund-switching practices without case-by-case regulatory approval, under a rule expected to take effect in October.  The rule, known as 11a-3, limits the charges that may be levied when shareholders switch from one fund to another within a fund group.  The rule eliminates the need for fund-management companies to obtain SEC approval as long as their policies are within the limits set by the rule.  Brian Kaplowitz, assistant director for rule-making in the agency's division of investment management, said the limits are designed to prevent fund groups from effectively doubling sales fees or imposing multiple charges.  But he said the rule is "fairly liberal" in the types of charges it permits.  The rule, proposed in 1986 and now made final in modified form, paves the way for a planned change by at least one major funds company.  Fidelity Investments, Boston, said it plans to change its fees for switching among its specialized sector funds to make investors who switch funds frequently shoulder more of the cost of their active trading.  Fidelity, which had been waiting for SEC approval of its plan, said it expects to make the change effective Nov. 15.  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits fell to a seasonally adjusted 317,000 during the week ended Aug. 5 from 330,000 the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended July 29 increased to a seasonally adjusted 2,182,000, or 2.1% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,175,000 the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was also 2.1%.  Counting all state and federal benefits programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended July 29 fell to 2,121,000 from a revised 2,124,200 a week earlier.  These figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  The Congressional Budget Office warned that even if Congress fulfills its budget agreement with the White House for fiscal 1990, it will have to find more than $60 billion of deficit cuts the following year.  That's more than double the size of any deficit-reduction package enacted in the past several years, CBO Director Robert Reischauer said.  "We have a very long way to go before the deficit is brought down to a level where Americans should feel comfortable," he said.  The CBO report projects a deficit of $127 billion for fiscal 1991, which begins Oct. 1, 1990, even if Congress lives up to the terms of its April budget agreement with the White House.  That is $63 billion above the target of $64 billion set by the Gramm-Rudman deficit-reduction law.  The White House budget office forecasts a deficit of $88 billion for fiscal 1991, assuming Congress carries out the agreement.  The CBO economists said their less optimistic assumptions about the economy account for approximately half the difference.  But White House Budget Director Richard Darman said last month that -- based on his guess of what Congress would actually do -- the fiscal 1991 deficit will be around $105 million.  Mr. Reischauer, in releasing updated projections of the budget gap, called for more public pressure on the Congress and the president to restrain the deficit.  The recent stability of the economy has distracted Americans from the dangers of the deficit, he suggested.  As a result, the nation continues to borrow heavily from abroad, eroding living standards for future generations, he contended.  "How well do you want your children and grandchildren to live?" he asked.  Mr. Reischauer, an economist, also sought to make a moral issue of the deficit.  "It's unseemly to have the richest nation of the world drawing the resources of the rest of the world to support consumption," he said.  Instead of lending money to the U.S., he said that Western Europe and Japan should be investing it in underdeveloped countries.  By CBO projections, the fiscal 1990 deficit is big enough to trigger across-the-board spending cuts this fall under the Gramm-Rudman law.  But the law counts only projections by the White House budget office, and they suggest Congress will avoid triggering the mandatory cuts.  If Congress makes all the spending cuts and raises all the revenue contemplated in its pact with the White House, the CBO said the fiscal 1990 deficit will be $116 billion.  Mr. Reischauer figures that White House budget office's comparable estimate is $105 billion, well below the $110 billion Gramm-Rudman trigger.  Before taking pending legislation into account, the CBO projected the deficit would be $141 billion.  The comparable White House budget office projection, which is expected to be released Monday, is about $116 billion.  The differences between the CBO and the White House reflect different economic assumptions, disagreements about the timing of spending money for the rescue of the thrift industry, and technical factors.  A truce may be declared as soon as today in the trans-Atlantic takeover fight for Gateway Corp., Britain's third-biggest food retailer.  A buy-out group headed by U.S. investment firm Wasserstein Perella & Co. lost its battle last month for control of Gateway to Isosceles PLC, a British investor group.  But the U.S. group still holds about a 40% stake.  The presence of an antagonistic minority holder hinders Isosceles from restructuring Gateway or paying off debt on the highly leveraged buy-out, Europe's biggest ever.  Last night, the rival bidding groups were working out the details of a settlement ending their month-old stalemate, according to persons close to the negotiations.  "We are literally in the hopefully final stages of the whole story," one individual said.  A second person cautioned, however, that the accord's timing is still unsettled.  The exact form of the settlement also isn't clear.  One possibility would be for the U.S. group, formally called Newgateway PLC, to trade its troublesome stake to Isosceles for certain Gateway assets.  Or, Newgateway might swap its holding for cash for Wasserstein and a 20% stake in Isosceles for grocery chain Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co., Wasserstein's partner in the deal.  The rival bidders apparently have informed the Takeover Panel about their negotiations and sought its approval for a settlement.  James M. Marren, a Japanese yen pit trader at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, pleaded innocent to fraud charges stemming from a federal investigation of commodities trading here.  Mr. Marren, 39 years old, was indicted along with 20 other yen pit traders earlier this month.  He was charged with conspiracy under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, with 13 counts of mail fraud and 16 violations of commodities laws.  James Streicker, a lawyer for Mr. Marren, said his client "denies he defrauded anybody.  He's anxious to go to trial and be vindicated."  Mr. Marren is still trading, Mr. Streicker said.  Mr. Marren is the 14th yen trader to plead innocent.  Three have pleaded guilty and are cooperating with prosecutors.  Four have yet to enter pleas.  No trial date has been set.  The government indicted a total of 46 traders at the Merc and Chicago Board of Trade, and further indictments are expected.  At a recent Manhattan showing of "When Harry Met Sally," an otherwise polite audience of upscale young professionals turned into a vicious, near-riotous crowd when a commercial -- one that the audience had seen too many times on TV -- preceded the feature.  The chorus of boos and hisses drowned out the ad, but couldn't mask the insults and curses other audience members hurled at American Express Co., the advertiser.  An American Express spokeswoman says the company is "certainly aware of the reaction," and that it is "looking at other creative executions."  But she staunchly defends advertising on movie screens: "There is a very impressive and growing body of evidence that it can work effectively in the U.S."  Reaction to the American Express ad has been extreme -- both because it has long appeared on television, and because Cineplex Odeon, the 1,292-screen theater chain now running the ad, recently hiked movie prices at some Manhattan theaters to $7.50 a pop.  But the commercial and others like it are raising anew the debate over whether Americans will ever be ready for ads with their movies.  European theaters have long shown commercials before feature films -- often wacky, creative commercials that audiences actually like to watch.  But in the U.S., the commercials are too often warmed-over imitations of regular TV ads, and can be grating on the nerves of a nation already bombarded by advertising at every turn.  "What's in it for us?" demanded one irate New Yorker in a letter recently to the theater section of the New York Times.  Among other indignities, he went on to answer himself, "Seeing the same ads, over and over, without the benefit of remote control."  Perhaps if the entire moviegoing public organized against theater ads, some advertisers might reconsider.  But that isn't likely, and advertisers aren't about to let scattered disgruntlement get in the way of a good thing; the thought of millions of captive viewers is simply too appealing.  Screenvision Cinema Network, the largest firm distributing commercials to theaters, delivers ads to 5,700 of the nation's 17,500 first-run theater screens.  It boasts that more than 31 million moviegoers will see its ads over any 28-day period.  Terry Laughren, Screenvision's president, contends that theater audiences are perfectly happy to watch ads as long as the commercials are entertaining -- and new.  The problem with the American Express ad, in his opinion, is that "it's a TV commercial, and it's worn out.  Everybody has seen it."  He says Screenvision generally requires ads to be made for the movies, not for TV. Current advertisers include the U.S. Marines and ABC-TV, which is airing "coming attractions" of two fall shows.  Certified Marketing Services, a Kinderhook, N.Y., research firm that has been tracking audience reactions for Screenvision since 1980, says that only about 4% of audiences react negatively to movie commercials.  The most negative reaction, says William Smith, president, came several years ago in response to a cigarette ad, which was later withdrawn.  The best reactions have been to two recent spots: a Dr Pepper commercial shown in May, to which 30% of audiences reacted "very favorably," and a new California Raisins commercial in which a claymation raisin stars as Michael Jackson, which drew a 24% "very favorable" response, he says.  But Certified Marketing's research doesn't involve audience interviews.  The company simply hires monitors to go to theaters to watch crowd reaction.  So, while Screenvision claims that 96% of audiences react favorably to screen commercials, its definition of "favorable" basically means absence of hoots and hisses.  Some Madison Avenue executives, meanwhile, suggest that the angry audiences may be confined largely to big cities.  "I think it's a New York phenomenon.  In most places, people don't mind theater advertising because in most places, the prices aren't as high as in New York," says Arnold Semsky, an executive vice president at Omnicom's BBDO unit.  In any case, even if audiences aren't enthralled with commercials in theaters, ad industry executives say, they'll get used to them soon enough.  "We don't know of anywhere where commercials were applauded at first.  In time, these will be accepted, too, but they've got to be done right," says John Sisk, a senior vice president of WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson Co. unit.  Thompson clients Eastman Kodak as well as the U.S. Marines use cinema advertising.  Other advertisers that have advertised in movie theaters include Chrysler, Oldsmobile, Champion sportswear and M&M/Mars.  While cinema advertising is growing, the price of entry is high.  Commercials filmed specifically for movie theaters nearly always cost more -- sometimes much more -- than their TV counterparts.  On top of that, Screenvision charges about $650,000 for an ad to be shown nationwide, which works out to about $20 per thousand viewers for a 60-second commercial, Mr. Laughren says.  Prime-time network television ads costs about $9.50 to $10 to reach one thousand 18-to-49 year-olds.  Still, advertisers are clearly intrigued.  American Express, which only began showing ads in movie theaters about three weeks ago, is testing several commercials created specifically for movie theaters, the company's spokeswoman says.  And, ever in search of new marketing opportunities, it is working on some theater-related services for cardholders.  The American Express card recently began being accepted at Cineplex Odeon theaters, for example, the better to pay those $7-plus ticket prices with.  The company is also test-marketing other services, such as one permitting tickets to be ordered by phone.  And as for the howls that greeted its TV commercial, "Our research doesn't show that was an across-the-board phenomenon by any means," the spokeswoman says.  She adds, "We're still very positive that this whole concept can work effectively for us."  ---  Citicorp Reviews Account  Citicorp is reviewing its Citicorp Savings Illinois account at N W Ayer, and will most likely award that account and a new assignment to Foote Cone & Belding, industry executives said.  People close to Citicorp said yesterday that the new assignment will be for its national branch banking franchise.  Included is advertising for 10 states.  Billings couldn't be learned for either account.  Representatives of both agencies said they hadn't been informed of such moves.  "We intend to maintain both Ayer and Foote Cone to serve our advertising needs," a Citicorp spokesman said.  Ayer will continue to handle Citicorp's banking advertising in New York and also its national corporate image work.  Foote Cone, based in Chicago, services Citicorp advertising in more than 10 countries.  Besides difficulty with the Citicorp business, Ayer's Chicago office is currently participating in reviews for two longtime clients.  Illinois Bell, an Ayer client for 52 years, put its estimated $15 million account up for review in late June.  Deere & Co. is reviewing its $10 million account.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Bridgestone Inc., Nashville, Tenn., awarded its estimated $10 million account to Keye/Donna/Pearlstein, New York.  The account had previously been handled by Lintas: Campbell Ewald, Warren, Mich. . . .  Great Wings Inc., Louisville, Ky., named OMON, New York, agency of record for its $2 million Buffalo Bucket Chicken Wings account.  WHO'S NEWS: Geoffrey Frost, 39, was named senior executive vice president and deputy director, marketing and planning department at FCB/Leber Katz Partners, New York.  FCB/LKP is a unit of Foote, Cone & Belding Communications. . . .  Frank Assumma, 36, and J. Edmund Keating, 41, were named executive vice presidents at Backer Spielvogel Bates, a unit of Saatchi & Saatchi.  Japan has decided to resume economic assistance to China and lift a warning against travel there, except in Beijing, officials said.  A Foreign Ministry spokesman told reporters that Japan will gradually resume work on existing aid projects, frozen since the bloody suppression of pro-democracy demonstrators on June 3-4.  He said the decision followed improved security in China.  But the spokesman said that neither new aid nor projects requiring personnel in Beijing, where martial law remains in effect, would be considered in the near future.  Japan was working on 14 projects in China before the violence led to their postponement.  It also had pledged a total of 470 billion yen ($3.31 billion) in credits for six years starting in 1984.  The Toronto Stock Exchange proposed a package of new rules that would lead to publication in an electronic trading "book" of most pending orders to buy or sell stocks.  "Basically, if you want to trade on this exchange, you (will) have to have your order on the electronic book," said James Gallagher, executive vice president of the exchange.  The exchange already has an "electronic book" into which members enter buy or sell orders from their offices.  Floor traders, however, may execute trades among themselves without previously entering their orders in the book.  The new rules give trading priority to orders entered in the book.  Mr. Gallagher said that would give floor traders an incentive to enter their orders, also.  The exchange said members will have access through their computer terminals to all orders entered in the book.  The public will have access to the combined volume of bids and offers at various prices, which would give an indication of the "depth" of the market above and below the current price.  Exchange members have until Sept. 8 to comment on the proposed rules, which may then be amended or adopted by its board.  If they are adopted, Mr. Gallagher said the exchange hopes to begin implementing them by the end of the year.  Share prices burst through the 2350-point resistance level as the market rallied on U.S. and U.K. economic data and a couple of strong company earnings reports.  Tokyo stocks closed firmer in thin dealings after first retreating from a morning surge and then gaining back most of their losses on arbitrage buying in the last hour.  In London, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed up 14.2 points at 2360, but it was down significantly from the day's -- and the year's -- trading high of 2374.8.  At its lowest, the index touched 2356.8, a rise of 11 points.  The market started firmer and gathered momentum during the day, roaring higher on news that the U.S. merchandise trade deficit narrowed to $8.17 billion in June from a revised $10.08 billion in May.  But buying interest began to fade at higher levels and a nervous opening on Wall Street encouraged the market to fall from its peaks for the day.  "The market just wanted to go forward today," one trader said, "and found any excuse to move higher."  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended 13.2 points firmer at 1975.  Turnover at the close was a strong 544.3 million shares, up from 449.8 million Wednesday.  The market was also buoyed by news that the underlying annual growth rate for British average earnings slowed to 9% in June from May's 9.25% rise.  The news helped assuage fears that higher wage costs will hamper the U.K. government's efforts to quell domestic inflation.  Strong rallies in the bank sector also underpinned the market's strength.  "Now that the banks have made a major effort to cover their loans to the Third World, the sector is heading for a re-rating," one dealer said.  This dealer added that the market in bank shares was "extremely tight," and that "one major buyer is mopping up every share in sight."  In response, Barclays rose 4 pence (6 cents) to 521 ($8.24), National Westminster climbed 7 pence to 341, Midland advanced 8 pence to 352 and Lloyds rose 9 pence to 392.  Abbey National continued to attract strong institutional interest and rose 2 pence to 249 on volume of 11 million shares.  British Telecom ended 7 1/2 pence firmer at 259, after announcing higher-than-expected first-quarter pretax profit of #635 million, up from #610 million a year earlier.  Royal Insurance rose 11 pence to 444.  Although the composite insurer reported a 22% drop in interim pretax profit because of poor trading in the U.S., its remaining four divisions achieved record growth.  GKN jumped 13 pence to 471, as players continued to respond to a recent buy recommendation from London brokers County Natwest Woodmac that suggested the shares are seriously undervalued.  In Tokyo, the key Nikkei index set another record after ending above 35000 for the first time Wednesday.  The market lacked energy, however.  Most institutional and individual investors weren't active participants, either as buyers or sellers.  Traders said the market was led mainly by brokerage houses trading for their own accounts.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues closed up a slim 5.96 points at 35090.11.  The index gained 273.46 points Wednesday.  In early trading in Tokyo Friday, the Nikkei index fell 28.73 points to 35061.38.  Thursday's volume on the first section was estimated at 450 million shares, down from 579.4 million shares Wednesday.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 477 to 383, while 230 issues remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 17.28 points Wednesday, was up 2.35 points at 2652.96.  Yesterday, already thin dealings tended to get even thinner, said one trader, turning into a vicious circle in which the lack of buyers scared off sellers.  Traders said that what little buying there was spread through a broad range of stocks.  The high-priced issues that have led the market since last week were lower, however.  The broad strength was mainly because of index-related buying, traders said, but also because investors thought trading of high-priced issues was overheated.  Losers included Kyocera, which fell 90 yen (63 cents) to 6,380 yen ($44.87).  Nintendo dropped 100 yen to 18,900, Secom was down 50 yen at 7,480 and Seven-Eleven fell 20 yen to 7,460.  Sony dropped 120 yen to 8,680.  Among gaining issues were transportation stocks.  They attracted buying interest because investors consider them laggards and because of rotational buying among domestic-demand related sectors, traders said.  Keisei Electric Railway gained 140 yen to 2,730.  Tokyu was up 20 yen at 1,820.  Japan Air Lines advanced 800 yen to 17,700, and All Nippon Airways rose 80 yen to 1,950.  Some department stores were higher.  Isetan gained 40 yen to 3,000, Daiei went up 40 yen to 2,960 and Ito-Yokado was up 30 yen at 4,360.  Steel stocks generally closed firmer as Nippon Steel added 11 yen to 843 and NKK gained 5 yen to 822.  Automobile shares lost part of Wednesday's gains and ended mixed.  In Sydney, shares firmed but the market's advance slowed as attention focused on Wall Street's struggle to rise to a record.  The All-Ordinaries index rose to its third post-crash high of the week.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed firmer in Wellington and lower in Hong Kong, Manila, Taipei, Singapore and Seoul.  In Brussels, share prices finished mostly higher as the main index again hit a record.  Share prices in Amsterdam closed up in moderate trading, boosting the market's main indicator to a record as the dollar surged.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Zurich and Milan, lower in Stockholm and mixed in Paris and Frankfurt.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 16 Aug 15 Year  @ U.S. .......................... 318.4 317.5 + 24.3  @ Britain ....................... 707.8 702.2 + 29.6  @ Canada ........................ 436.4 435.1 + 18.9  @ Japan ......................... 1568.8 1560.0 + 10.4  @ France ........................ 526.5 526.8 + 19.0  @ Germany ....................... 250.3 246.6 + 20.4  @ Hong Kong ..................... 1973.4 1974.4 - 2.8  @ Switzerland ................... 235.0 232.8 + 35.9  @ Australia ..................... 345.6 343.9 + 19.0  @ World index ................... 539.4 537.6 + 9.1  The Labor Department, settling an unusual case involving "soft dollars," said a San Francisco money-management firm has reimbursed customers for some of their brokerage commissions paid in 1984 and 1985.  Associated Capital Investors Inc. paid back certain clients a total of $690,478, said the Labor Department's Pension and Welfare Benefits Administration, which oversees corporate pension funds.  The pension agency said that with Associated Capital's payments and other actions, it is closing its investigation, although other government agencies aren't precluded from taking action on the case.  The long-awaited settlement is part of stepped-up scrutiny by regulators of the practice of soft dollars -- a legalized form of kickbacks involving money managers and brokerage firms.  A money manager directs trades, through outside brokerage firms, for pension plans and other clients.  Money managers get soft dollars from brokerage firms in the form of "credits" in return for the trading business they generate.  Brokerage firms can also be compensated by money managers through the use of soft dollars by having additional business steered to them.  In the Associated Capital case -- the first of its kind by the Labor Department -- the department contends that an Associated Capital predecessor firm improperly used soft dollars to make up for trading errors it made.  The department explained that when the firm made trading errors while handling customer money, it arranged for the outside brokerage firms executing the trades to cover the losses.  Then, in exchange for absorbing the losses, the brokerage firms were given the soft-dollar payment of additional business, sometimes from other pension funds, the Labor Department said.  The predecessor Associated Capital firm was BA Investment Management Corp., formerly a subsidiary of BankAmerica Corp. BA Investment was acquired in January 1988 by Monarch Capital Corp. and BA Investment management.  Associated Capital said BankAmerica has indemnified Associated Capital in full for the reimbursements.  Although Associated Capital insists that what BA Investment did was common, it has agreed to discontinue the practice of using soft dollars to make up for trading errors.  "We believe these arrangements were appropriate to protect client accounts," said William L. Nagle, Associated Capital senior vice president of administration.  "They provided an efficient way to correct inadvertent, non-negligent trading errors at no cost to clients."  The Labor Department maintained that BA Investment violated the fiduciary and conflict-of-interest provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or ERISA, in the way it compensated brokers for the trading errors.  Also, the Labor Department blamed BA Investment for allegedly causing pension plans to buy shares in Lone Star Industries in 1985 that had originally been purchased for another BA Investment client.  The Labor Department contended that BA Investment did this after discovering that it bought too much Lone Star stock for the client.  The Labor Department said the pension plans lost money because the price of Lone Star stock had fallen between the time of the client purchase and the transfer of the stock to the pension funds' accounts.  Associated Capital disagreed that the pension funds lost money, but paid these pension funds 75 cents a share plus interest as part of its Labor Department settlement.  The following statement was issued by Paul J. Curran and Robert B. Fiske Jr., attorneys for Robert M. Freeman:  The single count to which Bob Freeman has agreed to plead guilty speaks for itself.  It relates to an isolated incident in which Mr. Freeman received from Martin Siegel confirmation of a rumor he had previously heard from someone else.  He had, in fact, already ordered trades and many of those trades had been completed well before hearing either the rumor or Siegel's confirmation.  Mr. Freeman continues to deny categorically the conspiracy allegations upon which he was arrested and indicted in 1987.  Those allegations are no part of this charge.  Mr. Freeman's plea agreement marks the end of a 2 1/2-year investigation that has been a nightmare for him and his family.  Entering this plea will permit him to begin to put this episode behind him, and to try to renew his life.  (See related story: "Abrupt Confession: Why Robert Freeman, Previously Defiant, Agreed to Admit Guilt --- Goldman Sachs Arbitrager Resigns Post, Describes How He Traded Illegally --- What It Means for Goldman" -- WSJ Aug. 18, 1989)  It clearly pays to be at the helm of the movie studio that has been churning out box office hits such as "Three Men and a Baby" and "Who Framed Roger Rabbit."  It pays in a major way.  Frank G. Wells, president and chief operating officer of Walt Disney Co., made a profit of $74.2 million in July after selling shares he purchased under the company's stock option program just six months earlier.  The sale of the shares was disclosed in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  A spokesman said Mr. Wells purchased a total of 850,000 Disney shares at $14.36 each in January, for a total of $12.2 million.  Then he sold the shares on July 18th and 19th at a market price of about $101.60, or a total of $86.4 million.  Under the program, he still holds options to buy 42,000 shares at the same low rate.  But that's not all Mr. Wells received.  His salary this year is $400,000.  And in January, he was paid a bonus for 1988 of $3.7 million, an amount pegged to the company's net income.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Disney shares closed at $113.625, down $1.75 each.  A spokesman for the company said Mr. Wells opted to sell the shares "for estate planning and tax purposes."  Under federal and state tax laws, Mr. Wells was required to pay tax on the shares in July, even if he didn't sell them.  The spokesman also dismissed the idea that the sale of the shares might reflect a less than optimistic view of the company on the part of Mr. Wells.  "He's not bailing out of the company," the spokesman said.  "He considers it virtually a mechanical transaction.  When he bought the shares he intended to sell them in six months."  The spokesman also noted that Mr. Wells recently signed a contract to remain with the company through 1994.  The gains of Mr. Wells dwarf those reaped last year by Michael D. Eisner, chairman and chief executive officer of Walt Disney.  In January, the company's proxy material disclosed that Mr. Eisner had realized a gain of $32.6 million after selling shares purchased under the option program.  That was in addition to his 1988 salary of $750,000 and his performance-based bonus of $6.8 million.  The spokesman said Mr. Eisner didn't exercise any more stock options this year and doesn't have any plans to do so.  But Mr. Eisner does have the option of buying 948,143 shares at the low rate.  That gives him a potential gain of about $94 million, assuming he exercised the options and could sell them at current market prices.  The spokesman said federal laws would require Mr. Eisner to hold the shares for six months before selling, however.  When the two executives joined the company in September 1984, Walt Disney's stock was trading at a price of about $57.40, or $14.36 a share, after being adjusted for a 4-for-1 stock split in 1986.  That set the option price under the stock option program.  The year Messrs.  Eisner and Wells joined, Disney earned $97.2 million.  In the fiscal year ended Sept. 31, 1988, the company earned $522 million.  Earnings were helped by the performance of a string of hit movies such as "Three Men and a Baby," "Good Morning Vietnam," and "Roger Rabbit."  The spokesman noted that Walt Disney climbed to first place in box office revenue last year from "dead last among the major studios" five years ago.  The company's theme parks have also done a booming business.  A federal AIDS drug trial shows the drug AZT delays acquired immune deficiency syndrome when taken by virus carriers before the onset of symptoms.  The study found carriers on AZT got AIDS at half the rate of an untreated control group, with few side effects.  Low doses were as effective as high doses.  Results of the two-year trial, involving 3,200 volunteers, follow by two weeks results of a study that concluded the Wellcome PLC drug slowed deterioration of people with early symptoms of the disease.  "We are witnessing an additional significant milestone in the battle to change AIDS from a fatal disease to a treatable one," said Louis W. Sullivan, secretary of Health and Human Services.  He said the study underscores "the need for people to voluntarily undergo testing and counseling. . . .  To fully benefit from treatment, it will be crucial for a person to know early that he or she may be infected."  The San Francisco AIDS Foundation and the Gay Men's Health Crisis of New York have urged such testing.  Anthony S. Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, was the federal architect of Protocol 019, the largest and most crucial of AIDS clinical trials.  This is because it addresses the huge population of infected people, believed to number between 900,000 and 1.4 million in the U.S. alone.  The trial was coordinated by physician-researcher Paul Volberding of San Francisco General Hospital.  "This study has clearly demonstrated that early treatment with {AZT} can slow disease progression without significant side effects in infected persons . . . who don't yet have symptoms," Dr. Fauci said.  The study's findings were analyzed by a data and safety-monitoring board.  Among those with fewer than 500 immune sentry cells known as T4 lymphocytes, the study found the treated group developed AIDS at roughly half the rate of the untreated group.  The board recommended the study continue for those volunteers with more than 500 T4 cells.  Normal levels of T4 cells fluctuate between 500 and 1,200.  Toxic side effects were "minimal," officials said, with about 3% of volunteers experiencing nausea.  Low-dose patients were spared the drug's worst side effects -- bone marrow suppression -- although 12% of those receiving the high dose had a lowering of neutrophils, certain white blood cells.  Among people with AIDS on AZT, 40% to 80% suffer bone marrow toxicity.  Scientists discovered that a dose of 500mg of AZT a day appeared to be as effective as a dose of 1,500mg.  This is important in view of toxicity and development of drug-resistant strains of the virus among patients on long-term treatment.  "This effort underscores the importance of the clinical trial network established by NIAID," said James O. Mason, assistant secretary for health and acting surgeon general of the U.S. "No study of this magnitude could have been performed without a national commitment, involving a number of diverse groups, both lay and professional."  Early studies at the National Cancer Institute laboratory of Samuel Broder in 1985 found AZT inhibited the virus in the test tube; the first human to take a test dose did so in a pilot study begun in July 1985.  Clinical trials were launched in February 1986.  By September 1986, the trial showed effectiveness in extending lives.  Approved by the Food and Drug Administration for use by people with both AIDS and pneumonia in March 1987, AZT had a price of $10,000 a year a patient; this later fell to $8,000 a year.  Partly due to its high price and partly due to its side effects, the drug has many detractors.  Dr. Broder called the 019 trial "a spectacular confirmation of the placebo-controlled methodology.  We now have data that can affect the lives of millions of people, data we wouldn't otherwise have had."  All patients in the 019 study will be offered AZT when their T4 cells fall below the 500 mark, Dr. Volberding said.  HHS Secretary Sullivan stressed that "AZT isn't a cure, and indeed even those who are under treatment remain capable of transmitting the disease.  Education and healthy behavior are still our best weapons against the AIDS epidemic."  "It's encouraging news, helping move AIDS from a fatal disease to a chronic manageable condition," said Mitchell Speer, who edits a directory of experimental treatments published by the American Foundation for AIDS Research.  He said he was cheered by the news about low dosage, and asked that Wellcome revise its labeling, thus lowering the cost.  But he cautioned that placing many more people on chronic treatment boosts probability of patient intolerance over time.  Dr. Fauci said that the case for testing now is ironclad because scientists possess "enough solid scientific evidence that there's something that can be done, not only for those with early {AIDS related complex}, but for those without symptoms."  He added: "Individuals who are without symptoms and who have fewer than 500 T4 cells should be on AZT, even though that's not an official indication."  Bausch & Lomb Inc., bolstering its position in oral care, said it acquired closely held Accutek Inc., a Cranston, R.I., maker of devices used by dental professionals to detect and monitor gum disease.  Terms weren't disclosed.  A spokesman for the Rochester, N.Y.-based optical products concern said the acquisition is important because it will allow Bausch & Lomb to sell products directly to dental professionals.  Last year, the company's first move into dental care was the purchase of a business that makes Interplak, an electric toothbrush sold to consumers.  The spokesman declined to disclose Accutek's annual sales.  Accutek's major product is called Interprobe Periodontal Exam and Charting System.  The system consists of a disposable, hand-held probe attached to a microprocessor-based controller.  It displays and records diagnostic measurements that can be taken from more than 300 sites in the mouth.  Philip Morris Cos. has begun testing in Los Angeles of a new luxury cigarette called Cartier Vendome.  The new product represents the tobacco giant's first entry into the premium-tobacco segment.  Until now, the category has been dominated by Rothmans International PLC's Dunhill brand, which accounts for 0.5% of the total U.S. cigarette market.  A Philip Morris spokesman declined to confirm the cigarette's introduction, saying it was "inappropriate" to comment about products the company may be testing.  But sources familiar with the product said Philip Morris is seeking to pitch Cartier Vendomes mainly to women.  By contrast, Dunhills are targeted mostly at men.  The sources added that Philip Morris is hoping to expand the market for fancy cigarettes, in part because such products command fancy prices.  A pack of 10 Cartier Vendomes sells for the same price as a standard 20-cigarette pack.  Philip Morris is primarily distributing the new cigarette to upscale hotel and restaurant outlets.  Bell Atlantic Corp. and the Communications Workers of America reached a tentative agreement on wages and benefits and have scheduled talks on local issues, indicating the 13-day-old strike is likely to end early next week.  The company said talks are continuing with the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, which represents about 11,000 striking Bell Atlantic employees in New Jersey and Pennsylvania.  Formal negotiations have been scheduled for today.  Bell Atlantic said company and CWA negotiators will meet formally today to iron out differences on so-called local issues, or those that affect specific regions.  A deadline of Tuesday has been set for completion of those discussions, the company said.  The tentative three-year pact with the CWA, which represents about 41,000 Bell Atlantic workers, calls for a 3% base wage increase in the first year and 2.25% in each of the next two years along with a cost-of-living adjustment.  The Philadelphia-based company said it also agreed to establish a profit-sharing plan for non-management workers that could provide each employee with as much as $600 a year.  On the contentious issue of health care, the company said it will set up managed-care networks of hospitals and doctors who agree to reimbursement rates established by the company.  In addition, Bell Atlantic will establish a trust to fund retirees' medical and dental benefits.  Bell Atlantic also said it agreed to a series of steps to help employees handle responsibilities for children and elderly relatives.  In a final point, the company said it would increase pensions 13% on Jan. 1 for employees who retire on or after Aug. 6, 1989, the date the old contract expired and union members at Bell Atlantic's telephone companies in Delaware, Washington, D.C., Maryland, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, Virginia and West Virginia walked off their jobs.  A CWA spokeswoman said that even if the CWA strike is resolved, the union wouldn't cross IBEW picket lines.  The IBEW contract also expired Aug. 6.  In the three other telephone strikes, only Pacific Telesis Group, based in San Francisco, and the CWA reported progress yesterday.  Both sides have held informal and formal talks in recent days and have been cautiously optimistic that key issues can be resolved soon.  At Chicago-based Ameritech Corp. and New York-based Nynex Corp., however, both sides remain far apart.  Talks haven't been scheduled at either company.  The government will take 19 of Taiwan's 45 state-run companies public to further financial and economic liberalization, a senior official said.  Yeh Wan-an, vice chairman of the government Council for Economic Planning and Development, said the action will help the government reduce its deficits because many of the concerns post losses.  He refused to identify the unprofitable firms.  The companies, which will either go public or be sold to private enterprises, include four major banks, three insurance companies, two transportation firms, two steel concerns, two chemical firms, a newspaper, an investment company and a shipbuilder, Mr. Yeh said.  The government doesn't have a timetable for the program because of thorny problems such as settlement of employee rights, officials said.  Local businessmen have criticized the government for protecting the firms through subsidies, monopolies or import bans on competing products.  They say taking state-owned concerns public is needed to provide more investment outlets.  Chiu Chien-kuo, an economic council official, said import bans on various steel, chemical and other products, which were imposed to protect the state-run firms, would end with taking them public.  The 45 state-run companies employ more than 200,000 people and account for as much as 30% of the total output of all Taiwan enterprises.  Officials said more state-run firms, including the monopolized telephone and telecommunications business, will be taken public at a later period.  SALE: Empire of America sold its film and video production unit to S.E.V. Productions, Williamsville, N.Y. Terms weren't disclosed.  Empire said the sale of Sherwin-Greenberg Productions was part of its effort to divest units not essential to the bank's business strategy.  TELEVISION: "USA Today on TV," the television version of the national newspaper, will move to the more attractive slot of 9:30 a.m. when it begins its second season Sept. 11 on WNBC-TV in New York, the nation's largest market.  The show had originally aired at 5:30 a.m. weekdays.  WHO'S NEWS: Viacom named Barbara Title vice president of Viacom Pictures.  She had been vice president, drama development, at Showtime Networks, a unit of Viacom International.  Viacom is about 83%-owned by National Amusements.  Does Big D really need an annual bicycle rodeo and freshly painted bike lanes?  After plummeting property values knocked $2 billion off the city's tax base for next year, city planners took a hard look at the municipal bicycle coordinator's $49,000 budget and concluded the city could live without clearly marked bike trails.  But City Council members rallied around concerns about bike safety, and the coordinator's job was saved.  Instead, cuts will be made in streets, sanitation and human services, and some fees, such as those for the municipal golf courses, will be raised.  Even so, property owners are bracing for a 3.6% boost in the city tax rate.  Since the release July 25 of 1989 property tax rolls, cities and other taxing districts all over Texas have been scrambling for ways to absorb the latest fallout from the state's battered economy.  Almost every tax roll delivered by county-wide appraisal districts showed lower property values than the previous year's, reflecting the depths of the real estate devaluation that began in 1984.  Last year's drop was offset by a reduction in the amount homeowners could deduct from their appraised values before taxes.  But this year, taxing authorities large and small are feeling the full brunt of the decline.  For school districts, cities, counties, hospital districts and other taxing authorities in Texas, every dollar stripped away from a property's value takes a bite out of the budget.  And with no state or local income tax to provide backup revenue, they are forced to jack up property-tax rates just to stay even.  The tiny Pflugerville Independent School District, located in a former hotbed of land speculation north of Austin, suffered a 16% decline in its 1989 tax base to $1 billion, down from a peak of $1.44 billion in 1986.  That was the last year the school district could count Nash Phillips/Copus Inc., a closely held home-builder, as the district's biggest taxpayer: The builder filed for bankruptcy-court protection the next year to counter losses in the devastated Austin real estate market.  "We have a lot of high-dollar vacant land that now nobody is interested in buying," school superintendent Robert Spoonemore says.  To meet its budget, the Pflugerville school board is considering a tax-rate increase of 6.1% to $1.57 per $100 of valuation, more than double the 70-cent rate of four years ago.  Despite the increases, Mr. Spoonemore says he hasn't heard any loud protests from property owners.  "Ours have been more like low moans," he says.  Mr. Spoonemore certainly could be forgiven for doing some moaning himself; his home, valued at $125,000 just three years ago, is now valued at just $86,000, according to the new tax roll.  Other once-prosperous suburban school districts are dipping deeper into the state till to make up for losses in property values.  The Katy Independent School District, south of Houston, may receive as much as $19 million in state funds this year, $3.4 million more than last year, to compensate for rising enrollment and a smaller tax base.  And, like other districts, "a tax rate increase is imminent," school superintendent Hugh Hayes says grimly.  The fluctuations in property values aren't setting well with owners.  The Harris County Appraisal District, which supplies property values for Houston and 379 other taxing authorities, is dealing with a record-setting 150,000 protests of rising property assessments in that recovering market.  The protests, representing 10% of the property owners in the district, have stalled the release of the tax rolls until today, more than three weeks after the July 25 deadline.  The changes in property values have sparked a sharp rise in the numbers of professional protesters -- appraisal firms and real estate experts that will compare property values and appeal inequities.  A member of one appraisal firm in Dallas recalls that 20 to 30 firms offered the service in the early 1980s; the Dallas Central Appraisal District now counts more than 300 registered representatives of taxpayers.  Harris County Chief Appraiser Kenneth Graeber blames the flood of protests on taxpayer skepticism about the rebound of real estate values in some parts of the Houston area.  "They're questioning in their minds whether the recovery is for real," he says.  One Houston real-estate agent, who received notice of higher property values on an office building and house she owns, promptly hired a firm to protest the values.  "For some crazy reason, they {the appraisers} thought Houston was coming back," she says.  Even when property values don't change, an owner can get socked.  Members of the Westchase Business Council, an association representing 200 business owners in a southwest Houston commercial development, reported total property values this year of $750 million, the same as last year.  But the council members are grumbling about the 7.5% tax increase projected by the surrounding Alief Independent School District, which must make up an 8.5% drop in overall property values.  For homeowners whose property values did drop, the tax increase may not cause a ripple.  But for the Westchase Business Council members, "that's sucking out $1.5 million in profit," complains Jim Murphy, executive director of the council.  The council members will protest the tax increase, albeit carefully.  "To come in and say spend less on education is like saying kill the American dream," Mr. Murphy says.  Instead, Westchase owners plan to join adopt-a-school programs of business support and help analyze the district's budget for possible cuts.  "We have become much, much more knowledgeable about how schools operate," he says.  The Alief school district already has cut back on capital improvements and, for only the second year in its history, swallowed its pride and agreed to accept federal subsidies for school lunches.  District officials continue to seek alternative funding sources.  "You can't continue to put all the burden on the taxpayer," says Bruce Wolbrette, assistant superintendent for finance.  As the spotty recovery continues, bringing with it the likelihood of tax inequities, some business interests are even entertaining a proposition that many Texans consider more dangerous than a plague of smallpox: a state corporate income tax.  Texas is one of only 10 states that doesn't levy a tax on income.  But businesses are beginning to wonder whether an income tax might not be more equitable than the current state franchise taxes they're paying on top of local property taxes.  "For certain kinds of industries, existing taxes are worse than a corporate income tax," says John Privette, president of the Tax Research Association of Houston and Harris County, a 33-year-old business advocacy organization.  "It's definitely time for the state to belly up and provide more revenue to the cities and school districts."  At the moment, however, there's no great groundswell of support for the idea.  The Texas Legislature last considered creating an income tax 20 years ago; bills to create one have been filed in the last three legislative sessions but died in committee.  "On two occasions the House {of Representatives} actually passed a measure saying there could never be an income tax in Texas," says a spokeswoman for the state comptroller.  That resolution is unnecessary this year: With elections scheduled for five of the state's top offices, no politician is going to come out for an income tax.  Mr. Privette is undeterred.  If not an income tax, he suggests, how about a value-added tax?  And, he points out, "we haven't done a lottery yet."  General Electric Co. PLC of Britain and Siemens AG of West Germany issued their formal offer document for Plessey Co., in which they repeated their previous attacks on the trading performance of the company.  In the document, GEC and Siemens also reiterated their view that European electronics companies need to expand to compete with much stronger North American and Japanese rivals.  GEC isn't related to General Electric Co. of the U.S.  Plessey, which has rejected the #2.04 billion ($3.23 billion) bid as inadequate, said the document "showed no appreciation of Plessey's real value."  Egghead Inc., the personal software maker embraced as Wall Street's darling only to end its first public year like Humpty Dumpty, now is the subject of an investigation by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The inquiry focuses on activities of the concern from January 1988 leading up to its initial public offering in June 1988.  The inquiry apparently was sparked by a class-action lawsuit alleging violations of various securities laws.  In the suit, filed in federal court in Seattle, Steve Goldman claimed he and other shareholders were damaged as a result of alleged misstatements made before Egghead went public.  Egghead dismissed the suit as being without merit.  "The focus of the inquiry appears to be on certain facts alleged by the plaintiff in the class-action litigation," said Matthew J. Griffin, Egghead's executive vice president.  Word of the inquiry follows a year of rapid growth, management shakeups and, finally, the reporting of a loss of $12.1 million on revenue of $342.4 million for the year ended April 1.  That compares with year-earlier profit of $4.6 million, or 44 cents a share, on revenue of 201.1 million.  Over-hasty expansion, write-downs and accounting changes, and employee pilferage were cited for the performance.  Egghead said that it is cooperating with the inquiry and that SEC staff members have indicated "the inquiry shouldn't be construed as an indication that any violation of the law has occurred."  Egghead stock closed yesterday in over-the-counter trading down 1/8 at $11.125.  A major institutional fund manager asked Steinberg Inc.'s board to issue special rights to holders of Steinberg Class A shares.  Such a move would force two rivals for the Montreal food-retailing and real-estate concern into a bidding war for the non-voting Class A stock.  In a letter to the Steinberg board, Toronto fund manager Allenvest Group Ltd. asked directors to declare a special dividend on each Class A share consisting of a right to purchase a common share.  As previously reported, Oxdon Investments Inc. of Toronto is offering 75 Canadian dollars (US$63.66) for each Steinberg common share and C$53 for each Steinberg Class A share.  Socanav Inc., a small Montreal shipping concern, is offering the same amount for Steinberg common but only C$51 a share for Class A.  Socanav and Allenvest officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Oxdon declined to comment.  Steinberg said it is studying the request.  A U.S. Court of Appeals here reversed a lower court's $9.4 million judgment against Soldier of Fortune magazine for publishing an ad that allegedly led to the murder of a Texas woman.  The Fifth Circuit Court of Appeals found the magazine wasn't liable in the death of Sandra Kay Black of Bryan, Texas.  Mrs. Black was shot to death in February 1985 by a "hit man" hired by her husband.  Both men were convicted in the case.  The court said that the standard of conduct imposed by the district court against Soldier of Fortune was too high and allowed the jury to place liability on the publisher for adverse consequences stemming from its decision to publish any suspicious or ambiguous ads.  Last March a federal court jury decided the magazine should pay Mrs. Black's mother and 18-year-old son $1.9 million in actual damages and $7.5 million in punitive damages for publishing ads that solicited crimes.  The suit claimed Soldier of Fortune was negligent in accepting "thinly disguised" ads for professional killers.  The plaintiffs originally sought $22.5 million from the magazine and its owner, Omega Group Ltd., both of Boulder, Colo.  A call to Omega Group offices was answered by a recorded message saying the company had closed early "to celebrate our illustrious victory over the forces of evil.  We have just won our court appeal."  Par Pharmaceutical Inc., which has been under investigation by the Food and Drug Administration, has suspended distribution of all its generic drugs in tablet and capsule form.  An official of the Spring Valley, N.Y., company disclosed for the first time that it has temporarily stopped shipping the 150 products.  Richard J. Nadler, vice president, finance and administration, said the company expects to be hurt longer term because of a production slowdown caused by the FDA probe.  Drugs that Par stopped shipping represent about 40% of its fiscal third-quarter revenue of $27.6 million, said Mr. Nadler.  He said shipments were halted about a week ago but don't involve any injectable drugs produced by the company's Quad Pharmaceutical unit.  However, Par disclosed in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that the FDA's inspection of the company, including Quad, continues.  In its filing, Par said sales and gross margins of Quad's injectable line "may also be adversely affected, although to a lesser extent."  The company agreed to the suspension after discussing with FDA compliance officials "some potentially significant manufacturing problems," said Jeffrey Nesbit, chief FDA spokesman.  Citing the manufacturing problems, the FDA recently revoked approval for Par's version of chlorzoxazone, a muscle relaxant innovated by a Johnson & Johnson division.  Par also said it's prevented from obtaining other drug approvals during the FDA investigation, and it doesn't have any idea how long the probe will continue.  Also, Par's management is in turmoil.  Its president, Perry Levine, 68 years old, a founder, has said he plans to retire, because of poor health, when the company finds a successor.  Other executives, including Mr. Levine's son, Jeffrey, have taken voluntary leaves of absence.  Jeffrey Levine, an executive vice president, was forced to step aside because outside directors felt he hadn't acted quickly enough to investigate the company's problems, Mr. Nadler said.  In addition, Par and its Quad unit recently pleaded guilty to one count of providing an unlawful gratuity to an FDA employee.  A former Par senior vice president, Ashok Patel, and Dilip P. Shah, former president of Quad, each pleaded guilty to a related charge.  They each face a maximum penalty of two years in jail and a $250,000 fine.  The U.S. attorney's office in Baltimore is heading a federal grand-jury probe into corruption within the FDA and the generic-drug industry.  So far, three FDA employees have pleaded guilty to criminal charges, and additional charges are expected to be brought next month against both FDA and company officials, federal investigators have said.  Before Par's most recent disclosure, the company announced that it had filed false data with the FDA, recalling one of its drugs and stopping sales on two others.  The company's recalled drug is its version of Maxzide, a blood-pressure medicine pioneered by Mylan Laboratories Inc.  Mr. Nadler said the company believes it may receive clearance from the FDA as early as today or Monday to resume shipping products.  While the FDA's Mr. Nesbit confirmed that the agency is reviewing a request by Par to resume distribution, he said, "It would be inappropriate for me to comment on the outcome of that review."  It is unclear whether the company would be allowed to start distributing all 150 products again or just some of them.  Mr. Nadler said Par didn't issue a formal statement about the suspension of shipments "because it isn't as drastic as it appears."  He said the suspension was necessary to ensure that all the company's products "are what they're supposed to be . . . that they're okay."  Mr. Nadler said that neither the FDA nor the company's own investigation by a special review committee so far had turned up any evidence of health and safety issues related to Par's drugs.  In its SEC filing, Par said it "recently became aware of irregularities in certain of its records relating to production and product development.  Certain of these matters were discovered by Par in connection with an FDA inspection of its manufacturing facilities, while others were disclosed by Par's regular quality assurance procedures."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Par closed at $5.375, down 25 cents.  The California attorney general's office said an investigation into four private charitable foundations founded by Michael Milken and his brothers hadn't turned up any evidence of wrongdoing by the troubled financier.  The attorney general's office was looking into whether Mr. Milken, formerly Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s junk-bond chief, and others benefited illegally from stock and bond transactions and engaged in illegal self-dealing involving the foundations, which have assets of $380 million.  Mr. Milken is under federal criminal indictment on stock-fraud and racketeering charges.  The inquiry was at the request of Rep. John D. Dingell, (D., Mich.) who heads the subcommittee on oversight and investigations of the House Energy and Commerce Committee.  "We're extremely pleased by the results of the investigation," a spokesman for Mr. Milken and the foundations said.  He noted that the attorney general's office had found that none of the foundations various trades and investments benefited Mr. Milken or his family.  The foundations, which are jointly called the Milken Family Foundations, together rank among the 40 largest foundations in the country.  Founded in 1982 in Encino, Calif., they have donated more than $45 million to various educational, health, and community-services groups.  The Milkens have donated $350 million to the foundations.  In the midst of the House Ways and Means Committee's bicentennial celebration last month, a corporate vice president approached Chairman Dan Rostenkowski.  "I'm surprised your arm isn't in a sling," the executive recounts that he remarked in an anxious voice.  "Why?" the Chicago Democrat responded.  "For patting yourself on the back so much," the businessman said.  Rep. Rostenkowski barely cracked a smile.  To members of the powerful tax-writing panel, especially its chairman, the 200th birthday of the House's oldest committee isn't anything to be made light of.  In fact, Ways and Means has raised in excess of three quarters of a million dollars -- almost all of it from corporations and unions -- to help finance a multimedia self-congratulatory celebration.  That doesn't sit well with some observers.  "It's just another opportunity for the corporate and labor leaders to be benefactors for members of Congress," says Ellen Miller, executive director of the Center for Responsive Politics, a bipartisan, public interest research group.  "And in this day and age, that means access."  Mr. Rostenkowski is on vacation and couldn't be reached for comment but said through a spokesman: "I thought it was a good way to study our past, celebrate our history, and think about our future."  Adds former Ways and Means Chairman Wilbur Mills, one of the participants in the events marking the bicentennial: "I thought the fund raising was excellently done.  They raised the money from private sources -- it wasn't drawn from government money."  Committee staff bristled at the charge of access-buying.  "Look at the record," said one staff member.  "Is there any evidence that anyone got anything other than a feeling of good citizenship?  We'd like to hear a real concern."  Donors are quick to deny any sinister or underhanded motives in their participation.  But W. Minor Carter, senior vice president of U.S. Fidelity & Guaranty Co., which gave $25,000, observes: "We're not dopes, you know.  We know that if you get to do something helpful for a powerful body like Ways and Means, it could turn out good for you later."  And American Express Co. spokesman Larry Armour acknowledges: "Everyone wants to be on the good side of the chairman of this particular committee.  I would be lying if I didn't admit that."  Contributors to the Ways and Means festivities, which include a bicentennial movie, book and dinner, constitute an impressive who's who of American business.  To get things started, Rep. Rostenkowski contacted American Express Chairman James Robinson.  Mr. Robinson then called up a few of his friends, notably chairmen John Akers of International Business Machines Corp. and John Welch of General Electric Co. Mr. Rostenkowski added a few other names, including several from his hometown, and presto, "The dollars just came pouring in.  It hasn't really stopped yet," says Donald Kennon of the U.S. Capitol Historical Society, the nonprofit group that is organizing the celebration.  Twenty-two companies gave $25,000 each.  Even some that weren't asked, such as Sara Lee Corp., sent in checks when they found out.  Unions also chipped in: The Teamsters shelled out $10,000 and the Bakery, Confectionery and Tobacco Workers sent in $5,000.  Donald Trump kicked in $10,000.  At last count, 40 corporations and unions have bankrolled a celebration fund that the Historical Society says totals $768,948.67.  Embarrassed Ways and Means Committee aides refuse to talk about how much has been collected, and only reluctantly divulge a list of donors.  Some contributors, however, are eager to associate themselves with the patriotic and educational aspects of their participation.  Says Mr. Armour of American Express, echoing the lines of other sponsors: "We love to be patriotic.  For God's sakes, this is part of Americana, this is part of the country."  IBM, American Telephone & Telegraph Co. and Philip Morris Cos. representatives characterize their companies' contributions as "educational" and "cultural."  The committee will spend about half a million dollars on an hour-long PBS documentary of its history.  About one-third of the 22-minute preview shown at a July 24 celebratory dinner featured Chairman Rostenkowski, although there have been 59 other chairmen.  "It was like home movies for those guys," film-maker Steven York, who has made PBS films on the Supreme Court, the Vietnam Veterans Memorial, and the West Bank, says of the showing.  "The catcalls, boos, hisses, and laughter when George Bush's 'read my lips' pledge came on went up to the ceiling."  The scholarly history of the committee, a 526-page, four-pound tome, will cost at least $100,000 in salaries and research, editing and design costs.  Printing costs are being borne by the government, and the book is being distributed free to the public out of boxes in a committee office.  Mr. Kennon, a co-author, hopes the work will merit favorable review by critics and professors.  "I received no interference from the committee or the chairman," he says.  "Quite frankly, I can't picture him ever sitting down and reading it."  The book's success has even encouraged the House Agriculture Committee to approach him about preparing a history of that panel, Mr. Kennon says.  Another $100,000 will pay for the July dinner, which brought together current and former committee members, including President Bush and former Chairman Mills.  The cost includes $10,022.65 for gold cuff links and stickpins given to past and present members, $3,400 for water pitchers, $5,416 to rent a movie projector, and $70,685 for hardcover committee histories.  Bills for food, flowers, and photographers aren't in yet.  During a lunch for past and present committee members, Rep. Thomas Downey (D., N.Y.) told the audience that the cuff links would be the only thing they'd receive during the bicentennial celebration without Mr. Rostenkowski's picture on them.  Whereupon Mr. Rostenkowski rose and asked for the return of the cuff links, saying the mistake would be corrected.  Ways and Means' isn't the only bicentennial celebration this year.  Congress itself is also marking its 200th birthday, and lawmakers are tapping some of the same contributors Mr. Rostenkowski's committee did.  Those funds will be used to help refurbish parts of the Capitol.  Philip Morris donated $250,000 to pay for a June 20 bash chaired by Loews Corp. Ppresident Preston R. Tisch that brought in more than $1 million thanks to several big corporate gifts and a $1,000-a-plate ticket price.  Mr. Tisch and Senate Appropriations Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.) hope to raise more money through the sale of bicentennial gold and silver coin sets.  Congressmen want to use the money to restore the 126-year-old bronze statue of Freedom atop the Capitol, to install some fountains, and "to solicit fine art and other property."  Mr. Tisch also talks of building a pedestrian mall between the Supreme Court and the Capitol.  Besides Ways and Means, there is only one other House panel that can boast its 200th birthday this year, according to House historian Ray Smock.  That is the Elections panel, once a separate committee and now an obscure subcommittee of the House Administration Committee.  But news of the honor comes as a surprise even to staff members of that panel.  "No one has come to us offering us money," says one staffer.  "There's been no fund raising or celebrations around here."  ---  @ Big Givers  Major contributors to the Ways and Means Committee's bicentennial celebration:  $25,000  American Express American Telephone & Telegraph  Anheuser-Busch  Arkansas Electric Cooperative  Beneficial Management  Chicago Mercantile Exchange  General Electric  General Motors  Hewlett-Packard  International Business Machines  Johnson & Johnson  Kraft General Foods  (subs.  Philip Morris)  Loews  Pfizer  Philip Morris  Price Waterhouse  Pritzker Charitable Fund  Procter & Gamble  RJR Nabisco  Sara Lee  Joseph E. Seagram & Sons  U.S. Fidelity & Guaranty  $20,000  United Food and Commercial Workers International Union  $17,500  DHL Airways  $15,000  Chicago Board of Trade  Hotel and Restaurant Employees International Union  Union Pacific  Source: New York Historical Society  Sun Microsystems Inc., beset by operating problems, posted a $20.3 million loss for its fourth quarter, ended June 30.  That contrasts with earnings of $25.3 million, or 33 cents a share, in the prior year's fourth quarter -- before the maker of computer workstations fell victim to its own overhiring and faulty internal management information system.  Revenue rose 18% to $431.2 million from $365.1 million.  Full-year profit edged down 8% to $60.8 million, or 76 cents a share, from $66.4 million, or 89 cents a share.  Revenue rose 69% to $1.77 billion from $1.05 billion.  Scott McNealy, president and chief executive officer, blamed the Mountain View, Calif., company's performance on a major product transition, difficulty in obtaining enough parts to build and ship new products, and difficulties with a new management information system.  Despite corrective steps such as a hiring reduction and cuts in discretionary spending, Mr. McNealy warned there is no assurance the company will return to profitability in the current quarter.  Mr. McNealy said the company ended the fiscal year with a record order backlog of $362 million.  Sun's shares closed yesterday at $14.375, up 62.5 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  A group led by Cilluffo Associates L.P. of New York said it will solicit consents from shareholders to replace the board of Amdura Corp.  The group, which owns more than 18% of this Denver hardware distributor, said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it is disenchanted with Amdura's management.  It said it is concerned that Amdura may refinance a $40 million bridge loan by issuing new equity or convertible debt, diluting current shares.  And it said it believes the company has been "unduly slow" to combine two businesses acquired in late 1988.  As a result, the group said it immediately is nominating seven board members to replace Amdura's eight directors.  It said its slate, if elected, would search for a new chief executive officer, as well as review the company's budgets, dispose of units unrelated to Amdura's core business and try to resume the quarterly dividend.  Amdura said it has received the filing but declined comment until it can review it.  Its stock rose 62.5 cents yesterday to close at $14.25 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  First Fidelity Bancorp. said its board adopted a shareholder rights plan designed to assure holders fair value in the event of a proposed takeover.  The Lawrenceville, N.J., company said the plan was not adopted in response to any takeover attempt.  Under the plan, one preferred share-purchase right will be declared for each common share outstanding at the close of business on Sept. 1, the banking concern said.  The company said the rights will be exercisable 10 days after a person or a group acquires 10% of First Fidelity common stock or announces a tender offer that could result in 10% ownership.  The company said a number of other terms apply to the rights, which expire Sept. 1, 1999.  Century Partners Limited Partnership said it lifted its stake in financial printer Sorg Inc. to 18%.  In American Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Sorg soared $3.375 to $4.875.  Century Partners earlier this year bought Charles P. Young & Co., another financial printer.  Sorg and Young each recently filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  In 1987, when it was a unit of Service Resources Corp., Young offered $23 a share, or about $41 million, for Sorg, but later withdrew the offer.  Attempts to reach officials of Young in New York or Century Partners in Darien, Conn., were unsuccessful.  A Sorg spokesman wouldn't comment.  Century Partners said it owns 422,700 common shares, including 88,900 purchased Wednesday.  According to Sorg's 1988 annual report, Young was the company's largest holder with a 14.6% stake.  California regulators recommended a sweeping "incentive" plan that would give Pacific Telesis Group and GTE Corp. higher profits if they boost productivity by 4% a year.  The proposed order, if adopted, would let the two telephone companies cut some prices to meet competition, while assuring consumers of a net reduction in rates, price caps and half of any profits exceeding a predetermined level.  Pacific Telesis' Pacific Bell would be allowed to spend $404 million to upgrade the network with digital switches, but recover only $11 million through a rate rise.  The recommendation, made by the California Public Utility Commission's staff, is expected to be adopted in some form in late September or October, after the commission considers industry comments.  New rates would take effect Jan. 1, 1990.  Pacific Bell said the plan provides incentives for improving efficiency, service and profits, but also would increase risks and may not provide enough pricing flexibility to meet competition.  Under the proposal, Pacific Bell and GTE Corp.'s GTE California unit would be allowed to keep half of any profits that exceeded a 12.75% rate-of-return threshold up to a maximum rate of 16.75%, provided the companies contain costs and meet productivity targets.  If rates of return fell as low as 8.75% for two years in a row, the companies could request rate adjustments to protect investors.  The proposal specifies price caps for monopoly services.  DARMAN WARNS the Fed that just averting recession won't be enough.  Some outside observers puzzle over budget chief Darman's Fed-bashing on "Meet the Press," noting that recent data offer few hints of an imminent downturn.  But administration officials fear that the Fed will be satisfied with very slow growth, and they decided to go public to underscore their view that a narrow escape from recession is no great victory.  Fed officials are cheered by signs of easing inflation; a mild consumer-price report today would confirm the trend.  But they still aren't eager to push interest rates down quickly.  Former Fed Governor Gramley says the administration's tactics could backfire by leading Fed policy makers, who meet next week, to delay further easing to avoid appearing to cave in.  Darman, who wanted to be asked about the Fed during his TV appearance, later tells colleagues his words came out harsher than intended.  AUTO EMISSIONS LOOM as an early major Clean Air Act battleground.  Rep. Waxman, chairman of the environmental subcommittee, accuses the administration of cutting "a sweetheart deal with the auto makers."  Critics of the bill argue that failure to crack down on autos will result in tougher requirements for small businesses such as bakeries and dry cleaners.  But Waxman's stance sets up a possible showdown with powerful Chairman Dingell of the parent Energy and Commerce Committee.  The Michigan lawmaker accuses proponents of tougher standards of "Detroit-bashing" and warns against efforts to add restrictions beyond Bush's proposal.  WAR OF NERVES: Bush ratchets up the pressures on Noriega.  As the OAS's Sept. 1 target date for changing Panama's government nears, Bush intensifies efforts to send a message to Panama's military officials that Noriega is a liability they would be better off getting rid of.  The U.S. steps up efforts to go after Noriega's bank deposits and bars business dealings with some of his cronies suspected of drug trafficking with Cubans.  The administration also orders aggressive U.S. military maneuvers in Panama.  One drill took place in front of Noriega's barracks; another last week practiced evacuating the American embassy, a step that would be taken if a U.S. military strike were imminent.  One result of the maneuvers: a sharp decline in harassment against Americans in Panama.  Such incidents numbered over 1,000 last year.  Even some Reagan critics praise Bush.  "Reagan made this an American-Noriega fight -- now it is a fight between Noriega and the people of Panama," Democratic Rep. Gejdenson says.  REPUBLICANS MAY FORGO even fielding a candidate for the late Rep. Leland's Houston seat in an overwhelmingly Democratic district.  But Democrats think they have a long-shot chance in the late Mississippi Rep. Smith's district, especially if state Attorney General Mike Moore runs.  SIN TAXES could save lives, concludes a new report by the General Accounting Office.  It estimates that raising the cigarette excise tax to 36 cents a pack from the current 16 cents would reduce the number of teen-age smokers by 500,000, a reduction that, according to one study, could cut premature deaths by 125,000.  JUSTICE DELAYS picking an inspector general for the department despite special legislation requiring one by last April.  Before the law passed, the department had for years resisted efforts to create the post, arguing that prosecutors can keep their own house in order.  A career department lawyer is currently filling in as acting IG.  SOME HOUSE DEMOCRATS express concern at the rising influence in Japan of Shintaro Ishihara, who finished third in the latest leadership race.  California Rep. Levine circulates a translation of an America-bashing book Ishihara co-authored, called "A Japan That Can Say 'No,'" in which he advocates that Japan develop a jet fighter on its own instead of with the U.S. and sell more technology to the Soviets.  PARTY PROS see tightening races in both '89 gubernatorial elections.  After fumbling on the abortion issue -- vocally anti-abortion, he now says he wouldn't seek a ban -- New Jersey GOP candidate Courter stresses taxes, crime and drugs in an effort to portray Democratic foe Florio as a far-out liberal.  The National Abortion Rights Action League plans to open its first-ever local political offices to help Florio.  In Virginia, Democratic nominee Wilder, who is black, uses TV ads to stress his modest background in an effort to portray himself as part of the state's conservative mainstream.  Democrats even claim his race has helped by gaining him money and attention for his effort to be a historic figure.  But Republican Coleman may profit from Wilder's problems with striking coal miners; Wilder won't split with incumbent Baliles, who sent in troopers.  MINOR MEMOS: Former UAW President Douglas Fraser says that when a student told him his image of a labor leader as "overweight, cigar-smoking and using a great deal of profanity," Fraser responded: "Young man, you've just described Lee Iacocca." . . .  Johnny Carson's answer: rugs, fish batter and savings-and-loan executives.  The question: List three things that should be beaten every Friday. . . .  At least it isn't in nickels: Ticket-sellers at Monticello, Jefferson's home, give change in $2 bills, which bear his portrait.  Time Inc., New York, reported in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that it now holds 37.1% of the Class B common shares of Turner Broadcasting System Inc.  Time said it holds 13,389,764 shares, up from about 30%, or 9,660,826 a year ago, a spokesman said.  Time said it increased its ownership in Turner through dividends, stock purchases from Ted Turner and other investors and the impending merger with Warner Communications Inc.  In the filing, Time said all the additional stock it acquired in Atlanta-based Turner is for investment purposes.  Much of the recently acquired Turner stock carries fractional voting power, or none at all, so Time's increase in control of Turner subsequent to the merger and these stock acquisitions is quite small, a spokesman explained.  Adding the recently purchased Turner shares and factoring in those owned by Warner Communications, Time will have an 18.1% stake in Turner and 8.35% of voting participation, he said.  Du Pont Co., a Wilmington, Del.-based diversified chemicals concern, said it agreed to acquire Camex Inc., a Boston-based manufacturer of electronic publishing systems.  Price wasn't disclosed.  Under the agreement, closely held Camex will retain current management and will operate as a subsidiary of Du Pont.  The acquisition will give Du Pont a presence in the electronic imaging field and give Camex the benefit of the Du Pont name and finances.  "We can provide Camex with the resources they need to grow," said Sara Garrison-Leo, a Du Pont spokeswoman.  "They can bring to us some valuable software and pagination systems."  Camex, a pioneer in the electronic representation of display advertisements, had annual sales of about $25 million in 1988, with sales growing at about 40% a year.  Earlier this month, Du Pont and Fuji Photo Film Co., Tokyo, entered the final stage of a deal to buy a printing plant division from De la Rue Co., a London-based specialty printing concern.  The sale awaits only regulatory approval.  Thursday, August 17, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 7/8% low, 9% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 42 days; 8.50% 43 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.25% one month; 8.15% two months; 8.10% three months; 8% six months; 7.92% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.90% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.70% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.62% 60 days; 8.53% 90 days; 8.43% 120 days; 8.35% 150 days; 8.26% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 7/8% three months; 8 13/16% six months; 8 3/4% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 14, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.01% 13 weeks; 7.83% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.16%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.10%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.05%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.20%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Thomas J. Cusack, manager -- business development and strategy for General Electric Co., was named vice president, corporate development, of this financial services and insurance concern.  Fluor Corp. said its Fluor Daniel unit was selected by the County of Orange, Calif., to act as program manager for the closure of Coyote Canyon landfill in Irvine.  Terms of the contract weren't disclosed.  The work will include managing the design and construction of a soil cover to be placed over the landfill.  The work is expected to be completed within two years after the landfill stops receiving waste, currently scheduled in May 1990.  Other companies participating in the project are Bryan A. Stirrat & Associates, Moore & Taber Geotechnical Engineers and SWA Group, all of Southern California.  Fluor is an engineering, construction and technical services company.  Research Industries Corp. said Karissim Corp. increased its stake in the company to 12.2%, or 663,000 common shares, from its earlier 9.9% stake.  Karissim, a unit of P.T. Tempo Group, an Indonesian conglomerate with major operations in cosmetics distribution, has options to acquire as much as a 20% stake in the biomedical devices concern.  A spokeswoman for Research described the stake as a friendly investment, but declined further comment.  Ramtek Inc. said it filed a plan for reorganization with the U.S. Bankruptcy Court.  The maker of computer display systems filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection in September 1988.  Under Ramtek's plan of reorganization, ownership of the company would pass to its convertible debenture holders, trade creditors and employees.  "Unfortunately, we will not be able to preserve any value for the company's stockholders," said President James A. Swanson.  The company expects court approval of the reorganization plan within three months.  Rand Corp., the public-policy research institute, said it named James A. Thomson president and chief executive officer, posts he has held on an acting basis since mid-May.  Mr. Thomson, 44 years old, succeeds Donald B. Rice, who left Rand to become secretary of the Air Force.  Mr. Thomson said he wants to focus the institute's national security research on how the U.S. should respond to the "collapse of the communist system" and to cuts in the defense budget.  On domestic research issues, Rand will focus on ways to contain health costs, and on drug, energy and education issues.  Mr. Thomson said his greatest task is to build Rand's endowment to fund research on some of the domestic issues.  Mr. Thomson, a nuclear physicist and former member of the National Security Council staff, was executive vice president of Rand.  Prior to joining Rand in 1981, he had principal responsibility for forming policies on European-related defense and arms control matters between 1977 and 1981 at the National Security Council.  Prior to that, he was an analyst in the office of the Secretary of Defense.  He is a member of the Council on Foreign Relations and the International Institute for Strategic Studies.  Rand, which has a $90 million annual budget -- 90% of which comes from the federal government -- focuses on various domestic, national security and international issues.  Stuart Gerson, a former campaign adviser to President Bush, was nominated by the president to head the Justice Department's civil division.  Mr. Gerson heads the litigation department of the law firm of Epstein Becker Green in Washington and previously was an assistant U.S. attorney here.  As assistant attorney general for the civil division, he would supervise representation of federal agencies in court.  His nomination, which had been expected, requires confirmation by the Senate.  Cal Fed Income Partners Limited Partnership said it agreed to buy a $68.5 million equity interest in 30 properties wholly or partly owned by California Federal Bank, a unit of Los Angeles-based CalFed Inc.  It also said it agreed to restructure $27.5 million of existing credit with the bank.  In exchange, the Los Angeles limited partnership that invests in real estate said it would issue about $96 million in 7 1/2% convertible exchangeable debentures due 1999.  The real estate being acquired includes a partnership interest in 24 joint ventures and six wholly-owned properties not yet completed.  The company intends to sell some of the properties -- industrial parks, office buildings, shopping centers, and other projects -- when they are completed.  Cal Fed said both transactions are expected to close before year end.  They are subject to approval by the unaffiliated members of the partnership's investment committee, and regulatory authorities, among others.  Rising interest rates on bonds jarred the stock market.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 13.66 to 2679.63.  Volume was the highest this week at 157,560,000 shares, compared with 150,060,000 Wednesday.  The stock market is currently using bond yields as a barometer of Federal Reserve policy.  Yesterday, for example, bond prices fell on a report that the U.S. trade deficit for June narrowed to $8.17 billion.  An expanding export sector is yet another reason why the Fed might not cut interest rates further soon, traders concluded.  "The perception is that rates aren't going lower here," said Tom Gallagher, managing director in charge of capital commitment at Oppenheimer & Co.  An early round of futures-related program selling involving the Major Market Index played a part in the market's slide, traders said.  The index consists of 20 bluechip issues, including 17 of the 30 Dow industrials.  August futures contracts on the index expire today, along with other stock-index futures and options contracts, in an event known as the "double witching hour."  The expiration can be unusually volatile because it occurs at the end of the day.  Often, Big Board specialists are caught in a final-hour search for stock to satisfy enormous buy or sell orders.  These imbalances in big, brand-name stocks can affect the entire market.  Donald Selkin, head of stock-index futures research at Prudential-Bache Securities, said that bond prices could be a key factor in determining today's expiration.  If today's consumer price index figure sparks a sell-off in bonds, stock prices will crumble.  That would cause Major Market Index arbitragers to sell their cash stocks and buy back futures they already sold at a cheaper price.  A rising stock market today would cause the arbitragers to roll their August Major Market Index positions into the September contract, Mr. Selkin said.  The broader averages declined yesterday, but the Dow Jones Transportation Average set another record, rising 26.67 to 1428.34.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, led the average higher on news that investor Marvin Davis expressed a willingness to increase his takeover bid for the company.  UAL rose 14 5/8 to 266 3/8 as 1.3 million shares changed hands in Big Board composite trading, bringing its rise since Mr. Davis launched his bid earlier this month to 61.8%.  In a letter to the parent of United Airlines, Mr. Davis said he is prepared to sweeten the offer by $35 a share, to $275.  The advance accounted for about 75% of the increase in the Dow transportation average, which broke the record close of 1419.63 set one week ago.  AMR, the owner of American Airlines, rose 1 1/2 to 75 3/4; Delta Air Lines advanced 1 to 75 1/4 and USAir Group went up 1 to 50 1/2 on the Big Board.  Texas Air, the parent of Eastern and Continental airlines, added 1/4 to 18 1/8 in American Stock Exchange trading.  Compaq Computer fell 2 to 90 amid rumors that analysts at several brokerage firms had commented negatively about the stock and that the company had been "talking down" the high end of analysts' earnings projections for the quarter ending in October.  None of the firms cited in the rumors confirmed them, and Compaq denied calling analysts about their forecasts.  Hewlett-Packard, whose third-quarter earnings were in line with its disappointing forecast earlier this week, went down 1 1/2 to 51 on 2.1 million shares.  Other technology stocks generally slumped as well; International Business Machines eased 3/4 to 114 3/4, Digital Equipment lost 1 1/4 to 100, Unisys fell 3/8 to 21 1/8 and Control Data dropped 3/8 to 19 1/8.  NCR was a notable exception to the rule in the technology sector.  The stock climbed 1 to 63 and traded as high as 64 1/4 after Chairman Charles E. Exley told analysts he would consider selling the company or taking it private if a takeover bid were made.  Citing those remarks, Goldman Sachs raised its investment rating on the issue.  Continental Bank topped the Big Board's list of most active stocks as 2.4 million shares changed hands.  The heavy activity in the stock, which rose 1/4 to 25, followed a public offering of 8.5 million shares that had been owned by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  Navistar International dipped 1/4 to 4 7/8 on 1.5 million shares.  The company posted net income of eight cents a share for the quarter ended in July, on the lower end of analysts' earnings estimates, and said it may report a loss in the current quarter.  Norsk Hydro gained 1 1/8 to 22 3/4 on 1.4 million shares -- more than 11 times the stock's average daily volume.  Preliminary findings show a field operated by the company off the coast of Norway may contain four billion to five billion barrels of oil, according to a report in The Oil Daily, a trade publication.  Monsanto added 2 1/8 to 119 3/4 amid speculation that Simplesse, a fat substitute manufactured by the company's NutraSweet unit, may be about to receive approval from the Food and Drug Administration.  Cleveland-Cliffs advanced 1 1/2 to 30 3/4 as a federal bankruptcy court approved a $205 million settlement of its claims against LTV Corp.  The company said the funds would be distributed to its shareholders.  Disappointing quarterly results produced sell-offs in Lands' End, which dropped 1 5/8 to 27 1/8; Dresser Industries, which fell 1 1/4 to 43, and Bolt Beranek & Newman, which dipped 3/8 to 8 1/4.  Earnings at Lands' End and Dresser fell short of expectations, while Bolt Beranek posted a quarterly loss.  Cineplex Odeon lost 5/8 to 11 7/8.  The company disclosed that an agreement with one of its banks permits the bank to seek repayment of $39 million in loans if Chairman Garth Drabinsky and Vice Chairman Myron Gottlieb should leave the company.  The American Stock Exchange Index fell 1.26 to 378.34.  Volume totaled 15,180,000 shares.  Fruit of the Loom, rumored to be a possible takeover target, rose 1/8 to 14 7/8 in composite trading of 1.8 million shares after rising 1 5/8 Wednesday.  The latest advance took place after Oppenheimer & Co. repeated a buy recommendation on the stock.  Old Spaghetti Warehouse gained 1 3/8 to 16 1/4.  The company posted net income of 32 cents a share for the quarter ended in July, up from 13 cents a year earlier.  Towing Hong Kong out to sea hasn't been suggested.  But other outlandish schemes to relocate the colony have been churned up in the wake of the political upheavals in Beijing this June.  The proposals -- some preposterous enough to call for a mass move to Australia or Scotland -- would seem laughable if they hadn't been born out of the fear that China couldn't be trusted when it regains sovereignty over the British colony in 1997.  The latest scheme was literally dreamed up.  Several business executives and legislators this week proposed that China lease Hong Kong, for 50 or 100 years, to the United Nations as a home for a regional headquarters or part of its international operations.  Stanley Ho, who has investments in Hong Kong and operates casinos in the nearby Portuguese colony of Macao, says the U.N. idea came to him in a dream.  "Some people have talked of sending us to Scotland or the desert near Darwin" in northern Australia, Mr. Ho says.  "They are very kind, but we don't want to leave Hong Kong."  Many believe that if Hong Kong can attract enough international companies, it would be less likely that Beijing would renege on the 1984 Sino-British Joint Declaration on Hong Kong.  That promised the territory autonomy, as well as capitalism, for at least 50 years.  But those who doubt Beijing will keep promises favor an exodus.  Some propose that Britain negotiate with Australia to lease sparsely populated land near Darwin for a new city -- estimated cost $100 billion -- as a place of refuge for Hong Kong's people.  Others would try to create a huge trust that could be invested in interested countries, in exchange for resident visas.  Not all the relocation proposals originate in the colony.  The Adam Smith Institute, a think tank in London, suggests that a new Hong Kong could be built on the west coast of Scotland.  But even if it were possible to relocate millions of people, their new home wouldn't be Hong Kong.  The territory's economic success stems as much from its location and its harbor as from its industrious population, many of whom already are refugees from Chinese communism.  Moreover, to thrive, a new Hong Kong would need low taxes, free-port status and a laissez-faire administration.  The nine domestic auto makers planned to build 123,765 cars this week, up 13% from the 109,208 cars built in the same week last year.  Production is up 16% from last week as nearly all plants have resumed full scheduled production after shutdowns for vacations and model changeovers.  Ford Motor Co. has scheduled weekday overtime at five of its plants.  For the year, U.S. car output totals 4.41 million cars, down slightly from the 4.42 million cars assembled in the same period last year.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 48,682 38,703 54,745 2,006,026 2,071,756 - 3  @Ford 34,308 29,028 29,710 1,115,867 1,170,373 - 5  @Chrysler 17,200 15,723 6,927 587,248 660,114 - 11  @Honda 7,170 7,602 7,241 242,351 234,812 + 3  @Nissan 2,526 2,347 2,809 74,064 67,783 + 9  @Nummi-f 4,000 4,216 3,176 131,110 105,746 + 24  @Mazda 3,555 3,438 4,600 141,943 73,345 + 94  @Toyota 3,735 3,689 0 75,435 0 d  @Diam.Star 2,589 2,321 0 38,964 0 d  @Industry 123,765 107,067 109,208 4,413,008 4,419,768-x ...  d-Percent change greater than 999%. e-Estimated. f-Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla. r-Revised. x-Includes VW domestic production to July 1988.  Medical researchers announced the first results of an $11.5 million study that is expected to have far-reaching effects on health policy and medical practice in the 1990s.  Called the Medical Outcomes Study, it aims to provide a patient-oriented method for evaluating health care based on how patients perceive their quality of life.  The principal accomplishment thus far of the study, the subject of three articles in today's Journal of the American Medical Association, is development of a three-minute questionnaire that provides a scientifically valid way to rate a patient's functioning and well-being.  Using these methods, the researchers already have come up with one surprising result: that depression impairs a patient's day-to-day functioning much more severely than previously thought.  The study is expected to yield new ways of comparing the cost and effectiveness of different styles of medical practice.  It also aims to assess the impact of nearly a decade of cost-containment on medical care, particularly for the poor and elderly.  And it could give patients a powerful new voice in determining the goals and course of their treatment.  "This heralds the onset of a real transformation in medical practice," said Alvin R. Tarlov, president of the Kaiser Family Foundation, Menlo Park, Calif., one of the sponsors of the project.  "Doctor-patient interaction is going to be reshaped in the '90s."  The medical marketplace is also likely to be transformed as the federal government and employers, which pay the bulk of health-care costs, use the study's data to determine reimbursements and choose providers, Dr. Tarlov said.  Doctors and hospitals that achieve high outcome ratings are expected to use that information to compete for patients.  Using data gathered by the questionnaire, researchers rated patients suffering from one or more of eight chronic ailments on a scale of one to 100.  Patients with congestive heart failure, for instance, had average scores on physical well-being of 63.5, while patients with no chronic conditions in the study scored 86.0.  The study also assessed patients' perceptions of general health, social and job functions, bodily pain and emotional wellbeing.  Among those having chronic ailments, patients with hypertension generally scored highest, while those with heart conditions generally rated themselves as least healthy.  The results turned up wide and unexplained variations in health among patients suffering from each chronic condition, raising the likelihood, researchers said, that patients received different treatment.  "That's very encouraging," said John Ware, a researcher at the New England Medical Center in Boston and the principal investigator for the entire study.  Since many people with chronic conditions have good outcomes, it raises hope that at least some others can improve with alternative treatment.  Dr. Tarlov said he expects such questionnaires to become standard in doctors' offices.  Patients will fill them out in the waiting room, he predicts, and their scores will be tallied and compared against the norm by the time they actually see the doctor.  A diabetic patient with a heart condition who scores a 67 when the average might be 77 will be more aggressive in asking for different treatment to improve his quality of life, Dr. Tarlov says.  His foundation expects to award a grant by year's end to one major health-care institution to test the idea, he said.  In the study of depressed patients, researchers found their functioning and well-being at a level comparable to people suffering from a severe heart condition.  They determined that patients with depression spent more days in bed and had more pain than those with six other chronic conditions, including back and gastrointestinal problems, angina or diabetes.  The entire project is being conducted by a team of doctors and social scientists from institutions including Rand Corp., Santa Monica, Calif., the New England Medical Center, and University of California branches in Los Angeles and San Francisco.  The full study involves 22,462 patients who visited 523 doctors at various sites in Boston, Los Angeles and Chicago.  The study will track many of these patients over time for further reports.  The dollar rose on better-than-expected U.S. trade results that confirmed dealers' already-positive attitudes toward the U.S. currency.  Many dealers and analysts are currently predicting the dollar could climb back to its high levels of mid-June -- about 2.05 marks and 152 yen -- possibly as soon as early September.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9647 marks, up from 1.9408 marks Wednesday, and at 143.53 yen, up from 142.10 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5610, down from $1.5815.  In Tokyo Friday, the dollar opened for trading at 143.50 yen, up from Thursday's Tokyo close of 142.32 yen.  The U.S. currency stands well above the upper levels of the secret trading ranges within which most dealers and economists believe the Group of Seven major industrial countries have strived to keep the dollar since February 1987.  These ranges are guessed to be 1.70-to-1.90 marks and 120-to-140 yen.  The G-7 nations include the U.S., Japan, West Germany, France, Britain, Italy and Canada.  Propelling the dollar was the Commerce Department announcement that the seasonally adjusted U.S. trade deficit for June had narrowed to $8.17 billion -- the lowest monthly deficit since December 1984 -- from a revised $10.08 billion in May.  That month's deficit had been originally reported at $10.24 billion.  Many analysts earlier predicted the June deficit would be between $9 billion and $9.5 billion.  "It was a good figure and was support for the positive mood about the dollar," said Andre Woerhoff, chief mark trader at DG Bank in Frankfurt.  "Everybody was looking to buy dollars."  At one point in afternoon European activity, the dollar traded as high as 1.9719 marks and 144.05 yen before falling back on profit-taking and apprehension that central banks might intervene to try to push the currency lower.  Despite the relatively positive trade results, a strong dollar threatens to undermine international efforts to keep reducing the U.S. trade deficit and correspondingly high Japanese and West German surpluses.  That's because a rising U.S. currency makes U.S. exports more expensive and reduces the cost of imports for U.S. consumers.  A major benefit of the strong dollar, however, is that it helps reduce U.S. inflationary pressures.  By keeping a lid on import prices, a robust dollar inhibits the ability of U.S. manufacturers to raise their domestic prices.  The dollar began climbing in early European trading and rose to about 1.9545 and 142.90 yen just before the U.S. trade results were released.  On the announcement, it shot up even further to 1.9695 marks and 143.50 yen.  By late in the day in New York, however, the U.S. currency retreated a bit.  "Everybody's looking over their shoulder and expecting that there'll be intervention at 1.97 {marks} and 144 {yen}," said Charles Minnaar, a vice president at Chase Manhattan Bank.  "So it's a self-fulfilling prophecy; every time we get there, people take profits on any long positions."  There were rumors that the Federal Reserve Bank of New York and some European central banks sold dollar at the 1.9680-mark level, but most traders discounted them.  Besides the lower trade deficit itself, traders were particularly encouraged by the fact that U.S. exports had increased in June while imports fell.  "It's not that the world slowed -- that there is less trade -- but that there's more desire abroad for consumption than here," said Richard Witten, vice president in charge of foreign-exchange trading at Goldman, Sachs & Co. "Other economies are expanding at a faster rate than ours; that means we can export more."  To the extent that export growth continues, "it will keep the U.S. economy from slipping," added Mr. Witten.  "So you can have a soft-landing scenario based on expanding exports."  A "soft landing" combines moderate economic growth with low inflation.  That, in turn, makes it less likely that the Fed will attempt to lower U.S. interest rates, say analysts.  Higher U.S. interest rates relative to those in other countries tend to increase the dollar's attraction to international investors.  In fact, therein lies part of the dollar's underlying support.  "The mood of a few weeks ago of lower {U.S.} interest rates and a recession has changed," said Roberto Bianchi, a vice president at Union Bank of Switzerland in Zurich.  Part of that trend is evident in short-term interest-rate movements.  On Thursday, three-month Eurodollar deposits were quoted at 8.81% -- and at one point even as high as 8.88% -- up from 8.75% on Aug. 11.  During the same period, equivalent mark rates receded to 6.88% from 6.94%.  Because of the change in sentiment toward the dollar, large short-dollar positions that had been built up several weeks ago in expectation that the currency would keep falling are still being unwound, said Mr. Bianchi.  That trend adds to its recent strength.  In its latest run, the dollar has climbed 6.2% against the mark and 5.7% against its Japanese counterpart since Aug. 1 when it bottomed out at 1.8490 marks and 135.80 yen.  Mr. Bianchi predicts the dollar will climb to about 2.05 marks, 150 yen and 1.75 Swiss francs {from 1.6940 on Thursday} by Sept. 1 -- close to its levels of mid-June.  In intraday trading on June 15, the U.S. currency reached 2.0475 marks -- its highest point since Nov. 10, 1986 -- and 151.85 yen, a 20-month peak.  "There's good demand for dollars every time," the currency dips, he said.  Citing the soft-landing thesis, Mr. Bianchi added: "Meantime, the dollar looks, by comparison, the best currency around."  Mr. Woerhoff of DG Bank says he thinks likewise, except he believes the dollar will initially dip to about 1.9250 marks before rising sharply to 2.00 to 2.05 marks.  Mr. Witten of Goldman Sachs predicted that within the next 12 months, "we will see the dollar between 2.10 and 2.20 marks and 160-to-165 yen."  Traders were a little surprised at the apparent lack of central-bank intervention, particularly after as many as 11 central banks sold dollars in an attempt to stem the currency's rise last Friday.  "It's useless to intervene in a market where there's a bullish mood; it's just an opportunity to get cheap dollars," said Mr. Woerhoff.  He predicted the central banks will wait until they detect a change in the currency's direction "and then intervene on the downside.  Otherwise, they have no impact."  Yoshindo Takahashi, president of Nomura Research Institute's U.S. unit in New York, said a point had been reached where a weaker dollar wouldn't add much more to U.S. export strength and that U.S. industry was still competitive with the dollar at 135-to-145 yen.  "We are almost at the end of foreign-exchange adjustment," he said.  In the U.S., he added, "there is a medium-to-long term emphasis on the reduction of the cost of capital, which means lower interest rates and higher stock prices.  These can only be achieved by keeping the dollar strong."  Mr. Minnaar of Chase said the {U.S.} administration will become more concerned once the dollar climbed to 2.00 marks and 150 yen.  "Let's face it," he added.  "With improving trade numbers, it's hard to keep on talking the dollar down."  On New York's Commodity Exchange, gold for current delivery settled at $368.30 an ounce, up 10 cents.  Estimated volume was a moderate 3.5 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Friday, gold was quoted at $366.15 an ounce.  Ian Diery, executive vice president of troubled Wang Laboratories Inc., and once the company's most powerful executive outside the Wang family, resigned.  Mr. Diery had been expected to quit since Wang reported a record $424.3 million net loss for the year ended June 30 and Wang president Frederick A. Wang was forced to resign by his father, chairman and chief executive officer An Wang.  Mr. Diery, 39 years old, was blamed by Frederick Wang and other Wang insiders for making the optimistic sales forecasts that led the company to maintain its huge and costly sales and administrative staffs in the face of declining sales.  Wang sharply expanded its short-term debt, expecting to repay it with the higher sales that Mr. Diery forecast.  Instead, sales turned down, leading to Wang's current problems, which include being in default on its debt and at loggerheads with its banks as it tries to negotiate a new borrowing agreement.  Mr. Diery, a bluff, dynamic Australian, had led Wang's highly successful European sales operations.  He was brought to the U.S. in 1986 and put in charge of U.S. sales in Frederick Wang's first action after he became president.  Mr. Diery steadily expanded his role and Wang's 1988 proxy statement shows he was paid $431,986, only $1,000 less than Frederick Wang.  An Wang, 69, remains chairman and chief executive of Wang and the key decision maker.  He has been working half days as he recovers from a July operation for cancer of the esophagus, which is often fatal.  As previously reported, Harry H.S. Chou, 66-year-old vice chairman, is acting president while the board of directors searches for a new president.  The three sales vice presidents who had reported to Mr. Diery will report to Mr. Chou.  Marketing executives who once reported to Mr. Diery had recently been shifted to report to Horace Tsiang, executive vice president and chief development officer.  Mr. Diery couldn't be reached for comment.  In a prepared statement, An Wang said Mr. Diery "contributed substantially to the growth and success of Wang Laboratories."  Apparently trying to focus attention away from Mr. Diery, Wang headlined its announcement of his departure: "Wang Laboratories reorganizes sales and marketing operations."  Court documents provide new evidence that Occidental Petroleum Corp.'s decision to spend $86 million on a museum for Chairman Armand Hammer's personal collection was driven by a squabble Dr. Hammer had with the Los Angeles County Museum of Art.  In January 1988, Dr. Hammer shocked the Los Angeles art community by backing away from a longstanding promise to leave his extensive collection to the county museum and donate it, instead, to a company-sponsored "Armand Hammer Museum and Cultural Center" adjacent to Occidental headquarters in the busy Westwood area of Los Angeles.  The picture of an executive irked by a feeling he was being "pushed around" by the county museum emerged in a deposition he gave in June as part of a shareholder suit filed in Delaware's Chancery Court by an Occidental shareholder objecting to the company's plan to build the museum.  The court file, previously under seal, was made public at the request of this newspaper and the Los Angeles Times.  Earlier, the seal had been lifted from only portions of the record.  In fact, so angered was Dr. Hammer by what he saw as a snub by the county museum that Occidental may have begun construction before winning approval for the project from the company's outside directors, according to the deposition.  Dr. Hammer previously had criticized the county museum primarily for being unable "to do justice" to his collection, which the 91-year-old executive values at about $400 million and which includes works from five centuries of European painting, a large number of Honore Daumier lithographs and the famous Leonardo da Vinci notebook that Dr. Hammer has insisted be called the Codex Hammer.  He said that when the county museum put "my pictures under other people's names in other galleries, I thought that was going a little bit too far."  Putting his paintings near the names of other museum donors, though, amounted to "selling the same space twice, in effect."  Dr. Hammer added in the depostion, on file in Wilmington, Del., that if county museum administrators "hadn't been so arrogant and had been more appreciative of what I was trying to do, they would have had the collection because it was always my intention to give it to them" before the dispute.  In Los Angeles, Daniel N. Belin, County Museum of Art Board president, said in an interview yesterday that "the facts of the situation belie his testimony" about who wronged whom.  Mr. Belin said he had often accompanied Dr. Hammer on visits to the museum "and he never once objected" to how his collection was displayed.  "I was appreciative of what he wanted to do," Mr. Belin said jokingly.  "Set up a museum within a museum and dominate the future course of the museum."  Mr. Belin said that before Dr. Hammer decided to donate his collection to the new facility he had proposed several "deal breakers" -- including the reclaiming of some major pictures that he previously had given to be unqualifiedly owned by the museum -- which the museum found unacceptable.  Asked by a plaintiff's attorney whether excavation of the site had begun before directors approved the project, Dr. Hammer answered: "It's possible," although he added that Occidental faced "very little risk" because Occidental believed there wouldn't be any problem getting an affirmative vote from outside directors.  He defended the concept of an Occidental-sponsored museum housing his collection as being of "tremendous" good will value to the company.  "We have shown this collection in something like 80 cities in 40-odd countries.  It's been shown in China.  They even tell me that some Chinese sold their bicycles in order to come to Beijing to see the collection."  Signs of economic strength in the June trade report spooked bond traders, who bid prices lower.  Stock traders took their cues from bonds and that market fell, too.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average lost 13.66 points to 2679.63 in moderate trading.  Long-term bond prices, which rallied briefly when the trade figures were reported, dropped more than a point, or more than $10 for each $1,000 face amount, during the course of the day, but recovered some of those losses to close off about half a point.  On the surface, the trade report looked encouraging.  The nation's seasonally adjusted trade deficit narrowed to $8.17 billion in June, the lowest monthly deficit since December 1984.  What's more, the May trade deficit was revised down to $10.02 billion from the $10.24 billion originally reported.  But on closer examination bond traders concluded that the export side of the equation was a trifle too strong.  Exports in June rose 1.5% to a record $30.91 billion, implying that the economy in June was stronger than many investors had realized.  That was just another piece in a continuing parade of evidence that has forced the bond market to adjust its portfolios to reflect a stronger than expected economy.  Yet some analysts contend that the bond market is overreacting to the evidence of economic strength, much as it overreacted earlier to indications that the economy was slumping toward a recession.  James Solloway, an economist at Argus Research, said the 1.5% gain in exports wasn't as important as the 3.5% decline in imports.  That view jibes with earlier-reported June economic data that showed an anemic economy, he said.  "If this figure had been reported two or three weeks ago, we might be rallying on the import news instead of selling off on the export news," he said.  Now bond traders are awaiting the release this morning of the July consumer price index.  It's expected to be up about 0.2%, continuing the moderating trend in inflation.  While improved economic growth would usually be good for stock prices, analysts said the bond market retreat weighed more heavily with investors.  In major market activity:  Stock prices slumped in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 157.6 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers, 887-561.  Bond prices were lower.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose to 8.15%.  United Airlines parent UAL Corp. has drawn two new potential bidders, Texas investor Robert Bass and a team formed by British Airways PLC and the leveraged buy-out fund of Morgan Stanley & Co.  According to people familiar with United, both Mr. Bass and British Air/Morgan Stanley expressed interest in bidding for the nation's second-largest airline.  They did so during a week-long exploration of options conducted by the UAL board in response to a takeover bid by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  The UAL board met for nearly seven hours yesterday to consider a sweetened $275-a-share, $6.19 billion offer from Mr. Davis, but made no decision.  In a brief, general statement, the board confirmed that other potential bidders had contacted the company, but didn't identify them.  It said that it hadn't decided whether to put the company up for sale, but that it plans to continue pursuing all of its options.  The board also confirmed the company had held discussions with an "employee group," signaling that a buy-out or recapitalization that includes an ownership stake for employees is still under consideration.  The United pilots union is pressing for an employee stake in any buy-out.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, UAL stock rose $14.625 to $266.375 a share, boosting pressure on the UAL board to put the company up for sale.  The stock remained below the bid price because of fears of some takeover stock traders that the UAL board might attempt a defensive transaction like a recapitalization.  On Wednesday, Mr. Davis also threatened to seek the ouster of all of UAL's board members, except UAL chairman Stephen M. Wolf.  Many observers said they believed that threat, along with Mr. Davis's sweetened bid, reduced the chance that Mr. Wolf might try to short-circuit an auction process by making a pre-emptive bid of his own, possibly with the pilot union.  The interest of Mr. Bass and British Air could complicate any effort by Mr. Wolf to orchestrate a buy-out or recapitalization.  On the other hand, either of the two might seek a possible alliance, and he may have held talks with them already.  Mr. Bass couldn't be reached for comment, and a British Air spokesman in London declined to comment.  Mr. Bass, a Fort Worth, Texas, investor who previously has been reported to own UAL stock, has hired the securities firm of Merrill Lynch & Co. to act as his adviser in any bid for the company, the sources said.  Merrill Lynch declined to comment, as did Morgan Stanley.  Mr. Bass's willingness to try to outbid Mr. Davis for United isn't easy to predict.  British Air, on the other hand, could emerge as a determined bidder for several reasons.  European airlines, anticipating that the U.S. will be forced to open its domestic routes to European carriers after 1992, are anxious to invest in U.S. airlines.  Although foreign carriers can fly to many U.S. cities from abroad, they are prohibited from flying between U.S. cities unless they are continuing a flight begun abroad.  British Air has had a marketing agreement with United since January 1988.  Under it, British Air carries United passengers to Europe as United lacks North Atlantic routes.  Likewise, British Air passengers arriving in the U.S. can transfer to United.  The agreement has resulted in a 30% increase in ticket sales for passengers transferring between the two carriers.  British Airways is also one of five airlines, four of them foreign, that own 50% of UAL's Covia computer reservations system.  The involvement of Morgan Stanley's LBO fund is apparently aimed at skirting a U.S. regulatory hurdle barring foreign carriers from holding more than a 25% stake in U.S. airlines.  The Transportation Department can veto a smaller stake if it decides the foreign airline could still exercise effective control over the U.S. carrier.  So far, the department has raised little fuss over the issue.  It allowed KLM Royal Dutch Airlines to buy under 20% of Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. in a group led by Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi.  In an interview with this newspaper earlier this year, British Airways Chief Executive Officer Sir Colin Marshall said his airline wasn't interested in investing in a U.S. carrier unless it could exercise control.  But British Air may have backed off its insistence on control in recent months.  It recently agreed to purchase a 20% stake in the Belgian airline, Sabena.  Mr. Bass has emerged as one of the country's most aggressive -- and feared -- investors.  Recently, he and his partners have become major players in publishing.  Last year, they pursued Macmillan through a nasty court battle before being outbid by Maxwell Communications Corp.  In 1988, the group bought Bell & Howell Co. and a 40% stake in Times Publishing Co., which owns the St. Petersburg Times.  Separately, two people familiar with Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. said the leveraged buy-out firm hasn't expressed interest to UAL, even informally, about buying the company.  One said KKR hasn't decided whether to pursue the airline.  Meanwhile, there were new signs yesterday that Mr. Davis was losing ground in his efforts to woo UAL's labor groups.  Brian M. Freeman, financial adviser to the United machinists union, called Mr. Davis's threat to remove the directors "absurd."  Mr. Freeman said he still intends to meet with Davis advisers next week, but doesn't believe Mr. Davis is serious about pursuing his bid.  Financial stocks weakened and industrial issues rebounded, and the net effect was that the Nasdaq over-the-counter market hardly budged.  The Nasdaq Composite Index rose a scant 0.04 to 460.83.  For the first four days of this week, the index is down 0.4%.  Trading volume yesterday was the strongest so far this week, as 136.3 million shares changed hands.  Turnover in the week's four sessions so far has averaged a meager 124.8 million shares.  Big non-financial stocks rebounded, as the Nasdaq 100 Index that tracks those issues rose 2.56 to 432.30.  The Nasdaq Financial Index eased 0.83 to 459.55, reflecting investor caution about interest-sensitive issues now that some analysts and traders expect rates to rise modestly in coming weeks.  But some investors remain bullish on the financial stocks.  Frank Speno, a research associate at Quaker Capital Management, a Pittsburgh fund that manages money for corporate pension funds, says the firm likes such OTC savings-and-loan stocks as Central Pennsylvania Financial, Flagship Financial, Webster Financial and Fidelity Savings Association, Pittsburgh.  Mr. Speno describes the thrifts as small but healthy.  Thrift stock prices are up 44% on average so far this year, thanks to declining interest rates and anticipation of the just-signed savings-and-loan rescue legislation.  The Nasdaq Other-Finance Index, which includes the OTC market's thrift issues, has risen 19.5% since the beginning of the year.  The Nasdaq composite is up 21% during the same span.  But Mr. Speno says takeover activity and speculation will propel the group even higher the rest of the year.  "I don't think the run's over," he says.  "We expect commercial banks to pick up the healthy {thrifts}."  Flagship Financial rose 1 to 19 1/2 yesterday, and Webster Financial was unchanged at 13 3/8.  Central Pennsylvania didn't trade; it previously closed at 15 3/4.  Fidelity Savings Association also didn't trade, but closed previously at 9 1/4.  Among other OTC financial issues, United Vermont Bancorp jumped 1 1/2 to 17 1/4.  The company agreed to be acquired by Arrow Bank in a stock swap with an indicated value of about $38.3 million.  Arrow was up 3/4 at 18 1/2.  TrustCo Bank Corp NY added 1 1/4 to 31 1/2.  The company declared a 10% stock dividend and raised its quarterly dividend on pre-split shares.  ChemDesign slid 1 1/4 to 13 3/4 on 652,000 shares after the specialty chemical concern said it expects third-quarter sales to be about flat with second-quarter sales of $10.1 million.  The company cited a slower-than-expected start-up for a manufacturing facility and an increase in trial production runs of certain new products, among other factors.  In the 1988 third quarter, the company had $7.4 million in sales.  On Wednesday, ChemDesign plunged 2, or 11.8%, to 15 on 240,900 shares.  The stock has an average daily volume of about 63,000 shares.  Egghead lost 1/8 to 11 1/8.  The computer software retailer disclosed that a lawsuit filed by a shareholder appears to have prompted a Securities and Exchange Commission investigation of certain activities and operations of the company during the first six months of the year.  Egghead said on July 20 that a holder named the company, certain officers and directors and the underwriters of its initial public offering as defendants in a lawsuit.  The suit seeks unspecified damages as a result of alleged misstatements in connection with the company's initial public offering and subsequent public filings.  Previously, the company said it considers the charges to be without merit and that it intends to defend the case vigorously.  Yesterday, the company said it is assisting the SEC in its investigation.  Coradian Corp. said expansion and acquisition costs hurt second-quarter profit.  The marketer of telephone systems said profit was $35,000, down 82% from the year-earlier $191,000.  Sales were $7.9 million, a 9.9% increase from the year-earlier $7.2 million.  The company posted a loss for the six months of $946,000, compared with a profit of $594,000 a year earlier.  Sales were $14.4 million, down 4.6% from the year-earlier $15.1 million.  A spokesman said the profit setback reflected acquisitions and expansion plans made in the fourth quarter of 1988.  Federal prosecutors have recommended seeking criminal charges against a Northrop Corp. division for allegedly overcharging the Air Force more than $10 million on MX missile parts, according to persons familiar with the investigation.  Prosecutors directing the investigation, these persons said, are ready to ask a Los Angeles federal grand jury to indict Northrop's Electronics Systems division on charges of double-billing the Air Force for guidance systems used on the nuclear-tipped MX.  Senior Justice Department officials haven't yet decided whether to seek such charges, but the issue is expected to come to a head in the next few weeks, according to government and industry officials.  The stepped-up criminal inquiry threatens to create major political and public-relations problems for Northrop just as the defense contracting and aerospace concern tries to keep Congress from gutting its B-2 Stealth bomber program.  A separate Northrop division already is under indictment for allegedly falsifying test results on two other weapons systems, and that unit was suspended last month from receiving new federal contracts.  Spokesmen for the Justice Department and for Northrop, which is based in Los Angeles, declined to comment on the two-year investigation.  Investigators say Northrop may have inflated bills on the MX guidance system by as much as $17 million in the mid-1980s, primarily by allegedly improperly shifting costs between development and production contracts.  Government attorneys have successfully used the same accounting and legal theories to prosecute a number of other major defense contractors.  The government also wants to determine whether time cards were altered or Northrop improperly disposed of certain parts.  However, before a final decision is made, Northrop's defense lawyers will be given a chance to convince senior Justice Department managers that the company shouldn't be charged.  Controversy over Northrop's involvement with the MX, which has provided the company with more than $2.4 billion in sales since 1984, is hardly new.  Disgruntled former employees have filed several civil lawsuits against the company over its MX work in the past few years, asserting everything from shoddy workmanship to secret manipulation of the books.  Congressional hearings in 1987 delved into some of the same issues.  A number of those suits have been thrown out by the courts or rejected by the government, although the Justice Department is considering whether to pursue some of the charges that are still pending.  Just last week, when a federal judge in Los Angeles dismissed a $3 million government civil suit accusing Northrop of falsifying test data on the guidance systems, company officials thought their MX-related troubles finally were behind them.  But that optimism may have been premature.  According to people familiar with the inquiry, a team of prosecutors and Pentagon criminal investigators is focusing on at least some of the allegations that David Peterson, a former Northrop MX manager, passed on to Air Force and congressional investigators two years ago.  Mr. Peterson has been interviewed by prosecutors recently.  His lawyers said neither they nor their client had any comment.  From the early years of its involvement with the MX, Northrop had a strong financial incentive to hurry development efforts and convince the Air Force that it was ready to begin full-scale production of the guidance systems.  But with two of its units mired in legal problems, lawmakers may be less willing this time to support similar arguments by Northrop to speed production of its radar-evading B-2 bomber.  Congressional critics of the B-2 already are pushing to make Northrop financially liable for potential design or manufacturing deficiencies.  Criminal charges involving the MX, if they are filed, are bound to provide ammunition to lawmakers eager to delay further B-2 production until the contractor's cost estimates are more carefully analyzed and the bomber is thoroughly flight-tested.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Clothestime Inc. $ .16 ... $ .12 (5) 33.33  @System Software $ .38 ... $ .32 (6) 18.75  @Valspar Corp. $ .76 ... $ .67 (4) 13.43  @Longview Fibre $1.64 ... $1.56 (4) 5.13  @ NEGATIVE  @Analog Devices $ .16 ... $ .21 (8) 23.81  @Toys R Us $ .12 ... $ .13 (15) 7.69  Source: Zacks Investment Research  U.S. steel imports fell 21.7% in June to 1,549,000 tons from year-earlier levels, according to the American Iron and Steel Institute.  The trade group compilation of Commerce Department data showed June imports were up 5% from May's 1,472,000 tons but below last year's high of 1,979,000 tons in June 1988.  Imports claimed 18.3% of the U.S. market in June, which is in line with the Voluntary Restraint Arrangement Program.  Excluding semi-finished steel imports, the percentage for June was 15%, below the U.S. goal of 18.5%.  Imports from the European Community totaled 484,000 tons, down 7.8% from May's 525,000 tons, and down 20.4% from the previous year's 608,000 tons.  Imports from Japan were 282,000 tons, down 20.8% from May's 356,000 tons and down 19.2% from the previous year's 349,000 tons.  Imports from Canada slid 3.4% to 257,000 tons from May's 356,000 tons and dropped 11.4% from the 290,000 tons imported in June 1988.  The nation's merchandise trade deficit shrank in June to its smallest size in 4 1/2 years as exports set another record and imports of all kinds fell.  The Commerce Department put the trade deficit for June at $8.17 billion.  That follows an unusually large $10.08 billion in May, but it's also less than April's $8.29 billion.  Exports rose 1.5%.  Imports dropped 3.6%.  "The numbers looked great.  The market reaction looked terrible," said Robert Brusca, economist for Nikko Securities Co. Despite the favorable report, stock and bond prices fell.  The dollar climbed sharply on world currency markets.  Although monthly trade figures can be misleading, the new data show that the merchandise trade deficit for the second quarter was substantially smaller than in the first.  But economists warned that they don't expect the deficit to continue to shrink so rapidly.  The strength of the dollar is bound to trim growth in exports, they said.  And a recent pickup in U.S. retail sales, if sustained, could boost demand for imports.  The growth of U.S. exports despite the strength of the dollar earlier in the year was widely cheered.  "Exports continue to impress, even surprise, us," said Lawrence Krohn of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "The rest of the world is continuing to support our economy, so we can afford weakness in domestic demand."  Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher cited what he called "the increasing expertise by American exporters."  He said exports in the first half were 15% higher than in the comparable months of 1988, while imports were up only 3%.  Economists said the decline in imports reflects the slowing of the U.S. economy earlier in the year.  Imports of motor vehicles and parts were off sharply in June.  The $8.17 billion June deficit was the smallest since a $6.8 billion deficit in December 1984.  The Commerce Department said U.S. exports totaled $30.91 billion in June, up from $30.46 billion in May.  Exports of capital goods, consumer goods and industrial supplies grew in June.  In the second quarter, exports grew at an annual rate of nearly 21%.  Imports amounted to $39.08 billion, down from $40.53 billion the month before.  All major categories of imports dropped.  In the second quarter, imports grew at an annual rate of about 11%.  These figures are adjusted for usual seasonal fluctuations but not for price changes.  They don't reflect trade in services.  "It's important . . . that capital-goods exports increased while their imports decreased," said William Archey, vice president, international, for the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.  "This suggests that in a softening domestic economy, U.S. capital-goods manufacturers are shifting from meeting slackened domestic demand to fulfilling continuing global demand."  The U.S. bill for oil imports, which the Commerce Department doesn't adjust for seasonal variations, dropped by 11.5% in June to $4.2 billion from an unusually large $4.75 billion in May.  Both falling prices and a decline in the number of imported barrels of oil contributed.  In the second quarter, however, the U.S. spent $13 billion on imported oil, up from $10.4 billion in the first quarter and from $10.03 billion in the second quarter of 1988.  As a result of higher oil prices, the U.S. trade deficit with the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries in the first half grew to $7.82 billion from $5.03 billion in the like period of 1988.  The U.S. trade deficits with Japan, OPEC and Canada narrowed in June.  But the small deficit with Western Europe grew, as did the deficit with Taiwan.  The bilateral trade figures aren't adjusted for seasonal fluctuations.  In the first half, the U.S. trade deficit with Japan was $24.52 billion, about 1.6% wider than in the first half of 1988.  In contrast, the deficit with Western Europe nearly disappeared, closing to $253 million from $5.19 billion.  ---  @ U.S. Merchandise Trade Deficits  @ (In billions of U.S. dollars, not seasonally adjusted)  @ JUNE '89 MAY '89 JUNE '88  @ Japan $3.94 $4.28 $4.20  @ Canada 0.57 0.72 1.11  @ Western Europe 0.22 0.08 1.92  @ NICs* 2.82 2.03 2.62  @ *Newly industrialized countries: Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan, South Korea  @ Source: Commerce Department  A federal appeals court here confirmed that Boston's Logan International Airport can't reduce congestion by raising landing fees for smaller planes.  The Transportation Department last year found that the scheme violates federal law.  The Massachusetts Port Authority, which owns Logan Airport, had appealed.  The plan, adopted last year, raised landing fees for commuter flights and private planes and lowered them for airliners.  The fee structure was geared to encourage commuter airlines to use larger aircraft and private pilots to use other airports.  According to the Massachusetts Port Authority, the scheme worked.  While the new fee structure was in place, Logan Airport climbed to rank No. 2 in the nation in terms of on-time arrivals.  After the program was rescinded in January, following the Department of Transportation ruling, the airport's ranking in that category dropped to No. 22, the authority said.  The appeals court decision "was a setback, but it was not a roadblock" to reducing airport congestion, said David W. Davis, executive director of the Massachusetts Port Authority.  He said the authority hopes to work with "the new leadership at the Department of Transportation" to deal with the problems.  The authority said a decision hasn't been made on whether it will appeal the latest ruling.  Copper-futures prices rose sharply, accelerating recent advances, on continued concern over production disruptions.  The September contract was up 4.40 cents a pound at $1.2625, which was just 0.25 cent shy of the high for the day.  The September delivery price has risen for seven consecutive sessions and, since the close on Aug. 6, has accumulated a gain of 16.15 cents.  "A sense of how strong the market was is that it was never on the minus side and brushed off news that the Bougainville mine in Papua, New Guinea, will begin operating Sept. 1, far sooner than had been expected," said William O'Neill, vice president of research for Elders Futures, New York.  The Bougainville mine, one of the world's major producers, with an output of about 180,000 tons of copper annually, has been closed since May 15 because of attacks from native landowners.  In recent weeks there have been conflicting estimates as to when the mine would be able to reopen.  As recently as early this week, there were reports that work might not resume until the end of the year because of the extensive damage and fear of further attacks.  "Now, apparently the authorities feel they can keep the violence down, and they're planning for a Sept. 1 reopening," Mr. O'Neill said.  The Elders executive said that, according to private reports from Chile, there are indications unions may be preparing to make demands on wages and other matters that could potentially lead to strikes and production disruptions.  Chile is the world's top copper producer.  "Chile is kind of the forgotten country," Mr. O'Neill said.  "After President {Augusto} Pinochet was rejected for another term by a plebiscite last October, there was concern that labor and political problems could develop.  With all the other things that have been happening in the copper industry, Chile sort of faded into the background but is coming into prominence again."  According to Fred Demler, metals economist for Drexel Burnham Lambert, New York, strikes now are illegal in Chile.  "It is expected that President Pinochet's successor will be more concerned with social issues and will lift the ban on strikes.  This could lead to labor unrest in Chile," Mr. Demler said.  Also yesterday, reports circulated in the copper industry and among traders that there had been a problem at the smelter of Cyprus Mineral Corp.'s Miami, Ariz., smelter that had caused a shutdown in production.  Cyprus is the second-largest U.S. copper producer, with an annual production of about 300,000 tons.  A spokeswoman for Cyprus at the firm's Denver headquarters said there had been a problem at the Arizona smelter, but that it wouldn't reduce output for the year.  "It might possibly cause some delays in third-quarter shipments of copper to customers, and these might be shipped in the fourth quarter, but annual production won't be affected," she said.  The spokeswoman explained that there had been a flashback in a furnace that had caused some damage.  "However, the plant had been scheduled to close in September for maintenance, anyway, so the damage will be repaired, and the maintenance done now," she said.  Drexel's Mr. Demler said the reports of the Cyprus problem was one of the factors that caused prices to rise sharply.  Mr. O'Neill said no progress had been made in settling the strike at the Highland Valley mines in British Columbia, which began July 9.  "The negotiator is going to be away for some time {for other business commitments and on vacation}.  Without him it doesn't look like the company and union can settle the strike or make significant progress so more force majeures can be expected there," he said.  Force majeure is a contract clause that legally excuses a supplier if it fails to deliver sufficient quantities of materials because of factors beyond its control.  The company advised customers on July 31 that it wouldn't be able to meet August shipments of concentrates, or unrefined copper.  In addition, Mr. O'Neill observed that there weren't any indications of an improved labor climate in Peru, which is the world's sixth-largest copper producer.  On Wednesday it was reported that the Peruvian miners' strike appeared to be losing its effect, but that two major copper mines had been seriously hit by the walkout.  Mr. O'Neill said there weren't any reports that the situation had been alleviated.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: World oil prices were mostly lower in generally quiet trading.  In U.S. futures trading, petroleum prices were higher in the morning but then, in a sudden reversal, dropped sharply in the afternoon, closing lower for the day.  Traders described the futures pricing developments as largely technical.  "There was lots of selling on the close, and there could be a little follow-through {today}" said Eric Bolling of Edge Trading Corp. West Texas Intermediate crude for September delivery reached a high of $19.15 a barrel before the selloff eroded the gains.  It settled at $18.68 a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange, down 29 cents.  October and November crude contracts were down 10 cents and seven cents, respectively.  Gasoline futures also were weaker.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Futures prices closed mixed in lackluster trading.  "The market is still a little concerned with the fact that August has been a dry month," said Ted Mao, a grain specialist with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., New York.  Analysts say meteorologists are split on the amount of rain expected this weekend.  "Some see light rain in major parts of the Corn Belt, and others see a little more," said Susan Leighty, a grain analyst with Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., New York.  Traders are also awaiting the results of Mexico's bid for 400,000 metric tons of corn.  Mexico, which wants the corn for human consumption, is requesting that the corn be sampled and proven free of contamination with aflatoxin, a carcinogen, above 20 parts per billion.  Analysts say some of the tender may be rejected because the U.S. may not be able to meet those specifications.  Aflatoxin is a poison produced by a mold, aspergillus flavus, that infected much of last summer's corn crop.  Wheat futures prices fell amid no new export business.  Rumors that China bought wheat from Canada is signaling that buyers are "turning away from the {U.S.} market with prices at these high levels," Ms. Leighty said.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices ended mixed and with only moderate changes.  December delivery gold was down 10 cents an ounce at $374.60.  September silver was up 5.8 cents an ounce at $5.265.  October platinum was $1.70 an ounce lower at $486.40 as it fell back from its best level of $492 just before the close of trading.  The dollar was strong all day, but eased slightly from its highs.  As a result, gold was at its weakest early in the trading but later gained some strength.  "Gold was off in a knee-jerk reaction to the lower-than-expected June trade deficit, which strengthened the dollar, but gold later improved," one analyst said.  He added that the trade report wasn't as anti-inflationary and negative for precious metals as some traders and analysts had thought.  "The report showed record exports, which is a sign of strong industrial activity," he said.  Another analyst, Bernard Savaiko of PaineWebber, New York, said there wasn't anything of a fundamental nature to account for the independent strength of silver futures.  "I can't see anything fundamentally that is market-supportive in the big increase of silver supplies in commodity exchange warehouses," said Mr. Savaiko.  He was referring to a rise of almost 2.8 million ounces yesterday to 211.3 million ounces in the Comex silver inventory.  "If anything, I regard this as an indication of lack of demand for the metal," he said.  While U.S. demand for silver bullion is at a low ebb, there was some increase in demand overseas, he said.  Investor Harold Simmons and a company he controls said they are considering acquiring a substantial stake in Georgia Gulf Corp. or trying to acquire the entire company.  The move may signal that Georgia Gulf will be the next target of this aggressive corporate acquirer.  Although Mr. Simmons has bought stakes in several companies in recent months, Georgia Gulf seems to fit his takeover strategy.  The chemicals concern is in a cyclical industry, like Mr. Simmons' holdings in timber, sugar, chemicals and oil-field services.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Georgia Gulf closed at $46.50 a share, up 50 cents.  With approximately 24.5 million shares outstanding, that would give the company an indicated value of about $1.14 billion, an acquisition size that Mr. Simmons could easily handle.  Mr. Simmons made his Georgia Gulf investment along with NL Industries Inc., a Houston specialty chemicals company run by J. Landis Martin, a lawyer who was Mr. Simmons' top takeover strategist before he became NL's chief executive officer.  NL, which Mr. Simmons won control of in 1987, is 66% owned by Valhi Inc., Mr. Simmons' 88%-owned holding company.  Georgia Gulf officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Previously, Mr. Simmons and NL Industries had said they acquired their 9.42% stake in Georgia Gulf as an investment, paying between $36.375 and $38 a share.  However, the group has sought clearance under antitrust laws to boost their holdings to 15% of the shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Simmons and NL said they are considering a number of alternatives, including seeking control of Georgia Gulf or proposing a transaction between Georgia Gulf and NL Industries.  A spokesman for Mr. Simmons said there isn't any overlap between NL's product line and Georgia Gulf's; he said the group was attracted to Georgia Gulf's strong cash flow.  Still, he said, "We haven't taken any action and we haven't developed any plans" for the investment.  Royal Bank of Canada said it will issue two series of non-cumulative first preferred shares totaling 400 million Canadian dollars (US$340 million), with proceeds to be added to the bank's general funds.  The banking concern said it will issue C$150 million of Series F preferred with an initial dividend of 9% and C$250 million of Series G preferred with an initial dividend of 8.5%.  The preferred shares are non-redeemable for 10 years and are redeemable thereafter at the bank's option for cash or common.  The Series G preferred can be converted at the option of holders after the 11th year.  However, the bank has a prior right to redeem the shares or to arrange for their purchase by another party.  RBC Dominion Securities Inc., Wood Gundy Inc., Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc. and Scotia-Mcleod Inc. are co-leaders of the underwriting group for the Series F issue.  RBC Dominion and Gordon Capital Corp. will lead the Series G issue.  Five people were indicted for making and selling $17 million in counterfeit U.S. currency and $4.6 million in fake traveler's checks.  Assistant U.S. Attorney James J. McGuire of Manhattan said $2.7 million of the U.S. currency hasn't been recovered.  "It's out here somewhere," he said.  About $100,000 of the fake American Express and Citicorp traveler's checks haven't been found, he said.  The counterfeit U.S. currency is in denominations of $10, $20 and $100 bills; the traveler's checks are in $100 denominations.  Mr. McGuire said the counterfeited bills and traveler's checks were circulated mainly in New York, Chicago and Los Angeles, as well as in West Germany and Poland.  The counterfeiting was allegedly done in the Bronx between August 1988 and January 1989.  About $12 million in bogus U.S. currency and $4.4 million in fake traveler's checks was stored in Jersey City, N.J., where it was recovered by U.S. agents.  The five defendants named in the indictment are Gregory Spektor, Anton Odinokov, Roman Kolompar, Oleg Puzaitzer and Roman Stalinsky.  All five are scheduled to be arraigned Thursday.  Eugene Kaplan, an attorney for Mr. Spektor, said he couldn't comment because he hasn't seen the indictment.  He said Mr. Spektor, 42 years old, until recently operated a car-service company.  Attorneys for the other defendants couldn't be reached.  Lorimar Telepictures Corp. and affiliates filed suit against Walt Disney Co., charging the entertainment company with fraud and breach of contract in connection with a film processing joint venture, Metrocolor Laboratories.  The suit, filed in state court here, seeks a total of $126 million in damages.  Of that amount, it seeks $100 million in punitive damages, $18 million for breach of contract and $8 million in film processing fees.  Late yesterday, Walt Disney filed a cross complaint in the court, charging that it had been "fraudulently induced" to enter the joint venture contract.  The complaint also charges Lorimar with breach of contract.  Disney is seeking damages of about $42.3 million.  The Lorimar suit said Lorimar, a unit of Warner Communications Inc., and Walt Disney formed Metrocolor Partners two years ago to operate Metrocolor Laboratories, a film processing company in Los Angeles.  Metrocolor Partners is also a plaintiff in the Lorimar action.  Just when it appeared Staar Surgical Co.'s president had successfully ousted his board after they tried to fire him, two of the ex-directors filed to place the company under federal bankruptcy protection.  It's unclear whether the two former directors have a right to place the company in Chapter 11 proceedings.  On Tuesday, a California Superior Court judge issued a temporary restraining order, stating that four of the company's former directors can't do business in the name of Staar any longer.  But a Staar spokesman said the judge's order might not yet have been in effect at the time the directors filed bankruptcy papers for the company, which makes and markets products for small-incision surgery.  The dispute began when the directors disagreed with Staar president and founder, Thomas R. Waggoner, over Staar's signing of a licensing and sales agreement with Chiron Opthalmics Inc. of Irvine, Calif.  Mr. Waggoner earlier this week fired everyone on the company's board but himself, to which the board countered by firing Mr. Waggoner and locking him out of Staar buildings.  Attorneys for the directors failed to return telephone calls, but it appeared that the bankruptcy filing was designed to have an emergency trustee appointed to run Staar and hopefully scratch the Chiron agreement.  A spokesman for Mr. Waggoner said Staar was seeking through the courts to have the bankruptcy petition dismissed.  In addition, the Waggoner spokesman said Staar yesterday had been able to extend the temporary restraining order to include John R. Wolf, who was dismissed as executive vice president, sales, last Friday because "his sympathies were with the four directors."  In a sizzling summer on Wall Street, no group of securities is hotter than stub stocks.  Stubs represent the small share of equity that remains in a company hollowed out by debt.  Most of these companies' assets are dwarfed by their liabilities, giving them negative net worth; in all of them, debt far outweighs shareholders' equity.  Yet their shares have exploded even beyond the Standard & Poor's 500 Index.  Though stubs once were widely avoided, "Everyone is buying them now," says Robert Raiff, co-head of research at C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell.  The negative bias, he says, has flipped, replaced by a "perverse opposite {and favorable} bias" that has propelled stub shares to full valuation or overvaluation.  MIM Ltd., a big British money manager, has created a publicly traded fund to invest in stubs, which started trading in London last week, and it has scooped up stubs such as Owens-Corning Fiberglas, FMC and Shoney's.  The closed-end fund, known as "Leveraged Opportunity Trust," was "hugely oversubscribed," according to Christopher Mills, its investment director.  Salomon Brothers, catching the trend, has introduced an index of 20 stub securities.  As the index plainly shows, when stocks do well, stubs do very well. (Guess what may happen when the market falters.) Salomon's data suggests that stub price movement is magnified in down markets as well.  "They are extremely volatile," Mr. Mills says of stubs.  Some are downright "dangerous," he says.  "But when you get it right, you get a much higher rate of return."  Many stubs are created from buy-outs.  Shareholders in RJR Nabisco got a lot of cash and a small stub, convertible into equity, in the post-acquisition RJR. Others are spawned from self-imposed recapitalizations.  Companies such as gypsum marketer USG, hotel operator Holiday and publisher Harcourt Brace Jovanovich have fended off raiders by borrowing to pay big dividends.  Either way, the stubs stand behind a long line of bondholders if a company is dissolved; only after debt is satisfied can stubholders stake a claim to assets or earnings.  They were once looked upon as corporate zombies.  The value was thought to have been all squeezed out.  But more than a few, such as Owens-Corning Fiberglas, have slashed their debt and returned to the living.  Many others, such as USG, remain hard-pressed.  The company is struggling under $282 million of yearly interest expense -- "$850,000 a day," as its helpful spokesman says -- and a weak market for housing.  Others, such as Harcourt Brace, are dependent on selling assets to pay off debt.  Harcourt has said it plans to sell its theme parks.  This amounts to an admission that its earlier strategy of expanding themepark revenue has failed, analysts say.  A Harcourt official didn't return telephone calls seeking comment.  But bulls are hoping that Harcourt might get a fancy price.  Its shares have surged 75% in the past two months.  "Stubs trade in a crazy manner," Elliot Eisenberg, a broker at R.D. Smith, says.  "You don't need a real business.  You only need a perception of one."  Robert Salomon Jr., director of research at Salomon, is bullish, though he says stubs must be judged individually.  He calls the Salomon index "a proxy for the health and well-being of LBOs.  Most of the stubs we follow, such as RJR and Quantum Chemical, we like."  Grant's Interest Rate Observer has been publishing a narrower stub index, which served as a model for Salomon's.  Its editor, James Grant, says his index is "way off the charts," outpacing the S&P by more than the Salomon index.  But he reads the index as "a barometer of speculation," not of the market's health.  "Stubs are the equity at the bottom of a pile that is precariously stacked" with debt, he says.  R.D. Smith's Mr. Eisenberg likes Triad Systems, which operates computer terminals for finding auto parts -- indispensable, he says, if you need a right front fender for a '76 Chevy.  He disdains so-called asset sale stories.  These, he says, amount to buying beanbags and trying to sell the beans.  The lure of stubs is that the potential gain is unlimited.  Junk-bond buyers, by contrast, merely get their money back, along with a handsome rate of interest.  Speculation is hottest in stub companies that have pared their debts.  Buyers think such companies are ripe for another recapitalization, and for taking on more debt.  Call it restubbing.  Holiday fended off the New York developer Donald Trump with a $65-a-share dividend in 1987, and has since reduced debt by nearly $1 billion.  Its shares have surged 158% this year on hopes that its managers will decide to sell the company.  C.J. Lawrence analyst James Murren calls it "a creeping LBO."  Mr. Murren liked the stock at 40, based on his asset valuation of 65 a share.  Now, with the stock at 69 3/4, Mr. Murren has raised his asset valuation to 110 -- allowing him to stay bullish.  "But it's reached a point where you can no longer justify it on either earnings or cash flow," Mr. Murren says.  "Something -- a transaction -- better happen."  Marvin Roffman, an analyst at Janney Montgomery and a bear on Holiday, counters that stubs such as Holiday trade "in a market of perceptions."  Even some bulls seem to be hearing warning bells.  Though Salomon's Brian Doyle is recommending RJR's equity stub, he concedes it is "a judgment call.  You have to believe they will do extensive asset sales, and you have to sign on that they will accelerate growth rates."  And Mr. Salomon, in a report on stubs, says, "The run-up in stub prices prior to the crash suggests that this segment bears watching as a barometer of sentiment . . . .  Stubs are a meaningful measure of speculative excess for the market as a whole."  ---  Granville says sell: After 22 months as "a bleeping bull," newsletter writer Joseph Granville has issued an all-out sell signal.  "This is the call to liquidate stocks," he said in a message to "early warning" clients this week.  "It is clear now that most stocks have seen their highs . . . .  Gold stocks can be held, but everything else is suspect."  Mr. Granville says it will "be very difficult to avoid an out-and-out stock massacre this October" similar to the big October decline in 1978 or the crash in 1987.  His main concern: The number of stocks hitting new highs has drastically declined this month, as it did in August 1978 and August 1987.  On Monday, Mr. Granville says, only 54 stocks listed on the New York Stock Exchange made new highs, down from 306 on Aug. 1.  That 82% shrinkage in new highs is comparable to the 85% shrinkages in 1978 and 1987, he says, adding, "The market has never -- and 'never' is a powerful word -- recovered from percentages of shrinkage exceeding 80%."  Mr. Granville, who had a mighty influence on the markets in the 1970s and early 1980s, lost most of his following a few years ago because of bad market calls.  Lately, he has been trying to make a comeback.  From last fall to now, he correctly stayed bullish when many other advisers were pessimistic.  -- John R. Dorfman  Two former vice presidents of Home Insurance Co. were sentenced in federal court in Manhattan for defrauding the insurer of $5.5 million between 1983 and 1988.  Robert H. Wedinger was sentenced to 28 months in prison, and David E. Kennedy was sentenced to 22 months.  Both were directed to make full restitution of the money and were ordered to serve three years' probation after their prison terms.  Home Insurance is a subsidiary of AmBase Corp., formerly Home Group Inc., which has interests in banking, insurance and investment services.  AmBase is based in New York.  Mr. Wedinger, 52 years old, of New York, and Mr. Kennedy, 51, of Drexel Hill, Pa., pleaded guilty in June.  In their pleas, they said they shared the proceeds of the scheme equally.  The two were charged with submitting false claims to the insurer's reinsurance subsidiary, and then depositing the payment of the claims in accounts controlled by Mr. Kennedy.  The Inter-American Development Bank and the government of Japan will provide Brazil $112.3 million in loans for agricultural irrigation projects.  The IADB said it will provide $55.6 million and Japan's Overseas Economic Cooperation Fund has approved a $56.7 million "parallel-financing" loan to cover part of the $139 million Brazil plans to spend to build reservoirs, canals, pumping stations and other facilities to irrigate land in the nation's northeastern region.  The IADB loan will be at a variable lending rate, linked to the agency's own borrowing costs in world capital markets.  The IADB didn't specify the terms for the "parallel" foreign aid credit from Japan.  Separately, the IADB said the Japanese government will provide the nation of Colombia a grant of 130 million yen ($914,849) to help it plan investment projects and the allocation of public resources to development projects, particularly at the local government level.  JARUZELSKI WILL CHOOSE a Solidarity member to lead Poland's government.  An opposition lawmaker said the Polish president had accepted "in principle" Walesa's offer to form a government led by non-Communists and will nominate a member of the union-led opposition as the next prime minister.  The development came during a meeting between Jaruzelski and the Solidarity leader.  Following the Warsaw meeting, Communist Premier Kiszczak formally submitted his resignation, clearing the way for the formation of the East bloc's first non-Communist regime since World War II.  Walesa has said he doesn't want to be premier, and Solidarity and two allied parties have offered three opposition candidates for the leadership post.  ---  MOSCOW SUGGESTED rewriting the accord that formed the Soviet Union.  In what appeared to be a partial concession to the Baltic republics' demands for greater autonomy, the Communist Party unveiled a draft policy proposing that the 1922 treaty that unified the 15 republics be revised, opening the possibility for complete change in the nation's structure.  The draft, published in the Communist Party newspaper Pravda, also said the republics might be able to "question" national laws.  The party's Central Committee is to act on the measures at a meeting next month.  An official in Estonia said the republic will defy a ruling by the Soviet leadership and stand by its right to limit voting rights in the Baltic region.  ---  Federal health officials announced that a two-year trial shows that the drug AZT delays the onset of AIDS in virus carriers who don't display symptoms.  The HHS study, involving 3,200 volunteers, found that those on AZT developed AIDS at half the rate of an untreated group.  ---  Syrian and Christian forces traded artillery fire in and around Beirut despite approval of a U.N. cease-fire resolution aimed at ending Lebanon's 14-year-old civil war.  People had emerged from shelters to replenish their food stocks during a relative lull in five months of artillery battles.  ---  Rafsanjani was inaugurated as Iran's president, and said he would help win the release of Western hostages in Lebanon only if the U.S. adopted a more friendly stance toward the Islamic republic.  Tehran's former parliamentary speaker also said Washington probably was involved in Israel's kidnapping of a Shiite Moslem cleric.  ---  Ethiopia and Eritrean rebels agreed to hold peace talks in Atlanta, beginning Sept. 7, in an effort to end the African nation's 28-year-old civil war.  Former President Carter will act as an intermediary in the talks between the Marxist government and guerrillas fighting for regional independence.  ---  Navy officials said launch-test failures of the Trident II indicate a basic design flaw of the submarine-based nuclear missile.  The Lockheed weapon, slated to be deployed next year, has been successful in 16 of 19 tests from land, but has failed in two of three sea launches.  ---  A group of 121 Vietnamese returned to Hanoi in what was considered the largest repatriation of refugees from Hong Kong's camps.  The move came as Vietnam and Britain are negotiating a plan to return many of the 51,000 Vietnamese boat people currently in Hong Kong.  Hanoi has said it won't prosecute any of the refugees.  ---  Gunmen in Colombia killed a Bogota court magistrate who ruled against two leaders of a Medellin cocaine cartel.  A national judges association said all the country's magistrates would resign to protest a lack of sufficient government protection.  ---  Police in South Africa have launched a crackdown on a nationwide campaign against apartheid.  But activists, who have organized the two-week-old defiance drive, vowed to hold weekend rallies to test Acting President de Klerk's pledge to ease racial oppression.  ---  Israeli soldiers blocked about 1,000 Palestinians from entering Israel in a test of new identification cards.  Beginning today, Arabs can't leave the occupied Gaza Strip without the magnetized plastic cards.  The move has intensified the struggle between Israeli authorities and Palestinian leaders.  ---  China's defense minister was detained by soldiers loyal to the country's president in a dispute over a top military post vacated by ousted Communist Party chief Zhao, sources said.  Several commanders also reportedly were taken into custody.  The Beijing government, meanwhile, confirmed the arrest of student protest leader Wang Dan.  Kenwood C. Nichols was named to the No. 3 post of vice chairman at Champion International Corp., a paper maker based here.  Also, Joe K. Donald was elected executive vice president of publication papers and Mark A. Fuller, who had been in that post, was elected executive vice president of marketing, a new post.  Champion said Mr. Nichols's selection was "evolutionary," but the executive vice president appointments were "competitive" in scope.  No major changes in business strategy are pending, a spokesman added.  Mr. Nichols, 50 years old, had been senior vice president.  He remains responsible for internal audit, corporate planning, tax affairs and management information systems.  The vice chairman post had been vacant since May, when Aubrey L. Cole and William R. Haselton retired.  In addition, Mr. Nichols and Allan E. Gotlieb, Canada's former ambassador to the U.S., were elected to the Champion board, which expanded to 14 seats.  Mr. Donald, 46, had been vice president of manufacturing for printing and writing papers.  Mr. Fuller is 55.  In the corporate hierarchy, Mr. Nichols is directly below L.C. Heist, president and chief operating officer, who is second to Andrew C. Sigler, chairman and chief executive officer.  Canada Northwest Energy Ltd. said it ended efforts to sell its oil and gas assets in Italy, after a search for potential buyers failed to attract a satisfactory bid.  Canada Northwest, an oil and gas exploration and production concern, put the assets up for sale in April.  They include a 20% stake in the Vega oil field, Italy's largest.  The value of the assets hasn't been disclosed.  Separately, the company said it seeks to raise as much as 81 million Canadian dollars (US$68.8 million) through a rights offering, under which current shareholders would be offered one right to acquire an additional common share at C$4 each, for each common share already held.  The company didn't disclose the expected expiration date for the rights.  TransAlta Resources Investment Corp., which holds 39.2% of Canada Northwest's shares outstanding, plans to exercise all of the rights to which it would be entitled.  Canada Northwest said proceeds from the offering would be used in part to finance redemptions of its Series B preferred shares, which are redeemable at the holder's option.  Co-managers of the rights issue are Wood Gundy Inc. and Merrill Lynch Canada Inc., both Toronto-based securities dealers.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Canada Northwest closed at C$6.375, down C$1.75 a share.  Conventional wisdom is rarely wise, but on the subject of John Sununu it's finally achieved a kind of perfection -- it's never even been close.  As George Bush's choice as chief of staff, the former New Hampshire governor had what most of Washington assumed seven months ago were terminal liabilities: He was an outsider, a conservative, and arrogantly blunt besides.  His early demise was widely predicted (which is to say, hoped for).  "I never felt that the people who were criticizing me had any basis in fact," says Mr. Sununu now, chuckling about those early judgments.  "It was the great all-American pile-on.  Someone says it and everyone piles on."  John Sununu can afford to chuckle now, because he's emerging as an adept, quietly influential chief of staff for George Bush.  He's avoided headlines, which is a virtue in a city where White House reporters prefer gaffes to substance.  He's less a prime minister, in the Donald Regan mold, than an administrator and implementer.  And he's been able to adapt to that role, overseeing a White House as free of press leaks and back-biting as any since the Ford years.  "This president likes people to have access to him," Mr. Sununu explains.  "I've tried to open the doors."  The Bush style means Mr. Sununu isn't nearly as powerful as Reagan-era chiefs, though it's doubtful anyone could be.  Mr. Bush first told his old friend, Democratic Rep. Sonny Montgomery, about a trip he planned to his state of Mississippi.  Mr. Montgomery publicly announced the trip even before Mr. Sununu knew or could inform the state's two Republican senators.  The chief of staff also wasn't influential on whether to make a recess appointment for William Lucas, who'd been rejected by a Senate committee for a key civil-rights post.  The chief of staff vetted the idea on Capitol Hill, but Mr. Bush decided against it after talking with Attorney General Richard Thornburgh, who opposed it.  Mr. Sununu clearly does have clout, however, though it's usually exercised internally.  After Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher started making public noises about a new U.S. "industrial policy," Mr. Sununu invited him in for a chat with budget director Dick Darman and economic adviser Michael Boskin.  They explained that corporate socialism was bad politics and worse policy; Mr. Mosbacher dropped the subject, at least in public.  The outsider has even formed something of an alliance with the classic insider, Mr. Darman -- perhaps a case of like egos attracting.  They meet every morning at 7:15 before the first staff meeting.  At Mr. Darman's urging, the chief of staff has also joined a strategy group with Mr. Darman, Vice President Dan Quayle, drug czar Bill Bennett and Housing Secretary Jack Kemp -- a cabal for new ideas.  Mr. Sununu is also the main conservative conduit to the president, and after some early miscues the right seems pleased.  When Wyoming Sen. Malcolm Wallop, chairman of the GOP Senate Steering Committee, sent a letter to the White House opposing four nominees, Mr. Sununu made the senators' case to the president.  Mr. Bush agreed, overruling Mr. Thornburgh and HHS Secretary Louis Sullivan.  Paul Weyrich, the New Right activist, says his White House access is better than it ever was in the Reagan years.  "I don't always like the decision, but I always feel my view has been heard and understood," he says, crediting the chief of staff.  In an administration top-heavy with cautious insiders, Mr. Sununu has been willing to introduce some leavening heresy.  Mr. Sununu's main public task seems to be as a political enforcer, letting Mr. Bush remain kinder and gentler.  When Sen. Joe Biden (D., Del.) began to advertise his own anti-drug strategy, Mr. Sununu told Republicans that they should describe the senator's ideas as "mostly plagiarism" from the administration -- an allusion to Sen. Biden's borrowing habits in the 1988 presidential campaign.  While it's been criticized as a rash outburst, Republicans who were there say Mr. Sununu's remark was clearly calculated to discredit the Democratic spokesman on a major Bush initiative.  Blunt talk has its uses.  "Frankly, I think the Democrats picked the wrong guy on drugs," Mr. Sununu says of Sen. Biden.  "The history was there and we just pointed it out."  A more substantive criticism is that Mr. Sununu has become so caught up with process, so good at the Washington schmooze, that he ignores long-term strategy.  He leads a White House filled with dealmakers, but lacking in people with ideas for changing the terms of political debate.  His widely reported deal with Ted Kennedy on aid to the disabled offers a short-term political gain, but at the price of burdening employers with huge new costs.  The savings and loan bailout may be a managerial triumph, but the White House missed a chance for major reform.  Mr. Sununu dismisses the question, but perhaps the criticism is getting through.  Shortly before Congress adjourned this month, Mr. Sununu called a few House Republicans together to discuss strategy for the autumn.  To the members' surprise, he wanted their ideas.  He started talking about how the world is changing so fast, perhaps they needed to re-examine the "old assumptions" that have dominated politics for the past decade.  The same could be said of Washington's assumptions about John Sununu.  Program trading is spreading from Wall Street's power brokers to the hinterlands.  And the giant brokerage firms are helping it get there.  Indeed, the firms are racing to develop cheaper and easier-to-use computer-guided trading systems, ensuring that this still-controversial trading style will be used by a widening circle of money managers.  Nearly two years after the crash, the debate continues whether computer-driven trading strategies are good or bad.  Brokerage firms in the business, which tiptoed back into program trading after the postcrash furor died down, argue that such strategies as stock-index arbitrage -- rapid trading between stock-index futures and stocks to capture fleeting price differences -- link two related markets and thus benefit both.  "Program trading has given institutions tremendous amounts of liquidity," says Christopher Pedersen, senior vice president at Twenty-First Securities Corp. "Program trading is a product that is here, links markets, and it is not going to disappear.  It is a function of the computerization of Wall Street."  Opponents contend that these strategies produce sharp market swings that frighten away small investors.  Program traders "have done resounding damage to the markets for raising new capital," declares A. Brean Murray, chairman of Brean Murray, Foster Securities Inc.  "The leverage in these instruments gives you the ability to manipulate the market.  When you drive the market up and down in percentages in an hour -- there is something unfair about this."  While the debate drags on, sophisticated research teams at firms such as Morgan Stanley & Co., Kidder, Peabody & Co., and PaineWebber Inc. are producing computer hardware and software systems that make trading large baskets of stocks cheaper and easier.  And though charges of hurting the "little guy" abound, the day is already here when many medium-sized investors -- such as regional banks -- are involved in program trading, or want to be.  Take James Wright, chief investment officer at Banc One Asset Management in Columbus, Ohio.  He is setting up a stock-index arbitrage and futures trading account with Kidder Peabody and Salomon Brothers for a $65 million stock fund.  "Whenever there is an arbitrage opportunity, we'll take it," he says.  Though McCue Conway, vice president at Boatmen's Trust Company in St. Louis, has been trading large baskets of stocks with the help of computer programs for the past four years, he is avidly interested in the new models being developed.  And if he finds a newer system that can save him transaction costs, Mr. Conway says he will use it.  Among the strategies being marketed to money managers such as Mr. Conway are techniques to study trading costs, market timing, and arbitrage.  Money managers say Morgan and Kidder Peabody have developed such techniques, although neither firm would comment.  "Morgan and Kidder are in a war," says one money manager for an insurance company.  "They are marketing trading baskets that can just about do anything."  As usual, part of this war involves luring away the competitor's talent; Stephen Bodurtha, program trading strategist for Kidder Peabody recently left for Merrill Lynch.  Another part is stealing customers; Morgan Stanley is after some PaineWebber's clients, one money manager says.  Overall, program trading volume in July fell to an average of 17.8 million shares a day from 28.1 million in June.  But 43.1% of the volume was executed on behalf of customers in July, up from 40.7% in June and 39.5% in May.  "We get a great deal of inquiries (from prospective clients) on the subject everyday," says Jeff Tabak, managing partner at Miller Tabak Hirsch + Co., a smaller firm that last month ranked 12th among all program traders.  By far, Kidder Peabody was the most active program trading firm in July with 62.1 million shares, compared with secondplace Morgan Stanley's 41.5 million shares, the New York Stock Exchange said.  More than half of Kidder Peabody's trading involved stock-index arbitrage, while Morgan Stanley's activity was about evenly split between index arbitrage and other strategies.  Bear, Stearns & Co. was the third top program trader of the month with 35.1 million shares, 19.8 million of that total traded in various basket strategies other than index arbitrage.  Kidder Peabody traded 44.2 million shares in programs for its own account, while Morgan Stanley traded 26.4 million for the house account.  Bear Stearns's program activity amounted to 18.3 million shares for its account and 16.8 million shares on behalf of clients.  The Big Board said that July program trading amounted to 9.4% of its average daily volume of 162.5 million shares, or 15.3 million shares a day.  In June, program trading accounted for 12.3% of daily Big Board volume of 180.3 million shares, or 22.1 million shares a day.  In all markets, program trading averaged 17.8 million shares a day in July, down from 28.1 million in June.  CityFed Financial Corp., reacting to tougher capital standards in the savings and loan bailout law, said it would reduce assets of its City Federal Savings Bank and possibly raise new capital.  In a quarterly report to shareholders, John W. Atherton Jr., president and chief executive officer of the bank holding company, said he hopes to reduce City Federal's asset base to $9 billion by the end of the year.  On June 30, he said, the bank had assets of $10.4 billion.  City Federal expects to reduce assets by selling mortgage-backed securities and other mortgage loans, he said, adding that the bank already has sold about $440 million of mortgage-backed securities.  Mr. Atherton said those sales resulted in a "modest gain."  Mr. Atherton said the bank might raise additional capital in various ways, including private or public offerings of preferred stock, subordinated debt or common equity.  He said the company recently retained an investment banking firm to assist in the analysis of capital-raising options.  Robert Freeman of Goldman Sachs felt obliged to plead guilty to one count of "mail fraud" yesterday in exchange for prosecutors dropping all other charges, but he continues to assert his innocence on the original insider-trading charges.  The Manhattan U.S. attorney also dropped all charges against Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor, earlier accused along with Mr. Freeman.  What anyone is supposed to make of this prosecution "victory" we do not know.  Justice has not been done if Mr. Freeman is in fact guilty of something -- and a gross injustice has been done if he is innocent.  That we will never know which is the case says all you need to know about whitecollar prosecutions these days.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Westpac Banking Corp. -- $400 million of 9 1/8% subordinated debentures due Aug. 15, 2001, priced at 99.60 to yield 9.18%.  The issue is noncallable and was priced at a yield spread 100 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated double-A-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-A-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through First Boston Corp. and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  HME Acquisition Corp. -- $314.9 million in a two-part junk bond offering as part of an acquisition of Horace-Mann Educators Corp., priced by Goldman Sachs & Co.  A $114.9 million tranche of zero coupon senior subordinated discount notes due Aug. 15, 1999, was priced at 65.612.  The stripped price is 63.  The discount notes pay no interest until Aug. 15, 1992.  Thereafter, they yield 14 3/4%.  Each note is being offered with one common stock warrant.  The discount notes are noncallable for three years and are rated single-B-1 by Moody's and single-B-minus by S&P.  The second part consists of $200 million of 15% subordinated debentures due Aug. 15, 2001, priced at par.  The debentures are noncallable for five years and are rated single-B-2 by Moody's and single-B-minus by S&P.  Consolidated Freightways Inc. -- $150 million of 9 1/8% notes due Aug. 15, 1999, priced at 99 1/2 to yield 9.20%.  The issue is noncallable and was priced at a yield spread 101 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  The issue contains event-risk language that offers bondholder protection in case of a takeover, leveraged buy-out or similar restructuring.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through First Boston Corp.  Huffy Corp. -- $30 million of 7.25% convertible subordinated debentures, due Aug. 15, 2014, priced at par.  The issue is noncallable for three years.  A sinking fund is scheduled to begin Aug. 15, 1999, that will retire 75% of the issue before maturity.  The debentures are convertible into common at $22.80 a share, representing a 20% conversion premium over yesterday's closing price.  Rated Ba-3 by Moody's and double-B-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  @ MUNICIPALS  Municipality of Metropolitan Seattle -- $80 million of limited sales tax general obligation bonds, Series 1989, due 1991-2003, 2006, 2009 and 2020, apparently won by a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group.  The bonds, rated double-A/single-A-plus, were priced for reoffering to yield from 6.10% in 1991 to 7.25% in 2020.  Serial bonds are priced to yield from 6.10% in 1991 to 6.95% in 2003.  Term bonds due 2006 have a 7 1/8% coupon and are priced at 99 3/4 to yield 7.15%.  Term bonds due 2009 have a 7 1/8% coupon and are priced at 99 1/2 to yield 7.17%.  Term bonds due 2020 have a 7.20% coupon and are priced at 99 3/8 to yield 7.25%.  @ EUROBONDS  West LB Finance Curacao N.V. (West German parent) -- 100 million Canadian dollars of 10 1/8% bonds due Sept. 27, 1997, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 9.80% via Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale.  Fees 2.  Societe Quebecoise de l'Assainissement des Eaux (Canada) -- C$150 million of 10 1/4% Eurobonds due Sept. 19, 1996, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 10.35% less full fees via Wood Gundy Inc. Guaranteed by the province of Quebec.  Fees 1 7/8.  Great Belt Link (Denmark) -- 300 million Swedish kronor of 11 1/8% Eurobonds due Dec. 15, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 11.13% less full fees via Sparekassen SDS. Guaranteed by Denmark.  Fees 1 7/8.  Daido Steel Co. (Japan) -- $200 million of Eurobonds due Sept. 6, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants indicating a 4 7/8% coupon at par via Nikko Securities Co. Europe.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable Oct. 7, 1989, through Aug. 17, 1994, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing price when terms are fixed next Thursday.  Fees 2 1/4.  THE TRADE DEFICIT narrowed to $8.17 billion in June, its best showing in 4 1/2 years, as exports rose 1.5% while imports declined 3.6%.  But economists warned they don't expect the deficit to continue to shrink as rapidly in the months ahead.  Stock and bond prices fell, amid worry over signs of robust economic strength in the trade figures.  The Dow Jones industrials fell 13.66 points to 2679.63.  The dollar moved higher.  ---  Goldman Sachs arbitrager Robert Freeman agreed to plead guilty to a felony in connection with 1986 insider trading in Beatrice stock.  Mr. Freeman, who faces up to five years in jail and a fine of as much as $1.86 million, also resigned from Goldman.  The U.S. said it wouldn't file charges against Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor, former Kidder Peabody arbitragers.  ---  UAL has attracted two new potential bidders, investor Robert Bass and a Morgan Stanley/British Airways team.  The UAL board met for seven hours but made no decision on Marvin Davis's sweetened bid or whether to place the airline firm up for sale.  ---  A budget deficit of $127 billion for fiscal 1991 was projected by the Congressional Budget Office, $63 billion above the target set under Gramm-Rudman.  The White House has forecast a deficit of $88 billion.  ---  A Northrop unit may face criminal charges that it overcharged the Air Force more than $10 million on MX missile parts, according to people familiar with the investigation.  ---  Par Pharmaceutical suspended distribution of all of its generic drugs in tablet and capsule form.  The firm, the target of an FDA probe, said the products account for 40% of revenue.  ---  Bell Atlantic reached tentative agreement with the Communications Workers of America on wage and benefits and scheduled talks on local issues, indicating that a 13-day strike may end early next week.  ---  Kodak is expected to unveil another restructuring plan next week.  Industry experts expect some salary freezes and work force cuts, but not the sale of a major business.  ---  Walt Disney's president made a profit of $74.2 million last month when he sold Disney shares purchased in January under the company's stock option program.  Frank G. Wells disclosed the profit in an SEC filing.  ---  Qintex Entertainment expects to have between four and eight equity partners in its planned $600 million acquisition of MGM/UA's United Artists movie studio.  It plans to complete the deal by Sept. 30 even though financing is still being arranged.  ---  Navistar said earnings fell 41% in the fiscal third quarter and that tumbling orders for certain trucks will lead to production cutbacks, layoffs and possibly a fourth-quarter loss.  ---  Hewlett-Packard's profit fell 3% in its fiscal third quarter as revenue rose 23%.  The company cited disappointing minicomputer sales.  ---  Exxon and Alyeska Pipeline were sued by the National Wildlife Federation, which is seeking to create a multibillion-dollar fund to oversee the cleanup of Prince William Sound.  ---  Program trading is spreading from major Wall Street securities houses to medium-sized investors, such as regional banks, across the country.  ---  Cineplex Odeon disclosed that bankers could require repayment of $522 million if the movie theater chain's chairman or vice chairman leaves the company.  Cineplex has been soliciting bids for the firm.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 157,560,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2679.63, off 13.66; transportation 1428.34, up 26.67; utilities 216.55, off 1.76.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3290.64, off 14.43.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.82, up 0.57; spot index 129.21, up 0.17.  Dollar: 143.53 yen, up 1.43; 1.9647 marks, up 0.0239  The Federal Aviation Administration said it's investigating the design and manufacture of the type of engine that broke apart and caused the July 19 crash of a United Airlines DC-10 jet at Sioux City, Iowa.  Responding to a call by the National Transportation Safety Board for such an investigation, the FAA said it and the engine's maker, General Electric Co., already are well into the analysis.  So far, the inspections haven't turned up any serious "abnormalities" in the engine parts, or ones that seem to be related to the crash, said Anthony Broderick, the FAA's acting executive director for regulatory standards and compliance, in an interview.  But he called the effort "a very large undertaking."  The United airliner crashed in a cornfield while trying an emergency landing, killing 111 people.  The pilot had reported that the aircraft's tail engine failed, and that there subsequently was an almost total loss of the controls.  Federal investigators have attributed the loss of control to the rupture of the engine's fan stage, which flung metal into the plane's primary and two backup hydraulic systems.  The safety board formally recommended that the FAA direct an investigation of the General Electric CF6-6 engine to determine whether the government should require airlines to inspect the engines more frequently.  The FAA subsequently should evaluate the need for a similar investigation of all of GE's CF6 engines to decide if existing limits on the number of flights allowed before inspection are adequate, the board said.  A spokesman for GE Aircraft Engines, the Evendale, Ohio, unit of General Electric, Fairfield, Conn., said: "We are going to work with the FAA and comply with any inspections they deem appropriate."  The safety board also urged the FAA to expedite the work of its recently formed government-aviation industry task force, established to study whether any redesign of DC-10s or other wide-bodied aircraft is needed to improve their chances of surviving damage that occurs during flight.  As for the GE engine, United Airlines recently found cracks in a fan shaft from another CF6-6 engine, according to the safety board.  But the FAA's Mr. Broderick said those cracks wouldn't pose any problem of catastrophic failure.  While a shaft part from the engine that broke apart last month hasn't been located, it's unlikely that it has the same cracks, he said.  The bond market, which has grown increasingly volatile, sank yesterday on news that the economy could be healthier than some analysts had expected.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond, which rose more than 1/2 point Wednesday, or about $5 for each $1,000 face amount, retraced all of those gains yesterday.  The 30-year bond's yield rose to 8.15% from 8.10% Wednesday.  Prices of municipal and mortgage securities also fell but held up better than Treasurys.  Corporate bonds ended unchanged.  In the past two weeks, the bond market has been gyrating wildly as investor sentiment swung between cautious optimism about inflation and bearishness about the outlook for interest rates.  In early trading yesterday, bond prices initially were boosted by a stronger dollar and news that the nation's trade deficit contracted significantly in June to $8.17 billion.  That was the smallest shortfall since December 1984.  But the rush faded as investors dissected the trade report, which revealed that the narrowing of the deficit in June was driven by a 3.6% decline in imports and a 1.5% increase in exports.  The growth of the export sector provided additional evidence that the U.S. economy retains some vigor, even if the growth isn't as strong as it was earlier this year.  "People started to realize that with exports at a record level, you're going to continue to have a manufacturing sector performing reasonably well," said Steven Wood, director of financial market research at Bank of America.  Based on the narrower deficit, some economists are now forecasting an upward revision to the second-quarter gross national product growth rate from the 1.7% rate reported last month.  The revised GNP figures will be reported Aug. 29.  Also contributing to the bond market's weak tone was a Labor Department report that revealed that initial claims for state unemployment insurance fell in the week ended Aug. 5 by 13,000 to 317,000.  Economists said that data, combined with other recent economic reports, reduce the likelihood that the Federal Reserve will vote to ease credit policy further at the Federal Open Market Committee meeting Tuesday.  "The economy is somewhat stronger than the Federal Reserve had thought during the period when it was easing monetary policy," in June and July, said Bruce Steinberg, an economist at Merrill Lynch & Co.  "The Fed is now likely to hold monetary policy steady for a while."  As a result, he said, "bonds are not going anywhere."  More news about the economy comes today when the Labor Department releases the consumer price index for July.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report forecast, on average, a modest 0.2% rise in the consumer price index for July.  The index, which measures inflation on the retail level, rose 0.2% in June and 0.6% in May.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds ended between 1/8 point and more than 1/2 point lower yesterday.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 99 17/32, compared with 100 4/32 Wednesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 98 29/32 to yield 8.14%, compared with a price of 99 8/32 and yield of 8.09% Wednesday.  The latest two-year notes were at 99 3/32 to yield 8.19%, compared with 99 7/32 to yield 8.12%.  Short-term rates were unchanged to modestly higher yesterday.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was unchanged at 7.89% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.14%.  The discount rate on six-month bills rose to 7.85% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.27%.  In when-issued trading, the $9.5 billion of two-year notes the Treasury will auction Tuesday were quoted at 8.22%, and the $7.75 billion of five-year, two-month notes to be auctioned Wednesday were quoted at 8.13%.  Corporate Issues  Westpac Banking Corp., Australia's largest and oldest banking group, made its debut in the corporate new issue market with a $400 million debt offering.  Westpac offered 12-year subordinated debentures priced to yield 9.18%.  Although lead manager First Boston Corp. said the deal is doing well, dealers at several Wall Street firms say the issue is seeing some investor resistance.  Dealers say of particular worry is Westpac's exposure to Hooker Corp., an Australian property development company.  On July 26, Hooker was forced to file in an Australian state court for liquidation when 42 banks terminated a four-month debt moratorium.  Last week, Hooker's U.S. unit, L.J. Hooker, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy law protection.  According to Westpac's preliminary prospectus, as of July 27, the bank had a total of $286 million in loans outstanding to Hooker and its related companies.  In its prospectus, however, the bank said it doesn't anticipate that its exposure to Hooker will "materially affect the bank's financial position."  Meanwhile, Berkshire Hathaway Inc. filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for a shelf offering of as much as $400 million principal amount of debt securities on terms to be determined at the time of sale.  The company, which is controlled by billionaire investor Warren Buffett, said net proceeds will be contributed to the equity capital of the company's insurance subsidiaries.  Underwriters will include Salomon Brothers Inc.  Municipals  The trade data, in addition to moderate dealer selling and a solid forward calendar of new issues, kept prices of tax-exempt bonds soft.  Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority of New York's 7 1/8% securities of 2019, for instance, were at 97 1/4 bid late yesterday, off 3/8 from late Wednesday but up 1/8 from the 97 1/8-bid intrasession low.  Traders said there were some signs of retail interest in battered tax-exempt issues, but on the whole, institutional investors were relatively quiet during the day.  A Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group had the winning bid for $80 million of limited sales tax general obligation bonds from the Municipality of Metropolitan Seattle.  An official with the lead underwriter said the deal was in good shape yesterday afternoon.  The offering was the largest competitively bid sale to come this week.  Foreign Bonds  The rising value of the dollar in response to the sharp narrowing in the U.S. merchandise trade deficit pushed West German and British government bonds lower.  Traders in London and Frankfurt said bond prices were unchanged or firmer before the trade report but sank shortly afterward.  West Germany's 6 3/4% issue of June 1999 ended 0.10 point lower at 100.30 to yield 6.703%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 were 0.20 point lower at 99.95 to yield 6.752%.  Britain's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 was unchanged at 116 2/32 to yield 9.594%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 1/32 to 100 2/32 to yield 11.64%.  In Japan, government bond prices were unchanged to lower.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at a price of 97.16 to yield 5.065%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities fell 5/32 to 9/32 point but held up better than intermediate Treasurys.  Dealers said trading was quiet.  There was only light selling by thrift institutions, which have been the dominant force in the market in recent months.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery finished at 97 2/32, down 7/32.  The yield was 9.54% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the 10-year Treasury note tightened 0.02 percentage point to 1.40.  In derivative markets, there was no new-issue activity in the real estate mortgage investment conduit sector for the fourth consecutive session.  Dealers said the current lull reflects the desire of underwriters to lighten their inventories of unsold securities before pricing new deals.  Portsmouth Bank Shares Inc. said it received regulatory approvals for the repurchase of as much as 5% of its common stock outstanding.  The bank holding company said its board recently approved a stock repurchase program covering as much as 197,708 shares of its 3,954,167 common shares.  California Energy Co., a producer of electric power and developer of geothermal power, said it formed a subsidiary, American Pacific Power Corp., to be based in Portland, Ore.  The new unit will focus on exploration and development of geothermal power in Oregon, Washington, northern Nevada, Idaho and Utah.  Tylan Corp. said Vacuum General Inc. has made a firm financing commitment for the senior debt portion of its pending merger with the closely held San Diego company.  In June, Tylan agreed to be acquired by Vacuum General for $4.25 a share in cash, or about $8.7 million.  The commitment provides for up to $12.5 million in term and revolving lines, subject to several conditions including the continued availability of $1.5 million in certain Tylan foreign bank lines and the completion of a $2.2 million transaction with a foreign business partner of Vacuum General.  Tylan is a maker of gas measurement and control equipment, and Vacuum General makes measurement equipment used mainly in processing silicon wafers for the semiconductor industry.  The merger agreement is expected to be submitted for shareholder approval in September.  FPS Computing, citing expenses associated with its restructuring program, said it expects to report a fiscal third-quarter loss wider than the $1.47 million loss in its second quarter.  In the year-ago third quarter, the maker of scientific computers had a loss of $3.5 million on revenue of about $17.1 million.  The company said revenue for the latest quarter ended July 31 is about flat against the $14.7 million posted in the second quarter.  Results for the latest quarter are expected to be reported in full during the first week of September, the company said.  South Korea's imports of consumer products jumped 33% in the first half of this year from a year earlier, to $2.95 billion, according to the Ministry of Trade and Industry.  Imports of raw materials, meanwhile, fell 9.7% to $513 million.  A ministry official said the change in the figures reflects recent problems of the local economy, as capital investment at major export-oriented plants has dropped sharply while purchases of luxury imported goods such as large refrigerators, cameras and golf equipment have surged.  West Germany's producer prices in July climbed 0.1% from June and rose 3% from year-earlier levels, the Federal Statistics Office in Wiesbaden said.  The producer-price index, in which the year 1985 equals 100, edged up to 99.3 in July from 99.2 in June, and exceeded the 96.4 recorded in July 1988.  In June, producer prices slipped 0.1% from May, the first time in 21 months that the index had a month-to-month decline.  West Germany's wholesale price index for July fell 0.9% from June, the second consecutive monthly decline, but rose 5% from June 1988, the Federal Statistics Office in Wiesbaden said.  The July drop followed May's 0.1% decline from June, and brought the year-to-year comparison in wholesale prices down from 5.5% in June.  Interpublic Group of Cos. said its board authorized the repurchase of as many as one million common shares over the next 12 months.  So far this year, the advertiser has purchased 1.1 million of its shares.  As of June 30, it had about 33.7 million outstanding.  Australia's current-account deficit, the measure of trade in goods and services and certain other transactions, widened in July to an unadjusted 1.71 billion Australian dollars (US$1.29 billion) from a revised A$1.62 billion in June, and from A$1.46 billion in July 1988.  Preliminary figures from the Bureau of Statistics also show Australia had an unadjusted merchandise-trade deficit of A$545 million in July, widening from a revised A$254 million gap in June and an A$483 million deficit a year earlier.  In seasonally adjusted terms, though, the current-account deficit narrowed to A$1.48 billion in July from a revised A$1.59 billion in June.  Pauley Petroleum Inc. said its Hondo Oil & Gas Co. unit agreed to sell 10 producing oil and gas leases in Eddy County, N.M., to Harcorn Oil Co., a partnership formed by Alcorn Cos. of Victoria, Texas, and Harmex Corp. of Hartford, Conn.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Pauley said the leases represent about 6.4% of Hondo's proven reserves.  Proceeds from the sale will be used to reduce debt.  OCTEL COMMUNICATIONS Corp., Milpitas, Calif., announced the sale of 1.5 million common shares at $23.375 each.  Proceeds from the offering will be used to increase working capital.  The company has about 16.3 million shares outstanding after the offering.  Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. and Hambrecht & Quist Inc. co-managed the offering.  Octel makes voice processing systems sold to large corporate customers and provides voice information services.  As a 12-year veteran of a police force, I feel qualified to respond to Lawrence W. Sherman's Aug. 2 editorial-page article, "Police Corps Plan Is Poor Weapon Against Crime."  Mr. Sherman wants the focus of police recruiting to turn away from young people and concentrate on an older group.  While I agree that some young officers do tend to be overly aggressive (leading to more complaints and traffic accidents), this is a small price to pay for a young, vibrant and strong police department.  It is axiomatic that as people grow older they generally become less dexterous, physically slower and tire more easily.  The suggestion to recruit people in their 30s and 40s for a physically demanding profession such as police work borders on the ludicrous.  While these people may be physically capable of handling police work when they are first hired, this will diminish quickly.  The thought of a 60-to-65-year-old police officer chasing a robbery suspect or running up three flights of stairs to render aid to a sick or injured person is frightening.  Furthermore, hiring an older person does not result in a more experienced police officer, just an older rookie.  Let's leave the demanding war on crime to those people most physically capable of doing the job.  David G. Ragusa  Elmont, N.Y.  Standard Chartered PLC, a major British bank with a large exposure in less-developed countries, reported a pretax loss of #48 million ($75.8 million) for the first half, after making a #208 million special provision against problem loans.  The loss, which reversed a #156 million pretax profit a year earlier when no special provisions were made, was widely expected after Britain's four largest banks recently announced large provisions for debt to less-developed countries.  With the addition, Standard Chartered's total provisions against less-developed countries' debt rose to #798 million, or about 46% of the bank's #1.73 billion exposure.  Excluding the provision, Standard Chartered's first-half pretax profit rose 12% to #174 million.  After taxes, the bank's loss totaled #69 million, reversing a #95 million profit a year earlier.  Data Translation Inc. said the federal government may file a civil lawsuit against the company seeking damages of more than $5 million in connection with pricing of federal contracts.  The maker of computer products said it was informed of the potential suit by U.S. attorneys after the federal General Services Administration completed a review of pricing of federal contracts awarded to the company for the two-year period ended Sept. 30, 1985.  In a letter, the federal attorneys told the company the suit would seek about $520,000 in damages, which the government might seek to treble, and penalties of up to $10,000 for each of at least 386 company invoices submitted to the government, Data Translation said.  The U.S. attorneys invited the company to enter into settlement negotiations, the company added.  The U.S. attorneys couldn't be reached for comment.  Data Translation asserted that it has "meritorious defenses" in the matter and that any liabilities arising from the dispute won't have a material effect on the company's finances.  A company spokesman said the dispute arose from the government's contention that the company "didn't show the level of discounts on volume purchases {the government} could have had."  He added that the company "will sit down" with federal officials "and try to resolve this."  HUNTINGTON BANCSHARES Inc., Columbus, Ohio, said its board authorized the repurchase of as many as two million common shares for the bank holding company's various benefit plans.  At the end of June, Huntington had 44,059,930 common shares outstanding, excluding treasury shares.  The public sector borrowing requirement, the most widely used measure of Britain's government deficit or surplus, showed a surplus of #1.4 billion ($2.21 billion) in July, compared with a deficit of #697 million in June and a surplus of #1.602 billion in July 1988, the British Treasury said.  The size of the surplus was in line with market expectations.  In the first four months of the fiscal year that began April 1, the surplus totaled #1.4 million, compared with a surplus of #3.2 billion a year earlier.  The government is projecting a surplus for the year ending March 31, 1990, of #14 billion.  South Korean companies' performance in the first half of this year was the poorest in three years, according to data from economic research institutes.  The 371 listed local firms whose fiscal year ends Dec. 31 reported 46 trillion won ($69.63 billion) in aggregate sales and 918 billion won ($1.39 billion) in profits for the first six months of the year, up 9.5% and 2.8%, respectively, from a year earlier.  The gains slowed from increases of 12% and 36% for the first half of last year, when there were 305 such listed firms.  If data for banks are excluded, the performance is even poorer.  The 355 non-bank companies had 749 billion won in total profits, down 8.2% from a year earlier.  An analyst attributed the poor performance to rising wages, the high value of the won and a tight monetary policy that pushed up financial costs.  The won has risen 43% against the U.S. dollar in the past three years, eroding the international competitiveness of South Korean products.  Singapore's consumer price index rose 0.2% in June from the previous month and was up 2.5% from June 1988, the Department of Statistics reported.  The rise was mainly due to higher prices of food and miscellaneous items and higher housing costs, the department said.  In response to Irving Kristol's July 21 editorial-page piece, "Who Needs Peace in the Middle East?": Mr. Kristol completely misses the point as to why a resolution of the Palestinian-Israeli conflict should be the paramount consideration of the U.S.'s Middle East policy.  The issue is not, as Mr. Kristol's straw-man argument suggests, that it is "the key to peace in the Middle East."  The issue is that a resolution of the Palestinian problem is the only way to secure justice for the Palestinians in the form of fundamental rights, including rights to life, liberty and property.  In his own oblique way, Mr. Kristol acknowledges that an issue of justice may be involved here: "This is not to deny that the current situation on the West Bank is tragic in human terms, and pointless in political terms."  Tragic, indeed, but why is it that this supposed "tragedy" merits so scant a reference?  Indeed, Mr. Kristol takes pains to assure us of the irrelevancy of the Palestinians in the larger scheme of things -- they are, according to him, "a tiny population that could never play a role in the power politics of the Middle East," and when all is said and done, their problems are a matter of merely "marginal significance."  "Marginal," perhaps, to Mr. Kristol, who surveys the scene from the aeries of the American Enterprise Institute, but not so to the "tiny population" of Palestinians who have been refugees for the past 20 years -- or for anyone who prefers justice to expediency.  Irfan Ahmad Khawaja  West Orange, N.J.  ---  By showing why the U.S. State Department formula tends to a war, rather than a "peace process," Mr. Kristol once again renders a public service.  But his hunch that Israel might resolve the dilemma by "drawing a line down the West Bank that would delineate the slice of territory important to its national security, annexing that territory outright, and then withdrawing from the rest of the West Bank, leaving it to its own (presumably chaotic) destiny," runs into a flaw.  He presumably has in mind a line that would annex the Jordan River crossing plus strategic passes and heights.  The problem is that such an area would be within range of artillery, including artillery in Jordan, and the part given up would deny to Israel the indispensable depth from which to counteract.  Leonard Horwin  Former U.S. Diplomat  Beverly Hills  ---  Mr. Kristol's analysis is fraught with inconsistencies.  For example, he says Palestinian Arabs "could never play a role in the power politics of the Middle East," yet later says that Saudi Arabia's relations with Israel and the U.S. would be "at the mercy of a Palestinian state."  He concludes begrudgingly but wisely that Israel should withdraw from that part of the West Bank not important to its security, though he adds with a certain meanspiritedness that this would leave the West Bank "to its own (presumably chaotic) destiny."  Israeli Defense Force Chief of Staff Dan Shomron believes Israel can't rule 1.8 million Palestinians by force except through "deportation, starvation or genocide."  Mr. Kristol apparently shares at least some of this judgment.  But he should consider carrying his idea one step further by suggesting that Israel might at least see how far Palestinian demands exceed what he proposes that Israel do unilaterally.  Israel just might be surprised.  It costs nothing to inquire.  A negotiated settlement would not only provide Israel a border much less expensive to police than the border Mr. Kristol contemplates, but more important, Israel might find that peace with the Palestinians could provide it a bridge to acceptance in the Arab world.  Merle Thorpe Jr.  President  Foundation For Middle East Peace  Washington  Industrial production in June rose 0.1% from May and was down 1.8% from June 1988, according to provisional data released by Britain's Central Statistical Office.  Curiously, Martha Bayles seems to have developed her impressions of the Woodstock Music and Arts festival and the people who attended from the very media whose romantic reminiscences she deplores in her article, "Unliberating Memories" (Leisure and Arts, Aug. 7).  As one who attended the three-day event, I was offended by her cynical characterizations of the festival goers as into romanticism, socialism and transcendence and find that her analysis serves only to further distort the already distorted collective memories of Woodstock.  Along with most of those in attendance, I went for the music.  I purchased tickets well in advance only to find they weren't collected.  There was nothing romantic about abandoning one's car and hiking to the festival site -- but with the complete lack of planning by festival organizers, there was no other choice.  The only nudity I saw was in the film version issued by Warner Bros. in the 1970s.  I brought plenty of food and was appalled when food drops were made by the National Guard.  I couldn't wait to escape the mud, the heat and the garbage.  In fact, none of the people with whom I went to Woodstock nor any I have met since are nostalgic for this festival or ever thought for a minute that the Woodstockians' "nation," as Ms. Bayles describes it, "was a viable alternative to 'the system' . . ."  When the festival was over, we all returned to our jobs on Monday, glad to be home.  The fact is, even the music wasn't that good.  Gary Mayne  Arlington, Va.  A Lear Siegler Holdings Corp. subsidiary said it extended to 6 p.m. EST today its tender offer for Monitor Technologies Inc. to allow additional shares to be tendered.  The subsidiary, Lear Siegler Measurement Controls Corp., makes energy-monitoring systems.  It has offered $8 a share, or $15.9 million, for the San Diego-based maker of air-quality monitoring systems.  As of Tuesday, the previous expiration date, 88% of Monitor's 1,770,943 shares outstanding had been tendered.  In addition, notices of guaranteed delivery of an additional 50,060 shares were received by the deadline, Lear Siegler Measurement said.  It also said that in addition to the shares, it would also purchase unissued options, if they were exercised, for Monitor Technologies employees.  Malaysia, the world's biggest producer and exporter of natural rubber, produced 127,249 tons of it in June, up 24% from the previous month, because of the end of the winter season, the government said.  Despite this favorable trend, first-half production totaled 675,943 tons, an 11% decline from a year earlier.  The level of stocks continued to be stable, at 233,880 tons at the end of June, up 4% from the previous month and up 45% from a year earlier, primarily because of reduced exports.  Malaysia exported 120,696 tons in June, a 17% rise from the previous month.  First-half exports totaled 736,311 tons, down 15% from a year earlier.  Inflationary pressure in West Germany will probably abate somewhat in the second half, but will still end up at about 3% for this year and 1990, according to a report to be released today by the Hamburg Economics Research Institute.  The institute said domestic factors will keep inflation in check, despite a marked decline in upward price pressure owing to external factors.  But it warned that dangers of pressure for higher wages could lead to an even greater jump in inflation.  The cost of living climbed as high as 3.1% on a year-to-year basis in June, after having risen a mere 1.2% in 1988, but has since declined slightly.  Prices in July, though down 0.1% from June, were still 3.1% above July 1988 levels.  Diebold Inc. said members of Local 710 of the International Union of Electronic, Electrical, Salaried, Machine and Furniture Workers at its Newark, Ohio, plant returned to work after approving a three-year contract.  The workers had been on strike since July 15, when the previous contract expired.  Details of the pact weren't disclosed.  Diebold makes automated teller machines used in banking.  "Hello, welcome," says Peter F. Secchia, the new U.S. ambassador to Italy, tugging a reporter by both lapels.  The reporter smiles, embarrassed.  "Hello, it's nice to meet you," the ambassador says a bit later, jutting out his hand to another reporter and then continuing to greet guests at a recent U.S.-style picnic at his residence.  Mr. Secchia was raked over the coals by the U.S. Senate -- and the Italian and U.S. press -- during protracted hearings on his nomination as envoy to Italy.  Now in Rome, he wants to show the world that a 52-year-old Michigan businessman without international experience can learn to be an ambassador.  In addition to charges that he is unqualified, President Bush's representative in Rome has been accused of peppering his talk with expletives, making indelicate remarks about women and Democrats, and dealing a low blow to the Italian navy.  The former Marine with an economics degree from Michigan State University is a successful businessman.  But his only exposure to international relations came during a four-week State Department briefing before his departure.  He knows he is unprepared for the post and admits he got it thanks to his friendship with Mr. Bush.  But since his arrival in Rome at the end of June, he has displayed enthusiasm and a willingness to learn and to curb his tongue.  In an interview, Mr. Secchia points to his business background in addressing his lack of diplomatic preparation.  Mr. Bush is right in choosing "successful, prominent, proven-track-record" businessmen to be ambassadors in some countries, he says, noting Italy's thriving economy and U.S. business, tourism and military interests here.  One of the challenges of the job is "to convince the Italian people that we are their partners. . . .  In peacetime we're no longer the big boy on the block. . . .  We're in Italy now as a partner, not as the boss of bosses," he says.  When asked about the bad press, Mr. Secchia tries to change the subject.  He denies making some of the controversial comments ascribed to him and says much of the reaction came from the Christian right in the U.S., which he said objected to his occasional use of profanity.  He has "occasionally blistered an employee," he says, and concedes he is "a street fighter . . . in the political trenches."  He denies making off-color remarks about women, but admits to uttering the Italian navy joke last year ("I saw the new Italian navy.  Its boats have glass bottoms -- so they can see the old navy.") and colorful comments about Democrats, but says the latter weren't "continually gross."  Mr. Secchia says the difference between him and his predecessor, Maxwell M. Rabb, is only in style: "He was a lawyer; I'm a businessman.  He was 78; I'm 52.  He was here with his wife; I've come here with {my wife and} four children."  Mr. Secchia, whose paternal grandparents were Italian immigrants, was chairman of Universal Companies Inc., in which he held a controlling stake.  The company, with annual sales of about $400 million, owns building-supply wholesalers and a score of restaurants.  He was a Republican national committeeman and managed Mr. Bush's Michigan campaign.  A few days after his arrival here, the hefty, graying, blue-eyed ambassador said at a news conference: "I ask the Italian people to accept me. . . .  I will study hard.  No one will outwork me.  And I will be open and candid and honest."  But at the same news conference, Mr. Secchia said the U.S. preferred the Communists out of the Italian government because of their position on strategic issues.  Newspapers called the statement a gaffe, and leftist politicians howled.  Giuseppe Panocchia, spokesman for the Foreign Affairs Ministry, says that while Mr. Secchia lacks international experience, many kinds of experience can be useful for the job.  He cites the eclectic background of Claire Booth Luce, U.S. ambassador to Rome from 1953 to 1957.  "Persons must be judged for what they do and not what they have done," he says.  "The ambassador is a person full of enthusiasm and motivation.  It just remains to be seen what he does."  L. Gordon Crovitz's July 21 editorial-page article, "Contingency Fees and the Common Good," roused in me a series of emotions ranging from sadness, through relived anger, to astonishment and ending with complete bewilderment.  How the heck could any rational Englishman contemplate the contingency-fee madness after seeing what it has done to us on this side of the pond?  I should explain the anger part: The contingency con game has cost me a little over a million dollars -- defending myself in two cases where I had done nothing wrong.  I resent that deeply, because it isn't right and because I can't do anything about it that won't put me in jail.  It wiped me out.  At age 60, I'm back to square one and I have no assurance that it couldn't happen again.  I'm sure you've heard this kind of tearjerker a million times and I recount it only to explain my strong feelings; not for sympathy.  I've always been willing to take risks and I probably always will.  Also, I've always tried to get outside of the immediate problem and restore my perspective with a little humor, to wit: In viewing many damage claims, I've noticed something funny; The lawyers are the only ones Who end up with the money.  I hope you have a counterpart in the English system who might have an opportunity to skewer a venal ass or two with this little bit of doggerel.  George Holiday  Downey, Calif.  ---  Mr. Crovitz entirely missed the mark.  I am neither a lawyer nor receive any benefit from such suits.  I am, however, someone who has had occasion to challenge a multibillion-dollar corporation over a financial misdeed.  Contingency fees are vital to the principle that everyone has some chance at justice.  Corporations consider it a matter of course to try to bleed the most deserving victim through legal delays resulting in unbearable financial burdens.  The possibility that a lawyer will take a sexual-harassment, wrongful-termination or fraud case on contingency acts as a deterrent to such acts.  This gives the plaintiff some shot at justice against deep corporate pockets.  Mr. Crovitz's premise that the resulting awards are passed on to the consumer is correct, but his conclusion is wrong.  First, the plaintiff has to win.  If so, one might recall that one's peers made that determination and had some reasonable grounds to do so.  Second, any company that repeatedly has awards levied against it will find its product price uncompetitively high and will be hurt in the marketplace.  This is as it should be.  Third, the very notion that big companies are becoming sensitive to these high awards proves their value.  Does one think the social progress Corporate America has made in worker rights and consumer rights was because of its inherent goodness?  John J. Valentine  Portsmouth, N.H.  Private enterprise in Kenya is highly valued.  Mombasa is a fine port.  Exotic wildlife and nice beaches attract plenty of rich tourists.  Nearly everyone speaks English.  There hasn't been a coup -- at least not a successful one -- for 26 years.  So why, then, hasn't Kenya gotten any new foreign investment to speak of -- on top of capital outflows -- in the past decade?  "Minor things," says Silas M. Ita, managing director of Kenya's Investments Promotion Center.  "Minor, minor things."  Things like price controls, import licensing, foreign-exchange manipulation, miles of red tape and, weaving its way through each of these, corruption.  The horror stories are legion: A diplomat tells of a blank import license on sale for $400,000; a businessman moans about waiting 15 months to repatriate dividends; a banker complains that it takes six weeks to get approval just to bring in more capital; a company owner describes padding his board with "door-openers," or people well-connected to the government, as a key to business success.  These tales may not yet have reached the epic levels that have so badly poisoned the business climate in many other African countries.  But they are by no means "minor," as Mr. Ita insists.  In fact, corruption and inefficient bureaucracy are having a profound impact here, torpedoing Kenya's reputation as one African country that works.  "It has gotten so that you have to bribe to get someone to find a file and then bribe to get someone to move the file," says a veteran Kenyan businessman.  It is a reflection of the business climate here that none of the executives interviewed for this story would talk for attribution.  Says another old Kenya hand: "If you're sitting in a boardroom in San Francisco looking for a place to invest your next $50 million, Kenya is much less attractive than it was 20 years ago."  The corruption and inefficiency isn't only scaring off new investors; it is chasing away some of those who eagerly flocked here after the country gained its independence from Britain in 1963.  According to World Bank figures for Africa, Kenya follows only Liberia, Nigeria and South Africa in cumulative capital flight in recent years.  Most of the 100 or so U.S. companies still represented here have sold or withdrawn their subsidiaries and now peddle their products through distributorships owned by local businessmen, who aren't subject to U.S. laws governing the behavior of U.S. corporations abroad.  Kodak (Kenya) Ltd., a unit of Eastman Kodak Co., Rochester, N.Y., remains here to service the big tourist business.  But businessmen familiar with the company say Kodak experiences many more hassles with red tape and import-licensing delays than does its main competitor, the locally owned distributor for Fuji Photo Film Co., of Japan.  "I'm fighting paper to death," says a Kodak executive.  "You're nuts to run a subsidiary here," says a Kenyan who distributes U.S. products.  "You either take off for Mauritius or Singapore, or you go with a local distributor who can be more flexible in doing what needs to be done."  The impact of this disinvestment and lack of new investment is magnified by Kenya's annual 4% population growth, which is one of the highest in the world.  The government reckons that an additional six million people will be entering the work force by the year 2000, or more than 500,000 a year.  But last year, according to government estimates, no more than 100,000 jobs were created.  This rising unemployment threatens to undo Kenya's biggest selling point: political stability.  Mr. Ita says the government is seriously trying to boost local and foreign investment.  With support from the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund, the government is pursuing an ambitious import-liberalization plan, which will, in theory, make foreign-currency allocations automatic on 75% of all imported goods.  It has decontrolled prices on about 30 items, although many essentials remain under control.  And it is targeting Nairobi and Mombasa as "export zones," where goods can come in and out of the country with a minimum of regulation.  With his finely tailored pinstripes and sparkling gold watch, Mr. Ita projects a promise of prosperity, and his smooth pitch to potential investors is alluring.  But just as the tattered wallpaper behind his desk, right below the photo of President Daniel arap Moi, belies this prosperous image, so do corrupt civil servants betray even the best policy intentions.  "The problems of investment aren't susceptible to policy solutions," says a Western diplomat in Nairobi.  "It's a matter of straightening out the administration, of getting people not to accept bribes.  This will be a slow, tough process, and a lot of political oxen will get gored in the process, including some very high up."  But the business community here generally doubts the government's commitment, and ability, to eliminate corruption.  Too often, say businessmen, they have heard statements like this one from Mr. Ita: "Corruption should be understood in its own perspective."  Mr. Ita laughs when asked for an explanation and he ushers the questioner out of his office.  But the perspective he mentions is no doubt the perspective of the ruling party, Kenya African National Union, which is intent on tightening its control over all aspects of Kenyan society, including the economy.  Party officials assiduously root out any opposition, the president has ordered a crackdown on rumor mongers within the government, and overly critical newspapers are either denied access to certain levels of government or shut down entirely.  When it comes to foreign investment, party officials are equally eager to control the action -- and given the number of approvals required for even the most basic business transactions, there is plenty of action to control.  Although there isn't any law requiring Kenyan partnership in foreign investments, officials aren't shy about pointing out the advantages of taking on local investors, or "door openers," which in most cases turn out to be civil servants and government ministers, or Asian entrepreneurs well connected to various party officials.  "You get a partner who understands the country," says Mr. Ita, "and it removes the suspicion that your operations are foreign controlled."  It is also, Mr. Ita pitches, a vital contribution to the country's overall business climate.  "Getting the elite of the country to participate in the economic activity of the country is a quite sensible move," he explains.  "If you leave the investments to Americans and British, then the local people will talk of neocolonialism.  You don't hear that here, because we participate {in investments}.  What you are likely to hear is that the elite are in control of things.  But you'll hear that very quietly."  HOUSTON INDUSTRIES Inc. executives D.D. Sykora, D. Eugene Simmons and three others who sold company stock between June 16 and July 17 continue to own Houston Industries shares.  According to the company, Mr. Sykora retains more than 15,000 shares, and Mr. Simmons continues to own more than 5,700 shares; the holdings of the three others total more than 3,000 shares.  Because of ambiguities in reports filed by the company with the Securities and Exchange Commission, an earlier edition stated incorrectly that the five insiders had sold substantially all of their holdings in the company.  (See: "Inside Track: Five Insiders Sell Their Houston Industries Stake" -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989)  The Farm Credit System's second-quarter profit dropped 6%, mostly as a result of less aggressive use of an unusual accounting technique.  The nation's largest agricultural lender, owned by its farmer-borrowers, reported net income of $159 million, down from $170 million a year earlier.  Results for the latest period were boosted by $80 million removed from the system's reserve for loan losses.  That compares with a so-called negative loan-loss provision of $181 million a year earlier.  The negative loan-loss provision, while permitted under generally accepted accounting principles, is highly unusual.  It has bolstered profits at the system, which says that improved loan quality has reduced the need for loan-loss reserves.  Net was reduced by $20 million paid into an insurance fund designed to help assure the stability of the Farm Credit System, which received a government bailout in 1987, and by higher tax payments resulting from an increased number of the system's lending institutions being classified as taxable.  Net interest income -- the difference between interest payments the system takes in from borrowers, and interest paid out on bonds used to finance loans -- rose about 20% to $256 million.  The improvement from a year earlier reflects the decline in loans borrowers weren't making payments on.  Such non-earnings assets, which include non-paying loans and property repossessed, fell about 10% to $3.4 billion.  The level of such problem loans remains high by conventional banking standards, however, and some parts of the system continue to deteriorate.  Its Spokane, Wash., Farm Credit Bank has exhausted capital available to absorb losses, the system said, and plans to seek a bailout from other parts of the system.  Also, while the record farm income of the past two years has helped reduce problem loans at the system, financially healthy farmers also are borrowing less.  Loans have fallen $1.04 billion, to $50.39 billion at June 30.  In the first six months, net fell to $317 million from $336 million a year earlier.  THE FORMER Fruehauf Corp. currently is named K-H Corp. and the Fruehauf name belongs to Terex Corp.  In a previous edition, ownership of the name wasn't made clear.  (See: "Varity's Purchase of Fruehauf Corp.  Might Not Proceed" -- WSJ Aug. 16, 1989)  Malaysia's gross domestic product grew 7.3% in the first quarter, accelerating slightly from the 7% growth rate in the 1988 fourth quarter, the national wire service Bernama said in a report quoting figures released by the central bank, Bank Negara.  For all of 1989, Malaysia's GDP is officially projected to grow 7.3%.  GDP last year grew 8.1% from the previous year.  Cellular Inc. said David M. Harrold, its president, chief executive officer and a director, resigned for personal reasons.  The company hasn't named a successor for Mr. Harrold, a company founder who was the "guiding spirit" of the company but wasn't involved in day-to-day operations, said Arnold C. Pohs, executive vice president and chief operating officer.  Mr. Harrold, who is 39 years old, couldn't be reached for comment.  He will be a consultant to the company through 1990, Cellular said.  Cellular provides management, financing and operating services to cellular-telephone systems.  Frank B. Hower Jr., 60 years old, will retire as chairman and chief executive officer of this bank holding company Feb. 1, 1990.  Joseph W. Phelps, 62, president, was named as Mr. Hower's successor as chairman and chief executive.  Mr. Hower, who remains a director, said he chose to retire early.  "I've been here 40 years," he said.  Besides, the two are close in age, so Mr. Hower said he didn't want both senior executives to retire at the same time.  Malcolm B. Chancey Jr., 57, executive vice president and cashier, was named president, succeeding Mr. Phelps.  Jangle Bells  There still are vigorous telephone rings  That command everyone to leap  In contrast to one of those wimpy things  That warble or chirp or beep.  -- Pat D'Amico.  ---  Home Front  In confronting father, it's remarkable how kids can make two syllables out of the word "dad."  -- Bert Murray.  Edmund Burke commenting on the prospects for perestroika -- in 1790:  It is not to be imagined, because a political system is, under certain aspects, very unwise in its contrivance, and very mischievous in its effects, that it therefore can have no long duration.  Its very defects may tend to its stability, because they are agreeable to its nature.  Vernitron Corp. tapped the No. 2 officer of Fairchild Industries Inc., Edward M. Murchie, to be its senior vice president and chief financial officer.  Mr. Murchie, 42 years old, has been president and chief operating officer of Fairchild since March and chief financial officer since 1987.  At closely held Vernitron, an industrial-electronics company, he succeeds Stephen W. Bershad as chief financial officer.  Mr. Bershad remains chairman and chief executive officer.  Fairchild, Chantilly, Va., is being acquired by Banner Industries Inc., Cleveland, in a transaction valued at about $400 million.  Banner subsequently will sell Fairchild's aerospace and defense-electronics businesses for $245 million to Matra SA, a diversified French aerospace concern.  Fairchild said Mr. Murchie received job offers from both Banner and Matra.  Prior to his Fairchild post, Mr. Murchie held the top finance position at Emery Air Freight Corp., now a unit of Consolidated Freightways Inc.  Separately, Vernitron officers couldn't be reached to comment on their plans to employ top Kollmorgen Corp. officers once its $320 million acquisition of that Stamford, Conn., electronics company is completed.  Kollmorgen shareholders will vote on the acquisition Aug. 25.  Carnival Cruise Lines Inc. said the Transportation Department approved Carnival Air Lines' request to operate scheduled service between eight U.S. cities and Nassau in the Bahamas.  Carnival announced in May that it was applying to upgrade its chartered jet service as a marketing strategy to bring passengers to its resort and casino in Nassau.  Under the approved schedule, Carnival Air, which is held through a subsidiary by Carnival's chairman and majority shareholder, will offer departures from Miami; Fort Lauderdale, Fla.; Newark, N.J.; Cleveland; Baltimore; New Orleans; Cincinnati, and Nashville, Tenn.  Darryl D. Fry, 50 years old, was elected a vice president with responsibility for the world-wide agricultural group.  Mr. Fry's present job as president of the U.S. agricultural division will be filled at a later date, the company said.  American Cyanamid has additional interests in biotechnology and chemicals.  Pacific Gas & Electric Co. agreed to transport an initial quantity of 100 million cubic feet a day on the Pacific Gas Transmission-Pacific Gas & Electric pipeline expansion.  Pacific Gas joins three other California utilities and eight third-party shippers signed up as firm transportation customers to California on the expansion of the pipeline system.  Will you rush to turn on TV when it's time for "Golden Girders"?  Or will you decide engineers are incurably unromantic -- dull, even?  On the side of the engineers is the head of a congressional task force who believes that all it takes to turn them into the hottest TV attraction since lawyers is a star-studded, prime-time television show.  "I don't see why we can't get somebody to do an 'L.A.  Engineers,'" says Sue Kemnitzer, director of a task force charged with attracting more women and minorities to engineering and science.  "These people do important, dramatic things, and still have time left for romance."  Alarmed by the declining number of U.S. students majoring in engineering, Ms. Kemnitzer believes an engineering melodrama could do wonders for undergraduate interest in the field, much as "L.A.  Law" revived interest in law school.  "What we're trying to do is get 'Roseanne' to go to engineering school," she says.  In July, Ms. Kemnitzer argued her case in Los Angeles before several people active in film and TV production.  But Hollywood hasn't exactly erupted with proposals.  "I think it's a whimsical idea . . . not very realistic," says Robert Hoffman, an independent producer who met with Ms. Kemnitzer.  And scriptwriters say the best she can hope for are jazzier supporting roles for high-tech types.  "It would be a big improvement if TV didn't always portray engineers and scientists as people in white coats doing strange things in secret," says Jeff Stetson, a Los Angeles writer.  Others, however, are more optimistic about prospects for a full-blown series on engineers.  "It's really a question of packaging," says Alan Bloom, who heads the film and TV production program at California State University at Los Angeles.  "If you put the show together right, it could really sell."  Mr. Bloom believes a multinational engineering company could provide the dramatic backdrop for an ensemble cast, much in the way a Los Angeles law firm provides the stage for lawyers specializing in criminal, divorce and corporate law.  "You could have one character troubleshooting the cause of a bridge collapse, another one exterminating a computer virus, a third working on a space project," he explains.  The American nuclear industry is its own worst enemy.  By trying to push ahead with vast, costly projects that have been stalled by political opposition, it exacerbates the irrational public fears that have blocked the development of nuclear power in the U.S. Instead, utilities should be exploring a new type of nuclear reactor that recent technological innovation has put within reach: a reactor type that is environmentally sound and economically competitive.  This reactor type uses new fuels, new design methods to dissipate heat, and smaller units that can be built and tested off-site.  It has excited scientists and engineers world-wide, but industry and government leaders in this country -- pessimistic about the public's willingness to accept nuclear power under any circumstances -- are reluctant to adopt it here.  That reluctance is wrong.  It is time for all of us to take a hard look at modular reactors.  It has become a commonplace to say that the nuclear industry in the U.S., is dead, and that its death looks like a suicide.  The problems of Seabrook and Shoreham nuclear plants are persuasive demonstrations of that commonplace.  But oil spills, undisposable garbage, polluted beaches, and -- above all -- steadily increasing atmospheric pollution from fossil fuel are persuading many political leaders to review their prejudices about nuclear energy.  Americans who want a clean, safe and domestically produced energy source should follow -- especially because all the practical alternatives to nuclear power, present grave hazards to public safety and health.  The perceived risks of nuclear power are grossly overestimated and usually stated without reference to the hazards of other energy sources.  There are, however, two major problems with the present generation of water-cooled reactors.  The light-water reactors, or LWRs as they are known to engineers, used in nearly all the plants in operation or under construction in the United States, place heavy demands on their builders and operators.  The risk they pose to public safety is an accident involving loss of coolant that could lead to the melting of fuel elements and the subsequent release of radioactivity.  The safety systems for these light-water reactors are extremely complicated.  These safety systems require explicit anticipation of all possible forms of failure and they must necessarily rely on probability analysis.  In a world in which probability is not widely understood, such analysis is not reassuring to most of the public.  While these methods lead to margins of safety that are quite acceptable, Americans remain, for the most part, skeptics.  The second problem is that light-water reactors, which are custom-made at the site, cannot be tested in advance to ascertain what would happen in a true disaster.  It is possible, however, to design and build a series of small reactors that could produce the power of a large plant.  These reactors could survive the failure of components without fuel damage and without releasing radioactivity because their fuels can withstand the maximum temperatures possible under the worst of circumstances.  Their design limits the power density of the reactor core as well as the actual size of the core, and exploits natural processes to remove heat and avert fuel damage in the event of a loss of coolant.  Such "passively safe" reactors can be designed to suffer the simultaneous failure of all control and cooling systems without danger to the public.  And their safety can be demonstrated by an actual test: a West German modular reactor has passed such tests three times.  One of the most advanced of these modular reactors is under study at the Massacusetts Institute of Technology.  It is based on the West German reactor that has demonstrated its safety, but adds several technologies in which the U.S. still has a competitive industrial edge.  The hot gas that leaves the reactor is used directly to spin a turbine (based on aerospace designs), which, in turn, drives a small, very high speed generator (based on power electronics).  This combination results in a power generating system that is substantially smaller and more efficient than current LWR systems, which are based on steam turbines and low-speed generators.  By virtue of its inherent or passive safety features, this small, gas-cooled reactor eliminates the complex, active safety systems needed by current LWRs.  The gas turbine eliminates the complex, hard-to-maintain, steam generators common both to nuclear plants and ordinary fossil-fired power plants.  The result is a power plant that produces electricity not only at lower cost than nuclear reactors (an easy target), but that is competitive with the projected cost of next-generation "clean" coal-fired plants.  Power from such coal generators, the Department of Energy calculated in 1986, would cost an average of 5.5 cents per kilowatt hour.  Power from modular reactors can be brought to market for 4.5 cents per kilowatt hour.  These savings can be realized because the new plants will be made to a single, prelicensed design in central factories.  Construction costs are estimated to be less than $1,000 per kilowatt of electricity.  Costs per kwe for the Seabrook reactor in New Hampshire and the Shoreham project in Long Island were more like $5,000 to $6,000, primarily because of long delays and extensive redesign during construction.  Operating costs of traditional nuclear plants are also much higher than those of modular plants would be, because the older type require very large staffs -- 700 people per plant -- to oversee their involuted safety systems.  Modular reactors could offer much more safety with staffs only half as big.  These new plants will not only be much cheaper to build, but the added bonus of high efficiency means there will be less heat to throw away.  The plants will be easier to site because they cause less damage to the local environment.  And, best of all, they will not do harm to the atmosphere.  These new reactors do not eliminate the waste disposal problem, but their ceramic encapsulated fuel does simplify it.  A fuel that can survive unscathed in a reactor core during an accident is obviously securely packaged for disposal under more benign conditions (albeit at the cost of a significant increase in waste volume).  Many of the problems associated with the high temperature achieved by the fuel of the current generation reactors are eliminated and the potential for burial in deep geological sites is enhanced.  This same feature also makes it much more difficult for the discharged fuel to be processed to produce unauthorized nuclear weapons.  Smaller, modular reactors will produce less energy than present reactors do: 100 to 150 megawatts of electrical power output compared with 1,000 to 1,500 megawatts, but this difficulty can be overcome, if necessary, by linking together a number of small, individual power-producing modules.  Since each module would be identical and centrally built, licensing could be standardized and based on full-scale testing of an actual plant.  This is an enormous advantage.  It would allow actual demonstration of the reactors' response to severe and demanding hazards.  With an operating risk that is virtually nil and the production of significantly less radioactivity in the environment than coalfired electric power plants, second-generation nuclear power could be a major source of environmentally sound energy if we would only take advantage of it.  The failure of the government and the nuclear industry to provide leadership in developing a second generation of power plants based on these developments has already cost us dearly.  ---  Mr. Gray is president of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  The summer surge in oil output by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries is beginning to show signs of topping out.  But any production trimming by OPEC now is expected to be too late to prevent world prices of oil, currently $14 to $19 a barrel, from weakening further before rebounding late this year after seasonal increases in petroleum demand.  "Prices will ease a bit and then firm up in the fourth quarter," said Peter Gignoux, manager of the Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. international energy desk in London.  Still, industry and OPEC officials generally agreed that chances are rapidly fading for the type of free-for-all production war that raised the specter of $5 a barrel oil last year.  "It doesn't look like a repeat of last fall," said a senior OPEC official.  These developments are a result largely of the production actions -- and perceived plans -- of two major members of OPEC.  The two members, Saudi Arabia and Kuwait, were leaders of opposing factions at the acrimonious June OPEC meeting.  The outcome of the June meeting was a second-half production ceiling of 19.5 million barrels a day for all 13 members.  Kuwait refused, however, to accept its quota of 1.1 million barrels a day and has been producing as much as 1.8 million barrels since.  Also, most other OPEC members with spare output capacity are exceeding their quotas.  The result since June has been a surge of nearly one million barrels a day in production, putting current output close to 22 million barrels a day.  Although that is in line with OPEC's forecast of demand for its oil in the fourth quarter, it is well ahead of most projections for the third quarter.  And it is within one million barrels of the 1988 peak of some 23 million barrels a day.  But Saudi Arabia has remained aloof from this summer's pumping race.  It has stuck relatively near its second-half quota of nearly 4.8 million barrels a day.  This is a surprise to many because last year the OPEC kingpin was quick to retaliate against production excesses by others by opening its own valves.  The kingdom, in fact, led the output expansion in last year's second half by stepping up its own output to some seven million barrels a day at one point.  Many OPEC watchers maintain that the Saudis have little choice except to resume the unwanted role of swing producer at the moment, holding down their own output even though others have increased production.  That is partly because Kuwait, which has a large refining and marketing network abroad, would prefer lower crude oil prices and thus wouldn't be hurt by a big jump in Saudi output.  "For the Saudis, opening the valves would be a lose-lose situation," said a Houston-based oil consultant.  Even as it becomes unlikely that the Saudis will make any significant changes in their production schedules, for the moment at least, Sheik Ali Khalifa Al-Sabah, Kuwait's oil minister, is reaffirming plans to cut Kuwaiti output.  This week, before meeting with Hisham Nazer, his Saudi counterpart, Sheik Ali announced that he is reducing production to the level he had previously promised -- 1,350,000 barrels a day.  There is skepticism among monitors of OPEC output as to the depths of the cuts the Kuwaiti oil minister will make.  But most agreed that Kuwait's oil production should drop.  Sheik Ali "has shown the stick; now he will want to use the carrot," said Bahman Karbassioun, a Vienna, Austria-based consultant on OPEC affairs.  David Zornow, a member of the three-lawyer prosecution team in the trial of Oliver North, will join the New York firm of Skadden, Arps, Meagher & Flom as a partner specializing in white-collar criminal defense.  Mr. Zornow, 34 years old, was formerly an assistant U.S. Attorney in Manhattan. . . .  Erika Z. Jones, former chief counsel to the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration of the U.S. Department of Transportation, will join the Washington, D.C., office of Mayer, Brown & Platt Aug. 21.  Ms. Jones, 33, will be of counsel in the Chicago-based firm's government affairs department. . . .  Donald A. Carr, former acting assistant U.S. attorney general with the land and natural resources division of the Justice Department, will join the Washington office of Winthrop, Stimson, Putnam & Roberts.  Mr. Carr, 40, will specialize in environmental law as counsel to the New York-based firm.  Allen H. Keough, technical director of Metallized Products Inc., Winchester, Mass., was named a director of this maker of thermal processing equipment increasing the board membership to five.  Mary Beth Donnelly was elected a vice president of this mining company.  Mrs. Donnelly, 37 years old, remains director of government relations.  Is USX Corp. tilting at steel mills?  The giant steelmaker recently fed caviar and filet mignon to executives from 300 of its biggest suppliers to sell them on the virtues of relocating in Gary, Ind., a down-and-out rust belt city.  USX, which buys nearly $1 billion in products annually for its flagship plant in Gary, has embraced the just-in-time strategy of keeping supply inventories low.  Now it is trying to make the most of the strategy by attracting more vendors to Gary.  The dinner was part of a two-day, $250,000 courtship toward that end.  Similar efforts to woo suppliers are likely throughout the industry.  Faced with softening demand and prices, growing competition from minimills and the prospect of losing import quotas in 1992, steelmakers are scrambling for ways to cut costs and stay competitive.  Persuading suppliers to relocate near their big plants gives steel companies quicker access to parts and materials, letting them cut inventory costs and adapt more quickly to changes in customer demand.  "The closer they can get suppliers, who can hold inventory and ship several times a day, the better off companies like USX will be," says Christopher Plummer, an analyst with WEFA Group, an economics research group in Bala Cynwyd, Pa.  Mr. Plummer adds that several major steelmakers have approached suppliers trying to get them to locate facilities closer to major mills.  Persuading suppliers to relocate to Gary takes considerable salesmanship.  In fact, much of USX's wooing took place outside Gary: The elaborate dinner promoting Gary was held in neighboring Merrillville, where the suppliers also stayed.  Gary, made famous decades ago by a lisping Ron Howard in "The Music Man," has since been made infamous by crime and unemployment.  Last year, it was tagged the most stressful city in the nation by a quality-of-life group.  Unlike the relatively rural areas where Japanese auto makers have attracted suppliers, Gary is a union town, which may make many vendors leery about labor costs.  So the steelmaker is stressing the positive and sparing little expense.  At its recent seminar, suppliers' executives viewed videos, commissioned for the event, highlighting Gary's benefits.  Among these: proximity to Chicago and Lake Michigan ports, a developed transportation system and a skilled work force.  USX sought to hammer home the message that being close to its Gary operations would let suppliers cement their relationships with a stronger company.  USX even unwittingly promoted some of its rivals, noting that suppliers in Gary would be better positioned to serve the entire region, which includes mills owned by Inland Steel Industries Inc. and LTV Corp. an ingot's throw away.  "Developing {suppliers'} understanding of our competitive needs is absolutely critical to the future of our Gary operations," says Bruce Haines, a vice president of purchasing and traffic for USX's steel division.  He told the assembled suppliers that many of their smaller competitors had taken advantage of a recent upturn in steel to locate operations in Gary and found it "a good place to do business."  The steel industry has rebounded in recent years from the depths of its early-'80s recession, but employment at USX's Gary works is never expected to approach the 1960s peak of 26,000.  The plant employs just 7,800 workers, even though it is USX's crown jewel, having received billions in capital improvements.  Therein lies Gary's problem, according to Mayor Thomas V. Barnes, who urged USX to make its appeal.  "The bottom line is jobs -- lost jobs," he says.  He puts the city's unemployment rate at close to 11%.  But reaction to USX's appeal was, at best, muted.  "My personal feeling is that most people here will take a wait-and-see attitude," says Robert Yoder, a territory manager for Asbury Graphite Mills in Asbury, N.J. "No one is going to immediately pull out their checkbook."  Moreover, Mr. Yoder wonders whether it makes sense to build a plant now, with the steel industry bracing for a downturn and facing the possible loss of import quotas.  At the same time, minimills are sprouting in the South and West, which may prove to be better places for suppliers to expand than the Midwest.  But USX's pitch makes sense to Steven Riordan, a vice president at Englewood Electric.  The Chicago electronic-parts distributor already has operations in Gary and was considering expanding them.  "Seeing this level of commitment only reinforces a decision to do more here," he says.  USX has some help promoting Gary from local businesses.  Northern Indiana Public Service Co., which paid part of the tab for the $250,000, two-day seminar, is offering new industrial customers advertising assistance and rebates representing up to a 32% savings on the utility's rates over five years.  Bruce Dahltorp, president of Gainer Corp., a bank that also helped pay for the seminar, told the group on behalf of a consortium of 15 lenders with $4.5 billion in assets: "We have money to lend, and we want to lend it to you."  Bowed by the weight of centuries he leans  Upon his hoe and gazes on the ground,  The emptiness of ages in his face  And on his back the burdens of the world.  Amid the tumult in China and the Soviet Union we observe this year the 90th anniversary of a poem that was acclaimed as "the battle-cry of the next thousand years."  The author was Edwin Markham, a hitherto undistinguished poet who became famous when Bailey Millard, the editor of the San Francisco Examiner, accepted "The Man With the Hoe" for publication in 1899 and it was immediately reprinted all over the world.  The poem was inspired by Jean Francois Millet's famous painting of the same name, and it became a prophecy, when Markham ended it with these lines:  O masters, lords and rulers in all lands  How will the future reckon with this man?  How answer his brute questions in that hour  When whirlwinds of rebellion shake all shores?  How will it be with kingdoms and with kings --  With those who shaped him to the thing he is  When this dumb terror shall rise to judge the world,  After the silence of the centuries?  Markham was born in Oregon but moved to California with his parents at the age of five and was a member of the first graduating class at San Jose Normal School (now San Jose State University) in 1872.  He became a school principal and superintendent, all the while sending his poems to California papers.  But it was when "The Man With the Hoe" caught the mood of the time that he received world-wide acclaim.  After its appearance he moved to New York to be near the center of the publishing world.  He spent the rest of his life writing and reciting his poems.  One other work that received critical approval almost equal to that for "The Man With the Hoe" was "Lincoln, Man of the People."  Markham died in 1940 at the age of 88.  "The Man With the Hoe" cannot be said to have had the impact of the "Communist Manifesto" of Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, but it did precede the Russian Revolution of 1917, which seemed to answer the question Markham posed in the poem's closing lines.  Today the communist world is in disarray -- not because of the image of the working man as "stolid and stunned, a brother to the ox," but arguably because of the television images it sees of plenty in the capitalist countries -- of supermarkets with overflowing shelves, of the working class in shiny new automobiles -- and because the students it has sent abroad to bring back new technology have seen these things and have experienced a free society and can never again be satisfied with the old ways.  In the West we tend to view these signs with hope, suggesting that they mean more future customers, but are these stirrings the beginnings of stronger societies that will make China and the Soviet Union even more formidable adversaries than in the past?  If we finally put aside differences over ideology, will it be only to engage in an even fiercer competition for diminishing resources?  Down all the caverns of Hell to their last gulf  There is no shape more terrible than this --  More tongued with censure of the world's blind greed --  More filled with signs and portents of the soul  More packt with danger to the universe . . .  Through this dread shape humanity betrayed . . .  Cries protest to the Judges of the World,  A protest that is also prophecy.  The prophecy began to come true in the aftermath of World War I, but the story is not over.  ---  Mr. Barrett is a retired columnist for the San Jose Mercury News and a freelance writer.  Boots Co. PLC, a British pharmaceutical retailer that has made a hostile #900 million ($1.42 billion) bid for Ward White PLC, said it raised its control of the company's ordinary shares to 29.96% from 12.5%.  In its latest disclosure, Boots also said in London that it now commands 23.25% of Ward White's convertible preference shares and that its offer will end Tuesday.  Ward White, a U.K. retailer that has fiercely resisted Boots's approach, last week ruled out the possibility of a higher rescue offer being made for the company.  Ciba-Geigy AG, a major Swiss chemical and pharmaceutical company, posted a first-half profit increase of 23% to 1.38 billion Swiss francs ($827.5 million) from 1.12 billion francs a year earlier.  The company said it doesn't expect second-half sales to match those for the first half, a previously reported 11.15 billion francs, up 23% from 9.055 billion francs a year earlier.  But it estimated net income for all of 1989 will be 1.5 billion francs, up 13% from 1.32 billion francs in 1988.  Ciba-Geigy said its cash flow, an important barometer for the performance of Swiss companies, rose 22% to 1.92 billion francs in the first half from 1.57 billion francs a year earlier.  Analysts said Ciba-Geigy's first-half profit was within expectations, though at the lower end of a 20% to 30% range.  Most analysts viewed the company's forecast for 1989 profit as conservative, and are looking for something closer to its 20% jump in 1988 profit to 1.33 billion francs.  D. Dale Browning, president of Colorado National Bank of Denver, was elected to the board of this bank holding company, increasing board membership to 12.  A seat on the Chicago Board of Trade was sold yesterday for $340,000, unchanged from the previous sale Monday.  Seats currently are quoted at $340,000 bid, $350,000 asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $550,000, paid Aug. 31, 1987.  Richard Evans, 47 years old, will become chief executive officer of this British aerospace concern at year end, succeeding Sir Raymond Lygo, who is retiring.  Mr. Evans previously was chairman of the group's defense companies.  Strauss Zelnick was named president and chief operating officer of Fox Film Corp., a subsidiary of Rupert Murdoch's News Corp.'s Fox Inc. unit that oversees movie production for the entertainment concern.  Mr. Zelnick, 32 years old, joins Fox in the newly-created position where he will operate as one of three Fox Film presidents.  He will oversee the business affairs and operational aspects of Fox Film.  Mr. Zelnick previously worked as president and chief operating officer of Stamford, Conn.-based Vestron Inc., which publishes prerecorded videocassettes.  John Holroyd, 45 years old, was appointed head of the chairman and chief executive's office of this energy concern.  Dennis Hearn, 59 years old, was appointed group managing director of this hotel group, a new position.  He also was named deputy chief executive officer.  When I go back to where I grew up in southern Ireland, the last 10 miles along the road from Cork airport take me through the lush farmlands stretching between the village of Killeagh and the ancient town of Youghal.  But there was nothing ancient about the big signs planted in the fields when I drove through the other day: "COW MILK NOT DOW MILK" and "AGENT ORANGE WORKS -- ASK MERRELL DOW."  What was this?  All I could see were cows in the pastures that run down to Youghal Bay.  I soon found out.  Unless local protest forces a climb-down, that idyllic vista will soon be interrupted by a chemical factory pumping 100,000 gallons of treated effluent into the Womanagh river every day, and by an incinerator chimney 80 feet high.  When they first planned this project, officials at Merrell Dow, or its parent, Dow Chemical, must have felt like foxes being graciously ushered into the chicken coop and told to keep the eggs warm.  A number of years ago an Irish state body, the Industrial Development Authority, decided that the best thing for an area making most of its money off tourism, agriculture and fishing would be to have international pharmaceutical companies settle around Cork harbor.  Many duly did so, lured by generous tax breaks and other incentives.  But then the IDA decided to spend $150 million of taxpayer money to build a park for pharmaceutical companies at Ringaskiddy, near Cork -- a colossal flop.  And now, a lot of children in the area around the existing companies are coming down with illnesses from toxic emissions and the marine life is beginning to mutate.  Up to now, regulation by the Cork County Council has been lax, but even so the court actions have started and a couple of companies -- Penn Chemicals and Angus Fine Chemicals -- have been prosecuted for ignoring anti-pollution guidelines.  So the bureaucrats of the IDA, desperate for some sort of feather to stick in their caps, were delighted that Merrell Dow, after shunning Ringaskiddy, proposed investing $90 million or so in a factory and incinerator amid the meadows of the Womanagh to produce, among other things, the antihistamine Terfenadine.  They told the company they had no problem with the proposal and that no local opposition need be expected.  There's a bungalow close to where Merrell Dow wants to build its plant.  Once upon a time, the owners of this bungalow were refused permission to build dormers out from the roof, as these would be out of key with the cottage's style and thus would reduce the rural allure of this tourist-rich vista.  Oddly, the envisaged chimney and the daily discharge of effluent into some of the most renowned salmon waters in Europe perturbed the authorities less.  Irksome procedures such as baseline studies to determine environmental impact were put aside.  The Cork County Council issued planning permission in six weeks flat. (It should be added that the Irish national planning authority, on Bord Planeala, which turned down an appeal from farmers against the council's OK to Merrell Dow, is now the object of a major investigation of corruption in two cases elsewhere in Ireland.)  But there was a hitch.  The IDA could not deliver on its promise that there would be no local trouble.  The citizens of east Cork and west Waterford, most of all the dairy farmers along the Womanagh, took a keener interest in their prospective neighbor.  Soon such unpleasant episodes on the curriculum vitae of Dow Chemical as its manufacture of Agent Orange and its refusal in the early '80s to let the Environmental Protection Agency inspect its Midland plant in Michigan for dioxin contamination became common currency in this bit of Ireland, as did the distribution by Richardson-Merrell (from which Merrell Dow partly sprang) of thalidomide.  This June, the EPA named 13 Dow factories in connection with the release of carcinogens into the atmosphere.  In three cases the contaminant was methylene chloride, a chemical that would be used at the Killeagh factory.  The farmers around Killeagh note that in summer there's not much water in the Womanagh, so the stream could scarcely absorb 100,000 gallons of effluent a day; a ditch of industrial sewage would pass through their dairy lands.  In winter the Womanagh backs up and floods these same fields; if the factory were running, the waste water from Terfenadine production, which is "contraindicated" for young children and pregnant women, would be dumped on the grass and thus into the milk and butter consumed in the region.  Tidal patterns in Youghal Bay would send the effluent up the tidal Blackwater and along the coast into waters to which the Irish tourist board spends a great deal of money each year to lure anglers and tourists.  Merrell Dow's people on the spot have not exactly helped their cause.  Thus far the company has refused to divulge details about the incinerator capable of sending dioxins across a large stretch of the southern Irish coastline.  A glossy brochure sent to every household in Youghal assuring the populace that the plant would have no unhealthful effects sent suspicions soaring that the reverse was in fact the case.  Maeve Clark, a spokeswoman for the company based in Cork, tells me that it plans to start building next month even though appeals against the project are planned for Irish and European courts.  This threat to pre-empt due process has particularly outraged organizations opposing the project.  The Merrell Dow affair has become a political mine field too.  For a long time the IDA and Merrell Dow claimed that opposition was confined to a few farmers and enviro-cranks.  Then a survey commissioned from the foremost Irish polling organization, MRBI, showed that the population of the area, including Killeagh itself, was against the project by a margin of 2 to 1.  In the midst of the recent election, Prime Minister Charles Haughey said the project would not go ahead unless all parties, including local residents, were satisfied about safety and health precautions.  If Merrell Dow pushes ahead, there's a very strong possibility that the resistance to the project could turn ugly.  Many think that in the end Mr. Haughey will urge Merrell Dow to go elsewhere.  One of the most interesting features in the battle is the fierce local opposition.  This is a poor area in which unemployment is high and emigration endemic.  But with Merrell Dow the IDA can no longer plant any company down on the landscape under the slogan "Jobs at any cost, growth at any price."  In fact, a company official has conceded that there could be just six jobs for common laborers from Youghal.  A study by Ireland's Economic Social Research Institute has just shown that if the present rising curve of profit repatriation by multinationals based here continues, the IDA's tax treats for corporate guests will produce no net benefit to the economy.  This study recommends investment in indigenous resource-based industries.  Companies like Merrell Dow, hoping to hunker down peacefully in Third World Ireland, are finding that even poor people want to breathe clean air and swim in untroubled waters.  ---  Mr. Cockburn is a columnist for The Nation and the LA Weekly.  Ryland Group Inc. said its board approved the creation of an employee stock ownership plan consisting of about $40 million of convertible preferred shares.  At the end of the 10-year allocation period, employees will own about 10% of the home-building and real estate-finance company.  The shares will be issued Sept. 15, the company said.  Ryland said it will temporarily provide funds for the ESOP to purchase the shares, but the company intends to seek third-party financing over the next two months.  Ryland also said that it will buy back as many as 1.8 million common shares to offset the diluting effect of future conversion of the preferred shares.  Fred E. Trotter, a trustee of the Hawaiian estate of James Campbell and a former sugar industry executive, was named a director of this drug-store operator, filling a board vacancy.  There are no individual heroes in this account of a juicy slice of American history, not even Washington, Jefferson, Madison or Jackson.  Its only hero is the American people, who are celebrated with ardor in rich and dense detail.  The merit of Oscar and Lilian Handlin's "Liberty in Expansion: 1760-1850" (Harper & Row, 481 pages, $25.95) is that it treats the grand theme of freedom in American history by keeping it close to the earth of everyday living.  The present book is the second of their planned four-volume history of "Liberty in America: 1600 to the Present," an ambitious project that bears witness to the American romance with freedom over the centuries.  The Handlins avoid grand theory and theorists.  Liberty, they say, does not lie in concepts, thinkers or leaders, but in the experience of the people as they pursue the conditions of a good life.  Out of this pursuit, liberty has emerged, almost as an afterthought.  The theme of migration, with its ethnicities and pluralisms, is the thread running through the lifelong work of the senior author, Oscar Handlin -- all the way from his early "Boston's Immigrants" (1941) and his Pulitzer-winning "The Uprooted" (1951).  The present series fuses that theme with the story of liberty.  I must add that no other major historian has aimed so persistently at a pointillism that turns the specific Whitmanesque points of light into a general picture of America.  The best way to read "Liberty in Expansion" is to start, perversely, with the 15-page epilogue in which the authors explain their method with a touch of belligerence.  To study a "vast population . . . without obscuring their identities," they say, don't start with a "paradigm or model" of your own.  Examine the "residues," "detritus" and "shards" left behind -- the tracts, pamphlets, newspapers, public records, letters, diaries, memoirs, advertisements, orations.  After a time "contours" will appear, then "larger structures."  Don't impose the patterns.  Let the patterns emerge.  Flee dualisms and dichotomies such as ideologies and class, consensus and conflict, frontier and imperialism, Hamilton and Jefferson, Republicans and Federalists, Democrats and Whigs, agrarian and mercantile.  And don't lose yourself in a search for foreign sources of influence, whether John Locke or David Hume.  The influences are likely to be home-grown, coming out of the American grain.  This is an appealing form of historical populism in its literal sense.  The danger is that it can become a cult of the people, like Carl Sandburg's effusive "The People, Yes."  Surely it asks too much of the "shards" of history, embedded in the mounds of raw evidence, to form their own pattern and to offer not only text and context for interpretation, but also the interpretation itself.  The result is a radical dissolvent of traditional history as narrative.  There is no sequential account of the American Revolution here.  The experience of the Revolution becomes a discipline in liberty and fortitude in the face of scarcities, confusions and suffering.  We get no account of Washington and his generals but we get the pithy conclusion, from the evidence, that the Revolution "created something like a General Will."  The Constitution offers a similar test.  Instead of seeing it as an act of creation by a remarkable group of framers, drawing on great 18th-century philosophers, the authors see only a group of "practical men" -- lawyers, merchants, planters -- moved by a fear of disorder in their daily lives, determined to create a structure of order.  The resulting "social contract" was not only in the document and its judicial interpretations, but in the daily lives of nameless men.  This is the mood and method the authors apply as well to the first half of the new century.  We get very little about Jackson, Clay, Calhoun and Webster -- the "Bigs" -- and much about the threat of disorder, the behavior of juries, and the treatment of two "enclaves" -- of the slaves and of Indians, who were pushed out of their forests and life ways by intolerance and treachery.  We get the building of an infrastructure of toll roads, canals and railroads because they met the needs of the people.  We get the greeds and cruelties, the tinkering, inventing and creating, the sectional compromises and the shadows that loomed beyond the compromises.  This is rich stuff.  Yet I wish the Handlins -- so good at the interpretations that somehow emerge -- had given us more of them.  They scorn the emphasis of historians on elites, but willy-nilly, their pages show plenty of talented and passionate Americans -- abolitionists, professional politicians, newspaper editors, preachers, feminists -- who keep pushing through the humdrum of life to wield a disproportionate influence on events.  The vignettes they give us of extraordinary people -- Samuel Adams, Martin Van Buren, the black freeman Frederick Douglass, the preacher James F. Clarke, the Indian warrior Tecumseh -- are so sharp in their brevity as to warrant more expansive treatment.  In their anti-Carlylean rejection of the "Bigs," the authors fall into a dichotomy trap of their own, an either/or between the "people" and the creative individual shapers of American history, the Madisons and Emersons.  This is one area in which they should have given us a both/and.  It is in the dialogue between the people and their leaders that liberty is pursued and achieved.  Like God, liberty is in the details.  --- Mr. Lerner is a writer and historian living in New York.  William B. Eagleson Jr., chairman of Grant Street National Bank and chairman emeritus of Mellon Bank Corp., and John W. Eckman, a former chairman of Rorer Group Inc. and now its executive committee chairman, were elected directors of this bank holding company, increasing board membership to 26.  Buyers fishing for a profitable food company with a solid brand name have netted Bumble Bee Seafoods several times in recent years, but they always seem to throw it back.  Grand Metropolitan PLC's Pillsbury unit announced a definitive agreement to sell Bumble Bee and a small manufacturing facility for $269 million to an affiliate of Thailand's Unicord Ltd., marking the third time the seafood concern has changed hands in four years.  Pillsbury, which aquired Bumble Bee just a year ago, was itself acquired by Grand Met, London, a few months later.  Yesterday's agreement didn't come as a surprise; Pillsbury put its Van de Kamp's Frozen Seafoods and Bumble Bee units on the block in May after its parent decided they didn't fit with core operations.  The Bumble Bee transaction, which is expected to close in mid-September, represents the largest U.S. acquisition ever for a Thai concern, according to Sutro & Co., the investment banker that represented the buyers.  Last week, Pillsbury agreed to sell Van de Kamp's to Whitman Corp. of Chicago for $140 million.  Bumble Bee's managers bought the operation from Castle & Cooke Inc. in 1985, paying $60 million for a company whose outlook Castle & Cooke considered "unpromising."  Three years later, when the stock-market crash damped prospects for taking a revitalized Bumble Bee public, the managers sold it to Pillsbury for $242 million.  One beneficiary of Bumble Bee's frequent changes in ownership is Sutro, which has represented one side or another in all three deals.  Says an official of the San Francisco firm: "The relationship with Bumble Bee has been a profitable one."  Sutro represented the management team that carried out the 1985 leveraged buy-out, and it handled their sale of the company to Pillsbury.  Bumble Bee, which had 1988 sales of $284 million, is based in San Diego, but most of its 2,800 workers are at its facility in Mayaguez, Puerto Rico.  Its new owner, Uni Group Inc., is an investment concern controlled by Unicord's 38-year-old majority shareholder, Dumri Konuntakiet.  David Wolf, general counsel and a director of this seller of microcomputer systems, was named chief operating officer, effective in late September, succeeding Francis Bryant, who left the company by mutual agreement in July after the expiration of his employment contract.  Mr. Wolf will resign as senior partner of Weiss, Angoff, Coltin, Koski & Wolf, a Boston law firm.  The Food and Drug Administration, stung by revelations of fraud in the generic-drug industry, has begun collecting samples of the most heavily used generic drugs for testing in a nationwide survey of product quality.  The survey was prompted in part by the admission of two generic-drug companies that they submitted falsified data to the agency, according to FDA officials.  In addition, there is growing concern at the beleaguered agency that some generic-drug makers may be using unsound manufacturing practices that reduce the effectiveness of their drugs.  Samples of various versions of the 30 top generic drugs, representing about 75% of the industry's $5.1 billion in sales, will be tested for chemical stability and potency, among other things.  The agency also will check the ingredients of each product against its label and the prescription drug that it duplicates.  "This is an attempt to find out if the problem is broader than what we've already seen," said one official.  "We will be picking up exactly what the consumer is buying."  In some cases, consumers can choose among as many as 15 generic versions of a brand-name prescription drug.  "We aren't picking on any particular manufacturer," said Irene Caro, acting FDA district director in Los Angeles.  "We are just selecting a range of manufacturers who are making these {generic} products."  The survey, ordered by Ronald Chesemore, acting associate FDA commissioner for regulatory affairs, is an important element in a larger Bush administration plan to strengthen FDA monitoring of the generic-drug industry and to bolster public confidence in generic products.  Health and Human Services Secretary Louis Sullivan is expected within the next few days to announce a reorganization at the FDA that will expand and elevate the agency's generic-drug office, putting it on the same level as the two brand-name drug divisions.  A wave of new generic-drug applications has swamped the generic-drug staff of 80, and Mr. Sullivan's plan is expected to call for a threefold increase in the division's manpower.  Mr. Sullivan and FDA Commissioner Frank Young are facing what many call the worst political crisis in the agency's history.  Three generic-drug reviewers already have pleaded guilty to accepting thousands of dollars in illegal gratuities from companies seeking approval for new generic drugs, and Dr. Young has said he expects more indictments in the agency's ranks.  One generic-drug maker, Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc., Springfield Gardens, N.Y., has admitted to testing Dyazide, a brand-name blood-pressure drug, and submitting the results under Vitarine's own name to win FDA approval for its generic version.  A second company, Par Pharmaceuticals Inc. of Spring Valley, N.Y., also has admitted filing false information with the agency.  Every FDA district is taking part in the survey of the top 30 generic drugs.  Some districts began collecting samples early this week from drug warehouses and drug repackers, which specialize in bottling generic drugs for drug-store chains.  FDA officials said that the sampling will take one week and that the laboratory testing will take six to eight weeks.  The test results, said Ms. Caro in Los Angeles, will "give us a picture of the quality of what's out there."  Almost every generic drug maker in the U.S. will be covered in the survey, an agency official added.  One objective of the study is to detect signs of unacceptable manufacturing processes.  The FDA recently conducted a round of plant inspections at 11 generic-drug companies.  Earlier this month, the agency revoked recent drug approvals after uncovering "significant manufacturing problems" at Par Pharmaceutical and American Therapeutics Inc., Bohemia, N.Y.  The agency has been under fire from Democratic Rep. John Dingell of Michigan and other congressional critics for alleged regulatory lapses.  The FDA went ahead with the revocations despite its initial doubts about its legal authority to take such action.  The FDA is trying to shake the widely held perception that it is too cosy with the industry it regulates and that it relies too much on the integrity of generic-drug makers.  The recent plant inspections and now the product-quality survey are evidence that FDA officials no longer intend to rely so heavily on the so-called honor system.  One of their chief concerns is that manufacturers may substitute some ingredients in their generic drugs without FDA approval.  A switch in coloring agents, for example, could alter the chemical stability of a drug and impair its effectiveness.  Among President Bush's high-level appointments, Robert Fiske seemed unlikely to ignite controversy.  A respected New York corporate lawyer, Mr. Fiske had also handled a string of celebrated criminal cases as U.S. attorney for New York and seemed ideally qualified for the No. 2 job in the Justice Department.  He seemed an equally eminent choice by Republican standards.  He was appointed U.S. attorney by a Republican president, Gerald Ford.  More recently, he had thrown his support behind two of the conservative, controversial favorites that President Reagan had nominated to the federal bench, Daniel Manion and James Buckley.  But Mr. Fiske won't be working in the Bush administration.  His selection triggered intense opposition in Congress and was doomed before the White House had a chance to formally submit his nomination.  Mr. Fiske wasn't ambushed by liberals, or even Democrats.  He was done in by conservative members of his own party.  His crime?  He once was chairman of the American Bar Association's judicial nominations panel, which conservative activists have long suspected of torpedoing their candidates.  Worse, he acknowledged that his ABA committee sounded out liberal groups about potential judicial appointees during the Reagan years.  Already aroused, the conservative activists began an investigation and found Mr. Fiske had contributed $1,000 to the campaign of a Democratic Senate candidate in Vermont.  No matter that the Vermont candidate was an old friend who lost the race in any event, and the contribution probably reflected friendship more than ideology.  Mr. Fiske spent three months in a political nether world in which he never got a formal chance to answer charges.  Conservative Senators were energized, the White House was put on notice, and the nomination died.  Such are the humiliations of seeking political appointments these days.  Even for well-respected nominees, the privilege of public service now includes not only the inspection of Congress and the scrutiny of the press, but the possibility of attack by ideological groups -- from within their own party.  Mr. Fiske's experience is a case study of how single-minded political activists can distort Washington's nomination-and-confirmation process.  Robert Fulton, an Oklahoma state official, is another such casualty.  Fearing that he wouldn't oppose abortion aggressively enough, well-organized activists ignored the strong GOP credentials of Mr. Fulton, blocking him from a top post in the Department of Health and Human Services.  On grounds that were tenuous at best, anti-abortion groups seized on Mr. Fulton as the embodiment of their concern that President Bush and HHS Secretary Louis Sullivan might not be tough enough on abortion.  At one point, Mr. Fulton was told by Colorado Republican Sen. William Armstrong: "They are suspicious of Bush.  They totally distrust Sullivan.  And you, Fulton, have become their enemy."  Even though Democrats rallied to oppose Sen. John Tower, it was a staunch conservative, Paul Weyrich, who first raised ethical objections to Mr. Tower's nomination as secretary of defense.  Conservatives aren't the only groups that wage these fights, of course, and they don't win every one.  But they have a surprising degree of leverage in what is generally perceived as a moderate Republican administration.  When conservatives support a nominee, the White House can count on strong backing.  And President Bush needs the support of conservative Republicans in Congress -- especially powerful senators like Strom Thurmond -- on a broad range of issues.  So when conservatives attack a nominee, even for reasons that seem unfounded, the White House may have to quietly back off.  Conservatives appear to have an ally in John Sununu, the White House chief of staff and President Bush's most powerful aide.  Mr. Sununu played a key role in derailing the Fiske and Fulton nominations despite active support from their cabinet sponsors.  Mr. Sununu's influence was evident in his successful promotion of Richard C. Breeden, selected by Mr. Bush to be chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, and Mr. Sununu's backing may help protect Mr. Breeden from conservative attack.  Mr. Sununu plays down the role of ideology in the Fiske and Fulton setbacks.  "The reason they never got to the president is that they had issues involving qualifications and performance that prevented them from being the best choice for the president," he says.  Nowhere have conservatives better illustrated their ability to overrule the administration than in the fight over Mr. Fiske, a well-known and respected partner in the Manhattan law firm of Davis Polk & Wardwell.  Word began seeping around Washington last March that Attorney General Dick Thornburgh had asked the White House to name Mr. Fiske his top deputy.  Mr. Fiske's name "obviously rang a bell with me and many others" in the conservative movement, says Paul Kamenar of the Washington Legal Foundation, who spearheaded the Fiske attack.  As the chairman of the ABA's 15-member judicial nominations panel from 1984-87, Mr. Fiske had acknowledged that as part of an established panel practice, he sometimes shared the names of prospective nominees with a liberal legal group to elicit reactions to the candidates' records on women's and minority issues.  Mr. Kamenar filed suit to force the ABA panel to share the names of prospective judicial nominees with conservative groups as well.  The committee then stopped disclosing the names of potential nominees altogether.  Conservatives acknowledge that those specific complaints mattered less than the fact that Mr. Fiske symbolized a part of the legal establishment that conservatives detest.  "The ABA judicial selection committee is just absolutely anathema to conservatives in this town," says Daniel Casey, executive director of the American Conservative Union.  The opposition was set in motion largely by Mr. Kamenar, a lawyer who works full-time as a conservative activist.  Among other activities, he led a network of Washington conservatives that played a key role in helping the Reagan Justice Department under Edwin Meese locate and recruit conservatives as judicial nominees, some of whom then ran into trouble with Mr. Fiske's ABA committee.  Mr. Kamenar contacted aides to Republican Senators Gordon Humphrey of New Hampshire and Charles Grassley of Iowa, who had previously complained about the ABA's role in judicial nominations.  "My fax machine was smoking," says Mr. Kamenar.  Soon, the net of conservative opposition widened through the 721 Group, a little-known umbrella organization that was active in the fight over the Supreme Court nomination of conservative jurist Robert Bork.  The group discussed its opposition to Mr. Fiske at a spring meeting.  Conservatives began looking for more damaging material on Mr. Fiske and uncovered a 1970s Internal Revenue Service investigation of a land transaction.  But it seemed so routine, resulting in an assessment of $1,000, that it never became much of a factor.  Then Mr. Kamenar, acting on a hunch, ran a computer check at the Federal Election Commission and uncovered Mr. Fiske's contribution to the unsuccessful Democratic senate candidate.  This revelation helped sway GOP partisans in the White House and the Senate who wondered why Mr. Fiske wasn't loyal enough to resist making contributions to a Democrat.  In April Sen. Humphrey sent a letter of concern to President Bush.  Then a key conservative, Sen. Malcolm Wallop of Wyoming, distributed a letter to Mr. Bush opposing the nomination to a group of conservative senators.  Crucially, South Carolina Sen. Thurmond -- the ranking Republican on the Judiciary Committee, which would vote on the Fiske nomination -- signed, in part because he feared continuing conservative opposition would be divisive for congressional Republicans.  He was so worked up that he pounded on the table and urged others to sign, conservative activists say.  Ultimately, 14 senators signed the June 14 letter.  At about the same time, Sen. Wallop also carried the argument personally to Mr. Bush during a flight aboard Air Force One with the president, who was traveling to Yellowstone Park to make a speech.  But Mr. Bush seemed preoccupied with other concerns; back in Washington several days later, reading a line inserted in a speech by an aide, Mr. Bush said he looked forward to Mr. Fiske's arrival.  Finally, Mr. Fiske and his supporters at the Justice Department asked Senate Majority Leader Robert Dole to bring together in his office Mr. Fiske and his conservative opponents.  Sen. Thurmond stood up at the outset and declared that Mr. Fiske's nomination wasn't good for Mr. Bush or the nation and that he should withdraw it, staffers say.  Further discussion was futile.  With Mr. Fiske on the ropes, a group of about 20 conservative activists gathered for a previously scheduled meeting at the White House on June 26 and used the opportunity to complain to Mr. Sununu.  He assured them the White House would follow the lead of Sen. Thurmond because of his position as party leader on the Judiciary Committee, says an activist who was there.  That afternoon, at a private meeting with the president, according to an aide, Sen. Thurmond said of the Fiske nomination, "Don't send it up.  Period."  White House aides seemed less concerned about the merits of Mr. Fiske's appointment than the political fallout.  They say Sen. Thurmond indicated that Republican conservatives were so agitated that they would launch a filibuster to block the nomination, which would embarrass Mr. Fiske and the administration and could ruin the White House's relations with Sen. Thurmond and his committee, which will act on pending and future judicial appointees.  Though the White House didn't order Mr. Fiske to give up, he got the message.  On July 6, Mr. Fiske sent Mr. Thornburgh a letter withdrawing his name from consideration.  In his letter Mr. Fiske deplored the "inaccurate reports" of his role on the ABA committee; beyond that, he declines to comment.  The effort to block Mr. Fulton from becoming the head of the Family Support Administration in HHS followed much the same course -- from conservative interest groups, to Senate staffers and their GOP bosses, to a White House anxious not to offend them.  The primary charge against Mr. Fulton was that in 1983, when he was director of the Oklahoma department of human services, he had failed to react vigorously to a report that an Oklahoma hospital had allowed 24 severely handicapped infants to die without surgery.  Mr. Fulton strongly denied the charge.  He noted that the deaths had occurred before he became human-services chief and that he had changed the state's system for dealing with handicapped infants, sharply reducing the death rate.  Nonetheless, and even though handicapped infant mortality isn't an abortion issue per se, anti-abortion groups began to mobilize against Mr. Fulton, a recognized welfare expert, shortly after Dr. Sullivan picked him in February to run federal welfare programs.  "From then on the White House appeared to be supercautious," Mr. Fulton says.  He met with White House officials in early March to answer questions about his record.  At their suggestion, Mr. Fulton met with officials of the National Right to Life Committee to refute the charges against him, but to no avail.  On April 18, Dr. Sullivan met with President Bush, Mr. Sununu and others.  In response to a comment about conservative opposition to the Fulton appointment, Mr. Bush instructed Messrs.  Sununu and Sullivan to resolve the problem.  "At that point I think the White House could have helped," Mr. Fulton says, but it didn't.  Like Mr. Fiske, Dr. Sullivan asked Sen. Dole to arrange a meeting with conservative senators so that he and Mr. Fulton could address their concerns.  But that meeting was similarly fruitless.  The day after, Sen. Humphrey and five other senators wrote Mr. Bush opposing Mr. Fulton.  Mr. Fulton did have strong support.  Sen. Don Nickles, a Republican abortion foe from Oklahoma, backed him.  So did Mr. Fulton's boss, Gov. Henry Bellmon, who had directed Mr. Bush's campaign in Oklahoma.  Gov. Bellmon called Mr. Bush at Camp David one weekend to speak up for Mr. Fulton.  The President wasn't available, so the governor talked to an aide.  Then Gov. Bellmon sent Mr. Bush a handwritten note.  Mr. Bush didn't respond to the governor's letter.  The appointment continued to languish, and on June 1, Dr. Sullivan called Mr. Fulton and suggested that he withdraw his name from consideration.  Dr. Sullivan had concluded that even if he pushed the Fulton nomination through the White House and the Senate, the price of victory would be too high.  "He would have incurred the wrath of the right-to-life movement, and I would have been the enemy," Mr. Fulton says.  Looking back, Mr. Fulton says, "You've got right-wing politics taking precedence over everything else.  I really believe that Sununu and some of the others at the White House are disregarding those who are running the departments."  ---  Paul M. Barrett contributed to this story.  The owner of the tanker that went aground off Newport, R.I., June 23, spilling almost 300,000 gallons of oil, agreed to plead guilty to violating federal pollution law and to pay a $1 million fine, the Justice Department said.  Ballard Shipping Co., the owner of the tanker World Prodigy, signed a plea agreement filed in federal court in Providence, R.I., under which the company would pay the fine for violating the federal Clean Water Act, the Justice Department said.  The ship's captain, Iakovos Georgoudis, agreed to plead guilty to the same charge and to pay a $10,000 fine, the department said.  The government had charged the defendants with negligently discharging the oil into the coastal waters of Rhode Island.  Neither the company, which is based in Athens, Greece, nor Mr. Georgoudis could be reached for comment.  The plea agreements require court approval to take effect.  Howard Savings Bank and Washington Bancorp dropped a plan for Howard to acquire Washington Bancorp, Hoboken, N.J., and its Washington Savings Bank unit for $47 million, or $20.59 a common share.  The companies said pricing was an issue but didn't elaborate.  A provision of the accord said the price could be adjusted based on Washington Bancorp's shareholder equity prior to closing and that Washington could drop the plan if that adjustment caused a per-share price of less than $18.50 a share.  Neither company said whether it would be looking for other merger partners.  Howard Savings, Livingston, N.J., had assets of $4.9 billion and shareholder equity of $371.9 million at June 30.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Washington's stock closed at $13.25, down $2.75.  Howard Savings closed at $17.75, up 25 cents.  Anthony Lisa, a vice president of Washington Savings Bank, said he understood that several of the issues had to do with uncertainty about a pending shareholder lawsuit filed against Washington Bancorp earlier this year.  The suit alleged securities-law violations in connection with the bank holding company's 1988 third-quarter earnings statement.  The Labor Department proposed new rules to expand and strengthen requirements for workers' personal protective equipment.  The department's Occupational Safety and Health Administration proposed broadening and stiffening existing requirements, and updating them to encourage the use of newer equipment.  The proposal covers helmets, face guards, eyeglasses, safety shoes and other equipment.  OSHA also proposed requiring employers to assess hazards in their workplaces that would necessitate such equipment, and to train workers in its use.  OSHA said it wants to encourage innovation in equipment and to make it easier for employers to accept the equipment and more likely that employees will use it.  Newer, more comfortable equipment is available that would encourage more use, OSHA said.  OSHA noted that its existing standards for protective equipment date back to 1971 and 1972; they include requirements for men's safety shoes, for example, but there are no requirements for women's shoes.  The proposals are based partly on new standards issued by the American National Standards Institute, a private group.  The agency estimated that increased compliance with existing regulations could eliminate 82,800 of the 411,000 annual injuries caused by failure to use proper equipment.  It said the new rules could prevent another 41,000 injuries.  Either better compliance or the new rules would save six lives a year, OSHA added.  The agency estimated the annual cost of full compliance with existing rules at $65.3 million, and the added cost of complying with the proposed new ones at $28.3 million.  The proposal covers general industry but excludes construction, maritime and agriculture, for which OSHA generally has fewer regulations.  The National Safety Council has estimated that eye, head, face and foot injuries represented 13.8% of a total of roughly 1.8 million disabling work injuries in 1987.  OSHA gave interested parties until Oct. 16 to comment on the proposed rules before it decides whether to hold hearings and whether to adopt the proposal.  Director Brian De Palma's most unwavering artistic trait over the years has been his uncanny emotional radar.  People respond to his movies viscerally: sometimes with fear, sometimes with loathing, sometimes with delight -- almost always with vehemence.  But nothing he's done before will fully prepare either his greatest fans or his greatest detractors for the depths of sorrow, or for the sheer beauty, of his latest film, "Casualties of War."  This is a Vietnam movie like no other, having neither the hyper-reality of "Platoon" nor the stylized brutality of "Full Metal Jacket."  Though the physical production (most of the film was shot on location in Thailand) is stunning, Mr. De Palma shaped this big canvas with subtle grace, setting aside his usual visual pyrotechnics.  Working with writer David Rabe's pungent language, he gets at the moral quicksand of Vietnam by means of a simple allegory -- all the more haunting because it is based on an actual event.  The event was reported at length in Daniel Lang's book, "Casualties of War," which originally appeared as a piece in The New Yorker in 1969.  Mr. Lang told the devastating tale of a squad of young soldiers sent out on a reconnaissance mission, who kidnap a young Vietnamese woman for portable "rest and recreation."  They rape her, then murder her.  One of the five, however, a recruit whom Mr. Lang gave the pseudonym of Eriksson, refuses to participate, yet he doesn't save the girl.  Later he reveals to his superior officers what took place on the mission, and eventually, forces a reluctant military to prosecute and convict his former squad-mates.  After his discharge, Eriksson secluded himself on a farm in the Midwest, where he still lives under an assumed name.  The convicted men served time, though their sentences were commuted.  The story raised a great many fascinating questions pertaining to Vietnam as well as to the broader moral universe.  Eriksson wasn't opposed to the war.  Yet he distinguished between the "justifiable" (in his eyes) killing of military targets, and the obviously unjust rape and murder of a civilian, a helpless girl.  The other soldiers, especially the squad leader, rationalized their crime as a natural outgrowth of a war that seemed outside the usual rules of war.  There was, after all, an inherent absurdity in a tour of duty with a set time limit, which made killing Vietnamese for a year the military equivalent of a young IBM-er's stint in the London office.  The Lang piece's cinematic potential wasn't lost on film makers, but neither Hollywood nor the public was ready to tackle Vietnam in the early 1970s.  Elia Kazan, however, used the story as the starting point for his low-budget psychological thriller, "The Visitors," a 1972 film that hypothesized what would happen to Eriksson when the men he'd put away were released from prison.  Praised abroad, the movie was generally dismissed here.  While Mr. Lang was doing research for "Casualties of War," and then publishing the book, Mr. De Palma was a young film maker also using Vietnam as his subject.  Two of his earliest movies -- absurdist comedies showing the seeds of a provocative talent and starring an unknown actor, Robert De Niro -- took the anarchic student-protester view then in vogue.  In the 1968 "Greetings," two buddies try to help their pal avoid the draft by coaching him on how to flunk the psychiatric exam.  Two years later, in "Hi Mom," Mr. De Palma traced the escapades of a Vietnam veteran trying to earn a living making dirty movies.  Mr. De Palma's own war experience, then, was limited to time spent in this country looking through a director's loupe instead of a rifle sight.  Yet with this film he has found an emotional if not a political terrain for Vietnam that resonates more powerfully with me, someone who watched the war on television, than any other movie on the subject I've seen.  He's been helped in this considerably by Vietnam veteran Rabe's experience and obsession with Vietnam, which provided the material for many of his plays, including the well-known "Streamers."  Yet, marvelous as the results of the collaboration seem, Mr. Rabe reportedly is unhappy with the finished product's alterations in his script, even though Mr. De Palma seems to have respected and enhanced the spare elegance of Mr. Rabe's language and his song lyricist's way of capturing the rhythms of soldier's slang.  When the corporal, a bully, wants a private to carry his knapsack he orders him to "hump my ruck."  When Eriksson, imploring the squad leader to have mercy on the girl, invokes the name of the leader's best friend, who died in action, the squad leader snarls: "Brownie ain't on my frequency no more.  He's on the death frequency."  Only once or twice does Mr. Rabe's script go slack, most glaringly in Eriksson's big summing up speech, where he crudely announces what the film has already revealed so eloquently.  This is also the only spot where the Ennio Morricone score overreaches; elsewhere the music is wrenchingly right.  Perhaps the picture's biggest surprise is Michael J. Fox's understated yet powerfully evocative portrayal of Eriksson, the naive farm boy shocked into adulthood.  Not by war -- he's cocky, almost giddy after his first combat experience -- but by something he hasn't been trained for, the rape and murder of an innocent girl (Eriksson never sees her as the audience might, as a metaphor for Vietnam).  Mr. Fox, generally thought of as a slick actor with an easy-going comic style, has previously demonstrated his range in movies that were "serious," if not good.  This performance firmly proves that he may be little, but he has a far reach.  Sean Penn, as might be expected, pulls out all stops as Meserve, the sergeant who comes up with the kidnapping scheme.  The film makers take pains to establish Meserve's credentials as a good soldier; he saves Eriksson's life, he's near the end of his tour of duty and has seen more action than any 20-year-old should.  Mr. Penn plays him as a theatrical demon, a dumb but sly manipulator who wants his men to back him no matter what he does.  The movie implies that he's been turned upside-down by the war, but he shifts so easily from angel to devil that you sense he might not be averse to raping girls back home.  The secondary characters are vividly realized, especially Meserve's main ally, the ghoulish Clark (Don Harvey).  One of the movie's most sinister moments takes place during a long march across a mountain ridge, when Clark sidles up to his squad's terrified prisoner and starts singing: "Hello, I love you won't you tell me your name . . ."  At that moment the girl's anguish takes on new dimension as she fully realizes the madness she's become part of.  Never has American pop music, now a Vietnam movie cliche, been used to more chilling effect.  Though she speaks little, and only in Vietnamese, Thuy Thu Le, the student-turned-actress who plays the kidnap victim, conveys her fright and bafflement at what is happening to her with harrowing conviction.  Mr. De Palma has staged the story as a flashback, set off when Eriksson falls asleep on the San Francisco subway, some years after the war.  The picture has already come under some attack for shortshrifting the courtroom scenes, and for the ending, which allows Eriksson to not only wake up from his nightmarish recollection, but to be absolved by a stranger on the train, a young Vietnamese woman.  It's been said that this redemptive finale provides an excuse to forget Vietnam, to wipe it from memory, a mystifying criticism that equates redemption with amnesia.  Whatever this may mean for Eriksson, the audience won't so easily shake itself loose from the event's white-hot emotional grip, especially from the final sequence, after the abduction and the march, when all the soldiers, except Eriksson, empty their automatic rifles into the girl they've raped.  The sight of her bloody death march, an operatic stagger across a railroad trestle, doesn't vanish from memory.  ---  VIDEO TIP: "The Visitors" isn't available on videocassette.  For an entirely different kind of war movie, check out Stanley Kubrick's 1957 masterpiece, "Paths of Glory," with Kirk Douglas as a humane army officer in World War I.  ---  APOLOGIES to the folks at Industrial Light & Magic, who I mistakenly said designed the E.T. knockoff in "The Abyss."  ILM was responsible for the snakelike water creature, one of the movie's few ingenious touches.  Wang Laboratories Inc., strapped for cash and struggling with a mountain of debt, unexpectedly rejected a loan restructuring agreement with its banks and halted certain interest and principal payments.  Individuals familiar with the protracted debt negotiations said the lender group, led by Bank of Boston Corp., signed off on a restructuring agreement Tuesday night.  However, when the plan was presented to Wang's directors yesterday, they turned it down, the individuals said.  The rejection and default on the debt payments heightened investor concern about Wang's ability to rebound from a host of problems in the wake of a $424.3 million loss in the year ended June 30.  Last week, its president, Frederick Wang, was forced out and the Lowell, Mass.-based company is searching for a successor.  Wang's problems stem from high costs and slower-than-expected sales of its midrange computer and office-automation products.  Yesterday, Wang's Class B stock fell 50 cents, to $6, in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Wang "can't afford to have this go on.  They need to remove this cloud," said Jay Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. Marc Schulman, an analyst with UBS Securities Inc., said, "Desperate is the word for the situation."  He said that Wang's customers are already worried by its financial straits and added: "The longer this stretches out the greater tendency {they will} have to take their business elsewhere."  Wang officials declined to comment on why the board rejected the agreement that had been worked out with the lenders group by Wang's financial officers and its investment bankers from Salomon Brothers Inc.  Barry Willman, an analyst with Sanford C. Bernstein Inc., said, "It's a given that the terms negotiated by the banks are onerous.  It may be this is posturing by the company," to get bank concessions.  One Wang insider, noting that Wang's board is controlled by 69-year-old An Wang, chairman and chief executive officer, said that the action shows that "the Doctor is playing hardball," with the banks.  Wang said it will continue to make payments to suppliers and employees as they are due.  Credit analysts said that a default on interest payments isn't likely to result in an involuntary bankruptcy-law filing because most commercial paper and other credit agreements provide a 30-day grace period before creditors can start legal actions following a default.  Nevertheless, Fred Pastore, a vice president at Moody's Investors Service Inc. said that "they don't have much room to bargain here.  This default certainly can't go on indefinitely."  Wang declined to specifically identify the creditors who won't be paid.  As of June 30, the company had $338.8 million in short-term debt.  It included notes payable of $83.6 million, commercial paper of $125.5 million and long-term debt of $129.7 million that is due within a year.  In addition, Wang has $622.9 million in other long-term debt.  Presumably debt has risen since the end of the fiscal year, because Wang expects to continue to report losses and the fiscal first quarter, ending Sept. 30, is usually a slow sales period.  It seemed like a limited-partnership investment that couldn't miss -- a deluxe new Radisson hotel with a nine-hole golf course in a fancy office park near, but not too near, Los Angeles International Airport.  Yet despite an occupancy rate about 80% almost from its opening day two years ago, the operator of the 384-room Radisson Plaza is far behind in his rent payments and other operating expenses.  If it is making money, the roughly 6,000 investors in the $70 million Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. partnership aren't seeing any of it.  Brokerage-industry officials conceded recently that $5 billion to $10 billion, and probably much more, of the $100 billion of limited-partnership investments marketed publicly in recent years are in trouble.  Until lately, they have blamed regional economic problems, most evident in real-estate partnerships, and the 1986 tax overhaul that took away crucial tax benefits of many partnership investments.  In fact, the new law merely unmasked many deals as solely tax-motivated.  Other deals, investors complain, were poorly conceived or structured.  And now thousands of investors face heavy losses.  The debacle illustrates how Wall Street can stub its toe when trying to sell products besides stocks and bonds.  Many brokers complain that their bosses pushed them to sell questionable partnerships -- in many cases, slighting their fiduciary responsibility to investors.  Several present and former Shearson brokers say their bosses warned them not to waste time reading prospectuses, time that would be better spent selling to clients.  However, Stephen H. Silverstein, Shearson's top real-estate and limited-partnership official, remarks: "My experience is that there are a number of brokers who read the prospectus and communicate the risks to clients."  He adds that if brokers don't do that, they're "not doing their job for the client."  Not that Mr. Silverstein has unqualified sympathy for investors.  He finds it "somewhat fascinating" when they blame brokerage firms for disappointing investments.  "The risk is specified in the {partnership} agreement," he says.  He also notes that unlike many stocks, a partnership investment takes years to either succeed or fail and can be difficult to sell off; so, he says, a partnership that flounders seems worse because it's a "continued irritant" to an investor.  Still, he concedes: "Being a Monday-morning quarterback, there are probably investment opportunities that all of us have made available that, based on hindsight, based on a lot of factors, we may have decided to do differently."  Though Shearson is hardly the only big Wall Street firm with partnership woes, it is the most prominent.  E.F. Hutton Group, which Shearson absorbed in 1987, was a major seller of partnerships, and last year the combined Shearson Lehman Hutton led the securities industry by raising $1.4 billion through partnership syndications.  In addition, some of the most publicized partnership troubles have been at Shearson's Balcor Co.; the real-estate unit, headed by Mr. Silverstein and based in Skokie, Ill., recently decided to get out of the partnership game.  Shearson, a 62%-owned unit of American Express Co., acknowledges setting aside reserves for partnerships that are going bad, even though its officials say they can't be expected to inject capital into every one that sours.  Industry officials estimate the reserves at nearly $200 million; Shearson declines to confirm that figure.  In any event, Wall Street clearly is facing years of partnership headaches, including the growing bitterness of brokers who sold investors on partnerships that later crumbled.  Many frustrated brokers are surprisingly candid.  Fred Sanderson, a 66-year-old broker at First Affiliated Securities in Newton, Kan., says he gets "very angry" about the thousands of dollars his clients lost.  While at another firm, he says, "I did such a disservice in selling so many limited partnerships.  I don't think these things should ever have been sold."  Says Irwin Stein, a San Francisco plaintiffs lawyer who predicts a wave of investor lawsuits: "The industry deserves everything it gets."  Regulators are just waking up to the extent of the problem.  In California, where blue-sky laws certifying new partnership offerings for sale are unusually tough, a third of investors' complaints lodged with the Department of Corporations allege that the general partners illegally commingled funds.  Many of the syndicators took cash out of profitable partnerships to prop up failing ones, the department's investigators say.  Eventually, most of them crashed.  "If it's a clean, provable case, we take it to the district attorney to prosecute for grand theft and illegal sale of securities," says Irwin Fisk, the chief investigator in the department's Southern California office.  He says that "we see maybe 50" cases of allegedly commingled funds a year, many of which "result in prosecutions and, usually, in convictions."  But often, he laments, "the general partners' right to move money around is written into the partnership agreement.  That's a crazy thing to sign, but investors don't read it."  The Manhattan Beach Radisson exemplifies what can go wrong with a partnership investment and why limited partners often don't smell trouble until it is too late.  Radisson Plaza investors are still getting quarterly income checks, but, unbeknown to most of them, the payments aren't coming from the $145 a night that guests pay for rooms overlooking the golf course or for drinks and dinners.  Instead, Horst Osterkamp, the flamboyant German hotelier from whom Shearson bought the Radisson in 1987 and kept on to run it, is $3.2 million -- more than six months -- behind in rent owed to the partnership and $500,000 in rent penalties, real-estate taxes and legal expenses.  The payments to investors are coming out of a rapidly dwindling $9.5 million letter of credit that Shearson got from Mr. Osterkamp in case of just such problems.  Shearson is scrambling to extricate itself from a 30-year, sale-leaseback arrangement with Mr. Osterkamp before the funds run out.  Shearson also is seeking to replace him as manager.  Mr. Silverstein confirms that talks are going on "to possibly modify {Mr.  Osterkamp's} management of the property," but he won't be specific.  The 49-year-old Mr. Osterkamp agreed to be interviewed for this article but then failed to answer repeated attempts to set up a meeting.  His lawyer, John Child, blames his problems at the Radisson on room rates that "haven't reached expectations of any of the parties."  Helping force the issue is feisty Local 814 of the Hotel Employees and Restaurant Employees International Union, which has represented Radisson Plaza workers without a contract since last November and has picketed the hotel and Shearson's downtown Los Angeles office.  In April, it also appealed directly to Radisson investors.  Buying a large ad in The Wall Street Journal, the union detailed "a web of financial and legal crises" entangling Mr. Osterkamp.  Among other things, it noted that six of his other hotels had sought protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal bankruptcy code, and two more were in foreclosure.  Local newspapers chimed in and began listing the debts directly related to the Radisson, including $1.7 million in unpaid federal and state payroll taxes.  A few weeks later, Shearson filed the partnership's annual report to the Securities and Exchange Commission, disclosing several of the Radisson Plaza's longstanding problems for the first time.  For example, the filing revealed that the hotel's liquor licensee, a company formed by Mr. Osterkamp, had filed for Chapter 11 protection the previous August -- more than eight months earlier.  The hotel continues to serve drinks only on temporary, short-term permits.  The securities firm contends that the Radisson's overdue operating expenses are the sole responsibility of Mr. Osterkamp, the tenant, and not the partnership, the landlord.  Moreover, the hotel itself, purchased for $56.5 million cash, isn't burdened with mortgage debt, as is so much other real estate owned by struggling limited partnerships.  Says Linda Miller, a Shearson executive vice president who put together the Radisson deal, "We have some serious operational problems, but they are short-term and I believe solvable" if Mr. Osterkamp is removed.  She adds that when the firm asked him this spring whether he was diverting the hotel's profits, "his lawyer looked our lawyer in the eye" and said no.  In May, however, Shearson ordered an outside audit of the Radisson's books by Kenneth Leventhal & Co. on the partnership's behalf.  The audit showed, according to a Shearson report filed recently with the SEC, that Mr. Osterkamp is "experiencing substantial financial difficulties" and that the Radisson's "current level of net operating income" is insufficient to cover the rent as it becomes due.  Shearson also warned of the potential drain on Radisson investors' funds if it takes a court battle to replace Mr. Osterkamp.  Upset by the bad publicity, Minneapolis-based Carlson Cos., which franchises Radissons, may step in.  But, says Juergen Bartels, the head of Carlson's hotel division and a longtime friend of Mr. Osterkamp, "we wouldn't do something {to go} around the current management."  Any legal fight would almost certainly embroil J. Ronald Getty, another close friend of Mr. Osterkamp.  The reclusive son of the late billionaire J. Paul Getty guaranteed Mr. Osterkamp's financial obligations under the Radisson lease. (However, the guarantee, which was explained in the prospectus for the Radisson partnership offering, included the disclaimer that the guarantee might not be honored in all cases.)  The two men became business partners in 1974, when they began forming private partnerships to invest in financially troubled, generally rather small Sheratons and Holiday Inns located from Ohio west to Oklahoma, Texas and California.  Later, they rolled the partnerships up into two large ones, with their company, U.S. Hotel Properties Corp., as general partner.  Tax losses from the struggling hotels were then sold off to new investors.  Shearson, which took more than a year to orchestrate the Radisson partnership agreement, apparently failed to uncover the extent of Mr. Osterkamp's poor track record in previous hotel deals.  By that time, at least four hotels managed by Mr. Osterkamp for U.S. Hotel Properties were in foreclosure, two of his former aides say.  They add that even as Shearson was negotiating with him to buy the Radisson Plaza, black-suited federal tax authorities were camped in the hotel's bar, collecting bar receipts to pay thousands of dollars in back payroll taxes.  More than four months after the November 1987 offering, the firm issued a supplement to the prospectus further illuminating U.S. Hotel Properties' poor track record.  In light of the new information, investors already in for a minimum of $5,000 got two weeks to back out.  Still smarting from the stock-market crash, some buyers were attracted by the sales pitch from Michael Finizio, a Shearson broker in Woodland Hills, Calif.  In a letter to clients, Mr. Finizio described the Radisson as a "guaranteed real-estate program" offering a 9% annual return.  He persuaded Michigan investor Murray Bourassa, a retired construction-site inspector, to borrow $5,000 against some mutual-fund shares to buy in.  A friend of Mr. Bourassa's borrowed $80,000 of her own and margined $50,000 of her mother's securities to buy interests.  The loans' variable interest rate, then 8.75%, has soared to 13%, leaving an ever-widening deficit.  Complains Mr. Bourassa bitterly, "They painted a rosy picture, said we couldn't lose."  Mr. Finizio declines comment, but Shearson's Ms. Miller defends its due diligence -- its exercise of fiduciary responsibility to investors -- in looking into Mr. Osterkamp's checkered financial past.  "His business was buying distressed hotels," which is a high-risk business, she snaps, explaining Shearson's involvement with him.  As for the partnership's prognosis, the Radisson hotel's location and amenities make it "an irreplaceable asset" that should appreciate handsomely, she says.  In coming years, scores of lawsuits are expected because of such alleged problems, though how much success investors will have can't be foretold.  One frustrating problem for investors is that they face as many difficulties suing their brokers as they had with their partnerships.  For example, Richard M. Griest, a Sparks, Nev., investor, has been trying for months to launch a class-action lawsuit against an $82 million Balcor real-estate partnership, in which partnership interests have recently traded in the secondary market at 20 cents on the dollar.  But he can't obtain a list of other limited partners; he says he needs at least a few other names to get a lawsuit started.  He says the law in Illinois, where Balcor is based, requires that such names be furnished.  But Balcor, in a June 13 letter, told Mr. Griest that he couldn't have them because the partnership agreement says they must be provided for "any proper purpose."  Balcor's lawyers say "litigation purposes" aren't proper.  Citing continuing woes of its disk-drive business, Priam Corp. posted a fiscal fourth-quarter loss of $6 million on a 34% decline in revenue to $25.4 million.  Priam, San Jose, Calif., had year-earlier profit of $1.4 million, or six cents a share, on revenue of $38.7 million.  For the full fiscal year ended July 1, the company posted a loss of $25.4 million, compared with year-earlier profit of $543,000, or two cents a share.  Revenue declined 14% to $122.7 million.  "This continues to be a very difficult time for the company," said Glenn O. Maddalon, chairman and chief executive officer.  The company has been hurt by excess capacity and pricing pressures in its segment of the disk-drive business, and in January said pressures would endure for several quarters.  Priam, which makes Winchester disk drives for minicomputer and microcomputer makers, is trying to reduce costs and inventory while disposing of non-producing assets and seeking additional sources of cash to keep afloat, Mr. Maddalon said.  In national over-the-counter trading, Priam closed at 37.5 cents, down 3.125 cents.  Keith Ramsay is the British director we've all been waiting for.  He thinks Americans make better audiences than the English.  Besides that, he thinks our babies make better actors.  And he ought to know.  He's just cast five un-toilet-trained Oregonians as the Christ child.  Mr. Ramsay and his troupe of actors are in Oregon this month touring with the first U.S. performance of the Lincoln Mystery Plays, traditional medieval folk dramas based on the Bible, which they normally re-enact every four years in the courtyard of England's Lincoln Cathedral.  The adult actors from Lincoln play parts from Adam to Zelome, but in each of the five Oregon cities to which they've traveled, an important but non-speaking role had to be filled by a local actor.  Any baby would do to play Jesus in most of the towns, but in Eugene perfection was sought by holding public auditions at a local theater.  The Jesus auditions brought out five mothers who thought their babies would be just divine in the role.  There were even three girls among the tryouts, the reasoning being that with a bald, six-month-old baby, Pampers cover up a multitude of problems.  Free-lance director Joseph Gilg took on the task of choosing Jesus.  God-like was not one of the attributes he required, but he did insist on even temperament.  "I don't think we'd want a cranky Jesus," said Mr. Gilg.  "It would give a wrong twist to the story."  One by one, Mr. Gilg peered into the cherubic faces, then watched as the babies were tested by being put in the arms of a strange woman while their mothers walked away.  Siblings, grandparents and neighbors held their breath, fearful that a wail would mean curtains for an infant's theatrical aspirations.  A would-be Jesus named Chelsey was very cranky just before her name was called but, miraculously, she was able to burp all over her father's shirt in the nick of time.  Her suddenly happy disposition won her the position of understudy.  When it came to naming Jesus, Mr. Gilg was cautious.  "If you're going to live and die by my decision," he told the mothers, "I'd rather you leave now."  It was pure coincidence that the director's name was Joseph, but the mother of the baby chosen by Mr. Gilg seemed to think that her name had given her boy a leg up on the competition.  When Daniel McCormick's name was announced, his mother cried out, "And my name is Mary]"  Next, the Lincoln Mystery Players journeyed to Bend, in central Oregon, where the first production of their tour was staged.  Next to a duck pond in Drake Park, they took an appreciative audience from Creation to doomsday.  The company performed short, verse plays from a 1468 manuscript, the very plays seen by residents of Lincoln in the 16th century, before they were outlawed during the Reformation.  In those early days, the plays were presented by working people on religious festival days to help reinforce the faith of a largely illiterate populace.  Mr. Ramsay, the director of the company, is director of the drama department at Bishop Grosseteste College in Lincoln.  In 1978 he revived the mystery plays, known as the Lincoln cycle, and drew together a troupe of amateur and professional actors who have performed the plays in France, Italy and Germany.  Brought to the U.S. by the Oregon Committee for the Humanities, the players selected 13 of the cycle's 42 plays to perform for the Oregon audiences.  The baby Jesus appears in two of the plays, "Birth of Christ" and "Adoration of the Shepherds."  In Bend, the baby Jesus there had not auditioned, mind you, but he played the part like a natural.  When he was first carried on stage, a young voice in the crowd exclaimed, "It's a live one]"  Far from being a cranky Jesus, this one cooed beatifically, even while being passed back and forth between Joseph and Mary, chucked under the chin by Salome and Zelome (Mary's midwives), and kissed by a number of shepherds.  At intermission Mr. Ramsay was ecstatic.  The audience was fantastic, he said.  Unlike the more reserved audiences in England, the people of Bend laughed in all the right places, and even booed and hissed at King Herod, the bad guy.  As for Jesus, what a baby]  "He's the best baby Jesus we've ever had," stated Stephen Hartford, who played the grownup Jesus.  But that was before he'd seen the performance of the baby Jesus from Pendleton or Ashland or Portland, or even that very special baby Jesus from Eugene, the winner of the audition.  You know.  Mary's kid.  ---  Ms. Hauser is a free-lance writer based in Portland, Ore.  Crazy Eddie Inc., the troubled electronics retailer, said it would close eight more stores and concentrate on the New York metropolitan area.  The concern, based in Edison, N.J., has been operating since June under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, which allows it to work out a debt repayment plan, while being protected from creditors' lawsuits.  It currently has 26 stores, down from a peak of 42 stores earlier this year.  Crazy Eddie said it expects to close the eight stores by November.  The closings are of outlets in Philadelphia, southern New Jersey, Connecticut and one in New York state.  Crazy Eddie didn't state the cost of the most recent closings.  Its closing of stores in March resulted in charges of about $13.8 million.  BCE Inc., Toronto, said it will "seek other ways to dispose of" its 67% stake in BCE Development Corp., after a proposed purchase of BCE Development by Olympia & York Developments fell through.  BCE said it still wishes to reduce its exposure to real estate, but added it will provide support to allow the unprofitable BCE Development to conduct its business in "a normal manner."  Olympia & York dropped its bid for BCE Development, valued at 700 million Canadian dollars (US$593 million), Tuesday when an insufficient number of the real estate concern's securities were tendered.  Olympia & York is a real estate concerned owned by Toronto's Reichmann family.  BCE Inc., a Montreal-based holding company with interests in communications, energy and real estate, had agreed to tender its stake in BCE Development to the Olympia & York offer.  Louis J. Poletti, a real-estate agent and racehorse-stable owner, was named a director of this real-estate investment trust, whose primary asset is Bay Meadows Race Track, operated by Bay Meadows Operating Co.  International Business Machines Corp. and Siemens AG will announce today that they have finally completed their agreement for Siemens to take over most of IBM's Rolm telecommunications subsidiary, industry executives said.  IBM, Armonk, N.Y., and Siemens, of West Germany, have scheduled a news conference for this morning but they declined to comment on what would be announced.  Their preliminary plan was disclosed late last year and initially was expected to be completed early in 1989.  But negotiations dragged on for months as the deal turned out to be far more complex than expected, largely because details had to be worked out in each of the many countries where the companies have operations.  In the meantime, IBM has had to do some damage control, sending executives out to reassure Rolm customers that it wasn't abandoning them.  Many customers seem to have been won over, and IBM unveiled some products last week that consultants said should confirm that view.  Some of the products were enhancements for IBM's so-called private branch exchanges that make the telephone switches mesh better with the Siemens line.  In addition, IBM expanded some of its telecommunications software offerings, convincing consultants that its interest in telecommunications remains intense, even if it is more narrowly focused than it was a year ago.  The industry executives added that IBM will announce today some features for its NetView software, which lets customers manage computer and telecommunications networks.  The software, which has been well-received as it has taken shape during the past three years, is strategic because it puts IBM at the heart of its customers' operations, giving it opportunities to sell lots of other hardware and software, too.  Through agreements with outside companies, IBM will provide more capability for NetView to manage networks of non-IBM equipment, the executives said.  IBM also will make the software easier to use by increasing the use of graphics.  IBM declined to comment.  "IBM is not waiting for its own development" operations to produce the features.  "It's going out and getting what's available in the market now," said Sam Albert, a consultant in Scarsdale, N.Y. "That's a pretty aggressive IBM."  A slight pickup in both industrial production and homebuilding in July helped chase away lingering fears that the economy is slipping into a recession.  After falling for two months, the Federal Reserve Board's index of industrial production rose 0.2% in July even though auto output plunged.  And the Commerce Department said housing starts grew 0.8% in July, a sign that lower mortgage rates may be invigorating the industry.  Starts of single-family homes were particularly strong.  "What the numbers are telling us is that the economy certainly isn't headed into a recession," said Robert Chandross, an economist at Lloyds Bank in New York.  For the past two weeks, many economists have concluded that perhaps they were too pessimistic when they said the recent slowdown in economic growth was the precursor of a recession.  The new data -- coming on the heels of reports that businesses continue to add workers at a healthy rate and that retail sales rebounded in July -- offered additional evidence that the economy is still expanding, albeit slowly.  Economists at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, for instance, who earlier said that a recession was likely this year, are softening their warnings a bit.  "The numbers are all sort of saying the same things about the month of July: The economy is sluggish, but it still seems to be growing," said Bruce Steinberg of Merrill Lynch.  "The decline in interest rates does seem to be giving it some buoyancy."  But Michael Keran, chief economist at Prudential Insurance Co. of America, said he continues to see a 50-50 chance of recession this year, largely because he still expects businesses to cut back on investment.  "One month's number isn't enough to change my opinion," he said.  He conceded, however, that if the July pattern is repeated in August, he will have to reconsider.  The Fed said the increased output of factories, mines and utilities -- after falling 0.1% in both May and June -- reflected strength across-the-board except in production of big-ticket consumer goods.  Factory output, unchanged for two months, rose 0.2% in July.  U.S. industry operated at 83.6% of capacity in July, the same as in June, the Fed added.  The operating rate for factories alone fell to 83.9% from 84.0% the month before, reflecting the slowdown in auto production.  Responding to sluggish demand, overall output of consumer durable goods, those items intended to last more than three years, fell 2.5% in July, the third straight monthly decline.  Auto plants assembled new vehicles at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of six million in July, down from 6.8 million the month before.  Output of appliances and other household goods dropped 0.8% after rising rapidly earlier in the year.  Output of non-durable consumer goods increased.  The Fed report gave no hint that makers of capital equipment expect demand for their wares to fall off.  Production of business equipment, though reduced by the drop in auto and truck production, grew 0.2% in July after remaining flat in June.  The Fed attributed the increase to stepped-up production of commercial and factory equipment as well as aircraft.  Output of industrial materials also rebounded in July after dropping for two months.  The Commerce Department said builders began work on new housing units at an annual rate of 1,430,000, up 0.8% from July.  Housing starts surged by 8.5% in June and fell by 2.6% in May.  The department cautioned that it takes three months to establish a trend, but housing industry economists confidently cited the July report as proof that the decline in mortgage rates from their peak in March and April is having a positive effect.  Starts of single-family houses surged by 6.3% in July to an annual rate of 1,041,000 after increasing only 0.2% in June and falling 5.1% in May.  The department said starts of apartment houses with five or more units, which swing widely from one month to the next, fell 14.1% in July after soaring by 32.9% in June.  Starts of two- to four-family homes rose 5.4% after climbing 33.3% the month before.  The department added that building permits were issued at an annual rate of 1,267,000 units in July, down 3% because of a sharp drop in permits issued for apartment houses.  Building permits for singlefamily houses were issued at an annual rate of 900,000, up 3%.  All the figures are adjusted for usual seasonal variations.  @ ---  Here is a summary of the Federal Reserve Board's report on industrial production in July.  The figures are seasonally adjusted.  @ % change from  @ June July  @ 1989 1988  @ Total .......................... 0.2 2.7  @ Consumer goods ............... -0.4 3.5  @ Business equipment ........... 0.2 6.2  @ Defense and space ............ 0.3 -1.7  @ Manufacturing only ............. 0.2 3.3  @ Durable goods ................ 0.0 2.7  @ Nondurable goods ............. 0.5 4.1  @ Mining ......................... 0.3 -3.5  @ Utilities ...................... 0.8 1.2  @ The industrial production index for July stood at 141.7% of the 1977 average. 